CHAPTER I.
Let winds be shrill, let waves roll high,
I fear not wave nor wind;
Yet marvel not, Sir Childe, that I
Am sorrowful of mind.
Childe Harold
.
Well
, Sir Jarvy, said Galleygo, following on the
heels of the two admirals, as the latter entered the
dressing-room
of the officer addressed; it has turned out just as I
thought; and the County of Fair-villian has come out of his
hole, like a porpoise coming up to breathe, the moment our
backs is turned! As soon as we gives the order to
squareaway
for England, and I sees the old Planter's cabin
windows
turned upon France, I foreseed them consequences.
Well, gentlemen, here's been a heap of prize-money made
in this house, without much fighting. We shall have to give
the young lieutenant a leave, for a few months, in order that
he may take his swing ashore, here, among his brother
squires!
Pray, sir, what may be your pleasure? demanded Sir
Gervaise; and what the devil has brought you at my
heels?
Why, big ships always tows small craft, your honour,
returned Galleygo, simpering. Howsever, I never comes
without an errand, as every body knows. You see, Sir
Jarvy,  you see, Admiral Blue, that our signal-officer is
ashore, with a report for us; and meeting me in the hall, he
made it to me first like, that I might bring it up to you
a'terwards
.
His news is that the French county is gone to sea,
as I has just told you, gentlemen.
Can it be possible that Bunting has brought any such
tidings here! Harkee, Galleygo; desire Mr. Bunting to
walk up; and then see that you behave yourself as is decent
in a house of mourning.
Ay-ay-sir. No fears of I, gentlemen. I can put on as
grievous a look as the best on 'em, and if they wishes to see
sorrow becomingly, and ship-shape, let them study my
conduct
and countenance. We has all seen dead men afore
now, gentlemen, as we all knows. When we fou't
Mounsheer
Graveland, (Gravelin) we had forty-seven slain,
besides
the hurt that lived to tell their own pain; and when we
had the
Go to the devil, Master Galleygo, and desire Mr. Bunting
to walk up stairs, cried Sir Gervaise, impatiently.
Ay-ay-sir. Which will your honour have done first?
Let me see the signal-officer,
first
, answered the
vice-admiral
,
laughing; then be certain of executing the other
order.
Well, muttered Galleygo, as he descended the stairs;
if I was to do as he says, now, what would we do with
the fleet? Ships wants orders to fight; and flags wants
food to give orders; and food wants stewards to be put upon
the table; and stewards wants no devils to help 'em do
their duty. NonoSir Jarvy; I 'll not pay that visit, till
we all goes in company, as is suitable for them that has
sailed so long together.
This will be great news, Dick, if de Vervillin has really
come out! cried Sir Gervaise, rubbing his hands with
delight
.
Hang me, if I wait for orders from London; but
we 'll sail with the first wind and tide. Let them settle the
quarrel at home, as they best can; it is
our
business to catch
the Frenchman. How many ships do you really suppose
the count to have?
Twelve of two decks, besides one three-decker, and
beating us in frigates. Two or three, however, are short
vessels, and cannot be quite as heavy as our own. I see no
reason why we should not engage him.
I rejoice to hear you say so! How much more
honourable
is it to seek the enemy, than to be intriguing about a
court! I hope you intend to let me announce that red riband
in general orders to-morrow, Dick?
Never, with my consent, Sir Gervaise, so long as the
house of Hanover confers the boon. But what an
extraordinary
scene we have just had below! This young lieutenant
is a noble fellow, and I hope, with all my heart, he will be
enabled to make good his claim.
1 *
Of that Sir Reginald assures me there can be no
manner
of doubt. His papers are in perfect order, and his story
simple and probable. Do you not remember hearing,
when we were midshipmen in the West Indies, of a
lieutenant
of the Sappho's striking a senior officer, ashore; and
of his having been probably saved from the sentence of
death, by the loss of the ship?
As well as if it were yesterday, now you name the
vessel. And this you suppose to have been the late Sir
Wycherly's brother? Did he belong to the Sappho?
So they tell me, below; and it leaves no doubt on my
mind, of the truth of the whole story.
It is a proof, too, how easy it is for one to return to
England, and maintain his rights, after an absence of more
than half a century. He in Scotland has a claim quite as
strong as that of this youth!
Dick Bluewater, you seem determined to pull a house
down about your own ears! What have you or I to do with
these Scotch adventurers, when a gallant enemy invites us
to come out and meet him! But, mumhere is Bunting.
At this instant the signal-lieutenant of the Plantagenet was
shown into the room, by Galleygo, in person.
Well, Bunting; what tidings from the fleet? demanded
Sir Gervaise. Do the ships still ride to the flood?
It is slack-water, Sir Gervaise, and the vessels are
looking all ways at once. Most of us are clearing hawse,
for there are more round turns in our cables, than I
remember
ever to have seen in so short a time.
That comes of there being no wind, and the uselessness
of the staysails and spankers. What has brought you ashore?
Galleygo tells us something of a cutter's coming in, with
information that the French are out; but
his
news is usually
galley
-news.
Not always, Sir Gervaise, returned the lieutenant,
castting
a side-look at the steward, who often comforted him
with ship's delicacies in the admiral's cabin; this time, he
is right, at least. The Active is coming in slowly, and has
been signalling us all the morning. We make her out to
say that Monsieur Vervillin is at sea with his whole force.
Yes, muttered Galleygo to the rear-admiral, in a sort
of aside; the County of Fairvillian has come out of his
hole, just as I told Sir Jarvy. Fair-weather-villians they
all is, and no bones broken.
Silenceand you think, Bunting, you read the signals
clearly?
No doubt of it, Sir Gervaise. Captain Greenly is of
the same opinion, and has sent me ashore with the news.
He desired me to tell you that the ebb would make in half
an hour, and that we can then fetch past the rocks to the
westward, light as the wind is.
Ay, that is Greenly, I can swear!He 'll not sit down
until we are all aweigh, and standing out. Does the cutter
tell us which way the count was looking?
To the westward, sir; on an easy bowline, and under
short canvass.
The gentleman is in no hurry, it would seem. Has he
a convoy?
Not a sail, sir. Nineteen sail, all cruisers, and only
twelve of the line. He has one two-decker, and two frigates
more than we can muster; just a Frenchman's odds, sir.
The count has certainly with him, the seven new ships
that were built last season, quietly observed Bluewater,
leaning back in his easy-chair, until his body inclined at an
angle of forty-five degrees, and stretching a leg on an
empty stand, in his usual self-indulgent manner. They
are a little heavier than their old vessels, and will give us
harder work.
The tougher the job, the more creditable the
workmanship
.
The tide is turning you say, Bunting?
It is, Sir Gervaise; and we shall all tend ebb, in twenty
minutes. The frigates outside are riding down channel
already. The Chloe seems to think that we shall be moving
soon, as she has crossed top-gallant and royal-yards. Even
Captain Greenly was thinking of stretching along the
messenger
.
Ah! you 're a set of uneasy fellows, all round!You
tire of your native land in twenty-four hours, I find. Well,
Mr. Bunting; you can go off, and say that all is very well.
This house is in a sad state of confusion, as, I presume you
know. Mention this to Captain Greenly.
Ay-ay-sir; is it your pleasure I should tell him
anything
else, Sir Gervaise Oakes?
Why  yes  Bunting, answered the vice-admiral,
smiling; you may as well give him a hint to get all his
fresh grub off, as fast as he canandyes; to let no more
men quit the ship on liberty.
Anything more, Sir Gervaise? added the pertinacious
officer.
On the whole, you may as well run up a signal to be
ready to unmoor. The ships can very well ride at single
anchors, when the tide has once fairly made. What say
you, Bluewater?
A signal to unmoor, at once, would expedite matters.
You know very well, you intend to go to sea, and why not
do the thing off-hand?
I dare say, now, Bunting, you too would like to give the
commander-in-chief a nudge of some sort or other.
If I could presume so far, Sir Gervaise. I can only
say, sir, that the sooner we are off, the sooner we shall flog
the French.
And Master Galleygo, what are your sentiments, on
this occasion? It is a full council, and all ought to speak,
freely.
You knows, Sir Jarvy, that I never speaks in these
matters, unless spoken to. Admiral Blue and your honour
are quite enough to take care of the fleet in most
circumstances
,
though there is some knowledge in the tops, as well
as in the cabin. My ideas is, gentlemen, that, by casting
to starboard on this ebb tide, we shall all have our heads
off-shore, and we shall fetch into the offing as easily as a
country wench turns in a jig. What we shall do with the
fleet, when we gets out, will be shown in our ultra
movements
.
By ultra, David meant ulterior, a word he had
caught up from hearing despatches read, which he understood
no better than those who wrote them at the admiralty.
Thanks to you all, my friends! cried Sir Gervaise,
who was so delighted at the prospect of a general
engagement
,
that he felt a boyish pleasure in this fooling; and
now to business, seriously. Mr. Bunting, I would have the
signal for sailing shown. Let each ship fire a recall-gun
for her boats. Half an hour later, show the bunting to
unmoor
;
and send my boat ashore as soon as you begin to
heave on the capstan. So, good-morning, my fine fellow,
and show your activity.
Mr. Bunting, as you pass the Csar, do me the favour
to ask for my boat, also, said Bluewater, lazily, but
half-raising
his body to look after the retiring lieutenant. If
we are to move, I suppose I shall have to go with the rest
of them. Of course we shall repeat all your signals.
Sir Gervaise waited until Bunting was out of the room,
when he turned to the steward, and said with some dryness
of manner
Mr. Galleygo, you have my permission to go on board,
bag and baggage.
Yes, Sir Jarvy, I understands. We are about to get the
ships under way, and good men ought to be in their places.
Good-by, Admiral Blue. We shall meet before the face of
the French, and then I expects every man on us will set an
example to himself of courage and devotion.
That fellow grows worse and worse, each day, and I
shall have to send him forward, in order to check his
impertinence
,
said Sir Gervaise, half-vexed and half-laughing.
I wonder you stand his saucy familiarity as well as you
appear to dowith his Admiral Blues!
I shall take offence as soon as I find Sir Jarvy really
out of humour with him. The man is brave, honest, and
attached; and these are virtues that would atone for a
hundred faults.
Let the fellow go to the devil!Do you not think I had
better go out, without waiting for despatches from town?
It is hard to say. Your orders may send us all down
into Scotland, to face Charles Stuart. Perhaps, too, they
may make you a duke, and me a baron, in order to secure
our fidelity!
The blackguards!well, say no more of that, just now.
If M. de Vervillin is steering to the westward, he can hardly
be aiming at Edinburgh, and the movements in the north.
That is by no means so certain. Your really politic
fellows
usually look one way and steer another.
It is my opinion, that his object is to effect a diversion,
and my wish is to give it to him, to his heart's content. So
long as this force is kept near the chops of the channel, it
can do no harm in the north, and, in-so-much, must leave
the road to Germany open.
For one, I think it a pitynot to say a disgracethat
England cannot settle her own quarrels without calling in
the aid of either Frenchman or Dutchman.
We must take the world as it is, Dick, and act like two
straight-forward seamen, without stopping to talk politics.
I take it for granted, notwithstanding your Stuart fervour,
that you are willing enough to help me thresh Monsieur de
Vervillin?
Beyond a question. Nothing but the conviction that he
was directly employed in serving my natural and legitimate
prince, could induce me to show him any favour. Still,
Oakes, it is possible he may have succours for the Scotch
on board, and be bound to the north by the way of the Irish
channel!
Ay, pretty succours, truly, for an Englishman to
stomach
!
Mousquetaires
, and
rgiments de Croy
, or
de Dillon
,
or some dd French name or other; and, perhaps,
beautiful
muskets from the
Bois de Vincennes;
or some other
infernal nest of Gallic inventions to put down the just
ascendency
of old England! NonoDick Bluewater, your
excellent, loyal, true-hearted English mother, never bore
you, to be a dupe of Bourbon perfidy and trick. I dare say
she sickened at the very name of Louis!
I 'll not answer for that, Sir Jarvy, returned the
rear-admiral
,
with a vacant smile; for she passed some time
at the court of
le Grand Monarque
. But all this is idle;
we know each other's opinions, and, by this time, ought to
know each other's characters. Have you digested any plan
for your future operations; and what part am I to play in
it?
Sir Gervaise paced the room, with hands folded behind
his back, in an air of deep contemplation, for quite five
minutes, before he answered. All this time, Bluewater
remained
watching his countenance and movements, in
anticipation
of what was to come. At length, the vice-admiral
appeared to have made up his mind, and he delivered
himself
of his decision, as follows.
I have reflected on them, Dick, he said, even while
my thoughts have seemed to be occupied with the concerns
of others. If de Vervillin is out, he must still be to the
eastward
of us; for, running as the tides do on the French coast,
he can hardly have made much westing with this light
south-west wind. We are yet uncertain of his destination,
and it is all-important that we get immediate sight of him,
and keep him in view, until he can be brought to action.
Now, my plan is this. I will send out the ships in
succession
,
with orders to keep on an easy bowline, until each
reaches the chops of the channel, when she is to go about
and stand in towards the English coast. Each succeeding
vessel, however, will weigh as soon as her leader is hull
down, and keep within signal distance, in order to send
intelligence
through the whole line. Nothing will be easier
than to keep in sight of each other, in such fine weather;
and by these means we shall spread a wide clew,quite a
hundred miles,and command the whole of the channel.
As soon as Monsieur de Vervillin is made, the fleet can
close, and then we will be governed by circumstances.
Should we see nothing of the French, by the time we make
their coast, we may be certain they have gone up channel;
and then, a signal from the van can reverse the order of
sailing, and we will chase to the eastward, closing to a line
abreast as fast as possible.
All this is very well, certainly; and by means of the
frigates and smaller cruisers we can easily sweep a hundred
and fifty miles of ocean;nevertheless, the fleet will be
much scattered.
You do not think there will be any danger of the
French's engaging the van, before the rear can close to aid
it? asked Sir Gervaise, with interest, for he had the
profoundest
respect for his friend's professional opinions. I
intended to lead out in the Plantagenet, myself, and to have
five or six of the fastest ships next to me, with a view that
we might keep off, until you could bring up the rear. If
they chase, you know we can retire.
Beyond a doubt, if Sir Gervaise Oakes can make up his
mind to
retire
, before any Frenchman who was ever born,
returned Bluewater, laughing. All this sounds well; but,
in the event of a meeting, I should expect to find you, with
the whole van dismasted, fighting your hulks like bull-dogs,
and keeping the Count at bay, leaving the glory of covering
your retreat to me.
NonoDick: I 'll give you my honour I 'll do
nothing
so boyish and silly. I 'm a different man at fifty-five,
from what I was at twenty-five. You may be certain that
I will run, until I think myself strong enough to fight.
Will you allow me to make a suggestion, Admiral
Oakes; and this with all the frankness that ought to
characterize
our ancient friendship?
Sir Gervaise stopped short in his walk, looked Bluewater
steadily in the face, and nodded his head.
I understand by the expression of your countenance,
continued the other, that I am expected to speak. I had
no more to say, than to make the simple suggestion that
your plan would be most likely to be executed, were
I
to
lead the van, and were
you
to bring up the rear.
The devil you do!This comes as near mutinyor
scandalum magnatum
as one can wish! And why do you
suppose that the plan of the commander-in-chief will be least
in danger of failing, if Admiral Bluewater lead on this
occasion
,
instead of Admiral Oakes?
Merely because I think Admiral Oakes, when an enemy
is pressing him, is more apt to take counsel of his heart
than of his head; while Admiral Bluewater is
not
. You do
not know yourself, Sir Jarvy, if you think it so easy a
matter to run away.
I 've spoiled you, Dick, by praising your foolish
manuvring
so much before your face, and that 's the whole
truth of the matter. Nomy mind is made up; and, I
believe
you know me well enough to feel sure, when that is
the case, even a council of war could not move it.
I
lead
out, in the
first
two-decked ship that lifts her anchor, and
you
follow in the
last
. You understand my plan, and will
see it executed, as you see everything executed, in face of
the enemy.
Admiral Bluewater smiled, and not altogether without
irony in his manner; though he managed, at the same time,
to get the leg that had been lowest for the last five minutes,
raised by an ingenuity peculiar to himself, several inches
above its fellow.
Nature never made you for a conspirator, Oakes, he
said, as soon as this change was effected to his mind; for
you carry a top-light in your breast that even the blind can
see!
What crotchet is uppermost in your mind, now, Dick?
Ar'n't the orders plain enough to suit you?
I confess it;as well as the motive for giving them just
in this form.
Let 's have it, at once. I prefer a full broadside to your
minute-guns. What is my motive?
Simply that you, Sir Jarvy, say to a certain Sir
Gervaise
Oakes, Bart., Vice-Admiral of the Red, and Member
for Bowldero, in your own mind, `now, if I can just leave
that fellow, Dick Bluewater, behind me, with four or five
ships, he 'll never desert
me
, when in front of the enemy,
whatever he might do with
King George;
and so I 'll make
sure of him by placing the question in such a light that it
shall be one of friendship, rather than one of loyalty.'
Sir Gervaise coloured to the temples, for the other had
penetrated into his most secret thoughts; and, yet, spite of his
momentary vexation, he faced his accuser, and both laughed
in the heart-felt manner that the circumstance would be
likely to excite.
Hearkee, Dick, said the vice-admiral, as soon as he
could command sufficient gravity to speak; they made a
mistake when they sent you to sea; you ought to have
been apprenticed to a conjuror. I care not what you think
about it; my orders are given, and they must be obeyed.
Have you a clear perception of the plan?
One quite as clear, I tell you, as I have of the motive.
Enough of this, Bluewater; we have serious duties
before
us.
Sir Gervaise now entered more at length into his scheme;
explaining to his friend all his wishes and hopes, and letting
him know, with official minuteness, what was expected at
his hands. The rear-admiral listened with his accustomed
respect, whenever anything grave was in discussion between
them; and, had any one entered while they were thus
engaged, he would have seen in the manner of one, nothing
but the dignified frankness of a friendly superior, and in the
other the deference which the naval inferior usually pays to
rank. As he concluded Sir Gervaise rang his bell, and
desired the presence of Sir Wycherly Wychecombe.
I could have wished to remain and see this battle for
the succession fairly fought, he said; but a battle of a
different
Vol. II.  2.
sort calls us in another quarter. Show him in, he
added, as his man intimated that the young baronet was in
waiting.
What between the duties of our professional stations,
and those of the guest to the host, said the vice-admiral,
rising and bowing to the young man; it is not easy to
settle the question of etiquette between us, Sir Wycherly;
and I have, from habit, thought more of the admiral and the
lieutenant, than of the lord of the manor and his obliged
guests. If I have erred, you will excuse me.
My new situation is so very novel, that I still remain all
sailor, Sir Gervaise, answered the other, smiling; as
such I hope
you
will ever consider me. Can I be of any
service, here?
One of our cutters has just come in with news that will
take the fleet to sea, again, this morning; or, as soon as
the tide begins to run a strong ebb. The French are out,
and we must go and look for them. It was my intention
and my hope, to be able to take you to sea with me in the
Plantagenet. The date of your commission would not put
you very high among her lieutenants; but, Bunting deserves
a first lieutenantcy, and I meant to give it to him this
afternoon
,
in which case there would be a vacancy in the
situation
of my own signal-officer, a duty you could well perform.
As it is, you ought not to quit this house, and I must take
my leave of you with regret it is so.
Admiral Oakes, what is there that ought to keep one of
my station ashore, on the eve of a general battle? I
sincerely
hope and trust you will alter the last determination,
and return to the first.
You forget your own important interestsremember
that possession is nine points of the law.
We had heard the news below, and Sir Reginald, Mr.
Furlong, and myself, were discussing the matter when I
received your summons. These gentlemen tell me, that
possession can be held by deputy, as well as in person. I
am satisfied we can dispose of this objection.
Your grandfather's brother, and the late head of your
family, lies dead in this house; it is proper his successor
should be present at his funeral obsequies.
We thought of that, also. Sir Reginald has kindly
offered to appear in my place; and, then, there is the chance
that the meeting with Monsieur de Vervillin will take place
within the next eight-and-forty hours; whereas my uncle
cannot be interred certainly for a week or ten days.
I see you have well calculated all the chances, young
sir, said Sir Gervaise, smiling. Bluewater, how does
this matter strike you?
Leave it in my hands, and I will see to it. You will
sail near or quite twenty-four hours before me, and there
will be time for more reflection. Sir Wycherly can remain
with me in the Csar, in the action; or he can be thrown
aboard the Plantagenet, when we meet.
After a little reflection, Sir Gervaise, who liked to give
every one a fair chance, consented to the arrangement, and
it was decided that Wycherly should come out in the Csar,
if nothing occurred to render the step improper.
This arrangement completed, the vice-admiral declared
he was ready to quit the Hall. Galleygo and the other
servants had already made the dispositions necessary for
embarking, and it only remained to take leave of the
inmates
of the dwelling. The parting between the baronets
was friendly; for the common interest they felt in the
success
of Wycherly, had, in a degree, rendered them intimates,
and much disposed Sir Reginald to overlook the sailor's
well-known Whiggery. Dutton and the ladies took their
departure at the same time, and what passed between them
and Sir Gervaise on this occasion, took place on the road
to the head-land, whither all parties proceeded on foot.
A person so important as Sir Gervaise Oakes did not
leave the roof that had sheltered him, to embark on board
his own ship, without a due escort to the shore. Bluewater
accompanied him, in order to discuss any little point of
duty that might occur to the mind of either, at the last
moment
;
and Wycherly was of the group, partly from
professional
feeling, and more from a desire to be near Mildred.
Then there were Atwood, and the surgeons, Mr.
Rotherham
,
and two or three of the cabin attendants. Lord
Geoffrey, too, strolled along with the rest, though it was
understood that his own ship would not sail that day.
Just as the party issued from the gate of the park into
the street of the hamlet, a heavy gun was fired from the
fleet. It was soon succeeded by others, and whiffs and
cornets were seen flying from the mast-heads that rose above
the openings in the cliffs, the signal of recall for all boats.
This set every one in motion, and, never within the memory
of man, had Wychecombe presented such a scene of
confusion
and activity. Half-intoxicated seamen were driven
down to the boats, by youngsters with the cloth diamond in
their collars, like swine, who were reluctant to go, and yet
afraid to stay. Quarters of beeves were trundled along in
carts or barrows, and were soon seen swinging at different
main-stays; while the gathering of eggs, butter, poultry,
mutton, lamb, and veal, menaced the surrounding country
with a scarcity. Through this throng of the living and the
dead, our party held its way, jostled by the eager
countrymen
,
and respectfully avoided by all who belonged to the
fleet, until it reached the point where the roads to the cliffs
and the landing separated, when the vice-admiral turned to
the only midshipman present, and courteously lifting his hat,
as if reluctant to impose such a duty on a young
gentleman
on liberty, he said
Do me the favour, Lord Geoffrey, to step down to the
landing and ascertain if my barge is there. The officer of
the boat will find me at the signal-station.
The boy cheerfully complied; and this son of an English
duke, who, by the death of an elder brother, became in time
a duke himself, went on a service that among gentlemen of
the land would be deemed nearly menial, with as much
alacrity as if he felt honoured by the request. It was by a
training like this, that England came, in time, to possess a
marine that has achieved so many memorable deeds; since
it taught those who were destined to command, the high and
useful lesson how to obey.
While the midshipman was gone to look for the boat, the
two admirals walked the cliff, side by side, discussing their
future movements; and when all was ready, Sir Gervaise
descended to the shore, using the very path by which he
had ascended the previous day; and, pushing through the
throng that crowded the landing, almost too much engaged
to heed even his approach, he entered his barge. In another
minute, the measured strokes of the oars urged him swiftly
towards the Plantagenet.
CHAPTER II.
'T was not without some reason, for the wind
Increas'd at night, until it blew a gale;
And though 't was not much to a naval mind,
Some landsmen would have look'd a little pale,
For sailors are, in fact, a different kind:
At sunset they began to take in sail,
For the sky show'd it would come on to blow,
And carry away, perhaps, a mast or so.
Byron
.
As
it was just past the turn of the day, Bluewater
determined
to linger on the cliffs for several hours, or until it was
time to think of his dinner. Abstracted as his thoughts
were habitually, his mind found occupation and pleasure in
witnessing the evolutions that succeeded among the ships;
some of which evolutions it may be well now briefly to
relate
.
Sir Gervaise Oakes' foot had not been on the deck of the
Plantagenet five minutes, before a signal for all commanders
was flying at that vessel's mast-head. In ten minutes more
every captain of the fleet, with the exception of those
belonging
to the vessels in the offing, were in the flag-ship's cabin,
listening to the intentions and instructions of the
vice-admiral
.
My plan of sailing, gentlemen, is easily comprehended,
continued the commander-in-chief, after he had explained
his general intentions to chase and engage; and every
one of you will implicitly follow it. We have the tide strong
at ebb, and a good six-knot breeze is coming up at
south-west
.
I shall weigh, with my yards square, and keep them
so, until the ship has drawn out of the fleet, and then I shall
luff up on a taut bowline and on the starboard tack, bringing
the ebb well under my lee-bow. This will hawse the ship
over towards Morlaix, and bring us quite as far to
windward
2 *
as is desirable. While the ebb lasts, and this breeze
stands, we shall have plain sailing; the difficulty will come
on the flood, or with a shift of wind. The ships that come
out last must be careful to keep their seconds, ahead and
astern, in plain sight, and regulate their movements, as much
as they can, by the leading vessels. The object is to spread
as wide a clew as possible, while we hold the ships within
signal-distance of each other. Towards sunset I shall
shorten sail, and the line will close up within a league from
vessel to vessel, and I have told Bluewater to use his
discretion
about coming out with the last ships, though I have
requested him to hold on as long as he shall deem it
prudent
,
in the hope of receiving another express from the
Admiralty
.
When the flood makes, I do not intend to go
about, but shall continue on the starboard tack, and I wish
you all to do the same. This will bring the leading vessels
considerably to windward of those astern, and may possibly
throw the fleet into a bow and quarter line. Being in the
van, it will fall to my duty to look to this, and to watch for
the consequences. But I ask of you to keep an eye on the
weather, and to hold your ships within plain signal-distance
of each other. If it come on thick, or to blow very hard, we
must close, from van to rear, and try our luck, in a search
in compact order. Let the man who first sees the enemy
make himself heard at once, and send the news, with the
bearings of the French, both ahead and astern, as fast as
possible. In that case you will all close on the point from
which the intelligence comes; and, mark me, no cruising
to get to windward, in your own fashions, as if you sailed
with roving commissions. You know I 'll not stand
that
.
And now, gentlemen, it is probable that we shall all never
meet again. God bless you! Come and shake hands with
me, one by one, and then to your boats, for the first
lieutenant
has just sent Greenly word that we are up and down.
Let him trip, Greenly, and be off as soon as we can.
The leave-taking, a scene in which joyousness and
sadness
were strangely mingled, succeeded, and then the
captains
disappeared. From that moment every mind was bent
on sailing.
Although Bluewater did not witness the scene in the
Plantagenet's
cabin, he pictured it, in his mind's eye, and
remained
on the cliffs to watch the succeeding movements.
As Wycherly had disappeared in the house, and Dutton
clung to his flag-staff, the rear-admiral had no one but Lord
Geoffrey for a companion. The latter, perceiving that his
relation did not seem disposed to converse, had the tact to
be silent himself; a task that was less difficult than
common
,
on account of the interest he felt in the spectacle.
The boats of the different captains were still shoving off
from the starboard side of the Plantagenet, whither etiquette
had brought them together, in a little crowd, when her
three topsails fell, and their sheets steadily drew the clews
towards the ends of the lower yards. Even while this
was in process, the yards began to ascend, and rose with
that steady but graduated movement which marks the
operation
in a man-of-war. All three were fairly mast-headed
in two minutes. As the wind struck the canvass obliquely,
the sails filled as they opened their folds, and, by the time
their surfaces were flattened by distension, the Plantagenet
steadily moved from her late berth, advancing slowly
against a strong tide, out of the group of ships, among
which she had been anchored. This was a beautiful
evolution
,
resembling that of a sea-fowl, which lazily rises on
its element, spreads its wings, emerges from the water, and
glides away to some distant and unseen point.
The movement of the flag-ship was stately, measured,
and grand. For five minutes she held her way nearly due
east, with the wind on her starboard quarter, meeting the
tide in a direct line; until, having drawn sufficiently ahead
of the fleet, she let fall her courses, sheeted home
topgallant-sails
and royals, set her spanker, jibs and staysails, and
braced up sharp on a wind, with her head at
south-south-east
.
This brought the tide well under her lee fore-chains,
and set her rapidly off the land, and to windward. As she
trimmed her sails, and steadied her bowliness, she fired a
gun, made the numbers of the vessels in the offing to weigh,
and to pass within hail. All this did Bluewater note, with
the attention of an
amateur
, as well as with the critical
analysis of a
connoisseur
.
Very handsomely done, Master Geoffreyvery
handsomely
done, it must be allowed! never did a bird quit a
flock with less fuss, or more beautifully, than the
Plantagenet
has drawn out of the fleet. It must be admitted that
Greenly knows how to handle his ship.
I fancy Captain Stowel would have done quite as well
with the Csar, sir, answered the boy, with a proper
esprit-de-
ship
. Don't you remember, Admiral Bluewater,
the time when we got under way off l'Orient, with the wind
blowing a gale directly on shore? Even Sir Gervaise said,
afterwards, that we lost less ground than any ship in the
fleet, and yet the Plantagenet is the most weatherly
two-decker
in the navy; as everybody says.
Everybody!She is certainly a weatherly vessel, but
not more so than several others. Whom did you ever hear
give that character to this particular ship?
Why, sir, her reefers are always bragging as much as
that;
and a great deal
more
, too.
Her reefers!Young gentlemen are particularly struck
with the charms of their first loves, both ashore and afloat,
my boy. Did you ever hear an
old seaman
say that much
for the Plantagenet?
I think I have, sir, returned Lord Geoffrey, blushing.
Galleygo, Sir Gervaise's steward, is commonly repeating
some such stuff, or other. They are furious braggarts, the
Plantagenet's, all round, sir.
That comes honestly, answered Bluewater, smiling,
her namesakes and predecessors of old, having some
such characteristic, too. Look at that ship's yards, boy,
and learn how to trim a vessel's sails on a wind. The
pencil
of a painter could not draw lines more accurate!
Captain Stowel tells us, sir, that the yards ought not to
be braced in exactly alike; but that we ought to check the
weather-braces, a little, as we go aloft, so that the topsail
yard should point a little less forward than the lower yard,
and the topgallant than the topsail.
You are quite right in taking Stowel's opinion in all
such matters, Geoffrey: but has not Captain Greenly done
the same thing in the Plantagenet? When I speak of
symmetry
,
I mean the symmetry of a seaman.
The boy was silenced, though exceedingly reluctant to
admit that any ship could equal his own. In the meantime,
there was every appearance of a change in the weather.
Just about the time the Plantagenet braced up, the wind
freshened, and in ten minutes it blew a stiff breeze. Some
time before the admiral spoke the vessels outside, he was
compelled to take in all his light canvass; and when he
filled, again, after giving his orders to the frigate and sloop,
the topgallant sheets were let fly, a single reef was taken
in the topsails, and the lighter sails were set over them.
This change in the weather, more especially as the night
threatened to be clouded, if not absolutely dark, would
necessarily
bring about a corresponding change in the plan
of sailing, reducing the intervals between the departures of
the vessels, quite one-half. To such vicissitudes are all
maritime operations liable, and it is fortunate when there is
sufficient capacity in the leaders to remedy them.
In less than an hour, the Plantagenet's hull began to
sink, to those on a level with it, when the Carnatic tripped
her anchor, opened her canvass, shot out of the fleet, hauled
by the wind, and followed in the admiral's wake. So
accurate
was the course she steered, that, half an hour after she
had braced up, a hawse-bucket, which had been dropped
from the Plantagenet in hauling water, was picked up.
We may add, here, though it will be a little anticipating
events, that the Thunderer followed the Carnatic; the
Blenheim
the Thunderer; the Achilles the Blenheim; the
Warspite
the Achilles; the Dover the Warspite; the York the
Dover; the Elizabeth the York; the Dublin the Elizabeth;
and the Csar the Dublin. But hours passed before all
these ships were in motion, and hours in which we shall
have some occurrences to relate that took place on shore.
Still it will aid the reader in better understanding the
future
incidents of our tale, if we describe, at once, some of
the circumstances under which all these ships got in
motion
.
By the time the Plantagenet's topsails were beginning to
dip from the cliffs, the Carnatic, the Thunderer, the
Blenheim
,
the Achilles, and the Warspite were all stretching out
in line, with intervals of quite two leagues between them,
under as much canvass as they could now bear. The
admiral
had shortened sail the most, and was evidently
allowing
the Carnatic to close, most probably on account of the
threatening look of the sky, to windward; while he was
suffering the frigate and sloop, the Chloe and Driver, to pass
ahead of him, the one on his weather, and the other on his
lee bow. When the Dover weighed, the admiral's upper
sail was not visible from her tops, though the Warspite's
hull had not yet disappeared from her deck. She left the
fleet, or the portions of it that still remained at anchor, with
her fore-course set, and hauled by the wind, under
double-reefed
topsails, a single reef in her mainsail, and with her
main-topgallant sail set over its proper sail. With this
reduced
canvass, she started away on the track of her
consorts
,
the brine foaming under her bows, and with a heel
that denoted the heavy pressure that bore on her sails. By
this time, the York was aweigh, the tide had turned, and it
became necessary to fill on the other tack in order to clear
the land to the eastward. This altered the formation, but
we will now revert to the events as they transpired on the
shore, with a view to relate them more in their regular
order.
It is scarcely necessary to say that Bluewater must have
remained on, or about the cliffs several hours, in order to
witness the departure of so many of the vessels. Instead
of returning to the Hall at the dinner hour, agreeably to
promise, he profited by the appearance of Wycherly, who
left the cottage with a flushed, agitated manner, just as he
was thinking of the necessity of sending a message to Sir
Reginald, and begged the young man to be the bearer of
his excuses. He thought that the change in the weather
rendered it necessary for him to remain in sight of the sea.
Dutton overheard this message, and, after a private
conference
with his wife, he ventured to invite his superior to
appease his appetite under his own humble roof. To this
Bluewater cheerfully assented; and when the summons
came to the table, to his great joy he found that his only
companion was to be Mildred, who, like himself, for some
reason known only to her own bosom, had let the ordinary
dining hour pass without appearing at table, but whom her
mother had now directed to take some sustenance.
The late events at the Hall have agitated the poor child,
sir, said Mrs. Dutton, in the way of apology, and she
has not tasted food since morning. I have told her you
would excuse the intrusion, and receive her carving and
attentions
as an excuse for her company.
Bluewater looked at the pallid countenance of the girl,
and never before had he found the resemblance to Agnes
Hedworth so strong, as that moment. The last year or
two of his own sweet friend's life had been far from happy,
and the languid look and tearful eyes of Mildred revived the
recollection of the dead, with painful distinctness.
Good God! he murmured to himself; That two
such beings should exist only to suffer! my good Mrs.
Dutton
,
make no excuses; but believe me when I say that you
could not have found in England another that would have
proved as welcome as my present little messmate.
Mildred struggled for a smile; and she did succeed in
looking extremely grateful. Beyond this, however, it
exceeded
her powers to go. Mrs. Dutton was gratified, and
soon left the two to partake of their neat, but simple meal,
by themselves; household duties requiring her presence
elsewhere.
Let me persuade you to take a glass of this really
excellent
port, my child, said Bluewater. If you had
cruised as long as I have done, on the coast of Portugal,
you would know how to value a liquor as pure as this. I
don't know of an admiral that has as good!
It is probably
our
last, sir, answered Mildred, shaking
a tear from each of her long dark lashes, by an
involuntarily
trembling motion, as she spoke. It was a present
from dear, old, Sir Wycherly, who never left my mother
wholly unsupplied with such plain delicacies, as he fancied
poverty placed beyond our reach. The wine we can easily
forget; not so easily the donor.
Bluewater felt as if he could draw a cheque for one-half
the fortune he had devised to his companion; and, yet, by
a caprice of feeling that is not uncommon to persons of the
liveliest susceptibility, he answered in a way to smother his
own emotion.
There will not soon be another
old
Sir Wycherly to
make his neighbours comfortable; but there is a
young
one,
who is not likely to forget his uncle's good example. I
hope you all, here, rejoice at the sudden rise in fortune, that
has so unexpectedly been placed within the reach of our
favourite lieutenant?
A look of anguish passed over Mildred's face, and her
companion noted it; though surprise and pitynot to say
resentmentprevented his betraying his discovery.
We
endeavour
to be glad, sir, answered Mildred,
smiling
in so suffering a manner, as to awaken all her
companion's
sympathies; but it is not easy for us to rejoice
at any thing which is gained by the loss of our former,
valued friend.'
I am aware that a young fellow, like the present Sir
Wycherly, can be no substitute for an old fellow like the last
Sir Wycherly, my dear; but as one is a sailor, and the
other was only a landsman, my professional prejudices may
not consider the disparity as great as it may possibly appear
to be to your less partial judgment.
Bluewater thought the glance he received was imploring,
and he instantly regretted that he had taken such means to
divert his companion's sadness. Some consciousness of
this regret probably passed through Mildred's mind, for she
rallied her spirits, and made a partially successful effort to
be a more agreeable companion.
My father thinks, sir, she said, that our late pleasant
weather is about to desert us, and that it is likely to blow
heavily before six-and-thirty hours are over.
I am afraid Mr. Dutton will prove to be too accurate an
almanac. The weather has a breeding look, and I expect
a dirty night. Good or bad, we seamen must face it, and
that, too, in the narrow seas, where gales of wind are no
gales of Araby.
Ah, sir, it is a terrible life to lead! By living on this
cliff, I have learned to pity sailors.
Perhaps, my child, you pity us when we are the most
happy. Nine seamen in ten prefer a respectable gale to a
flat calm. There are moments when the ocean is terrific;
but, on the whole, it is capricious, rather than malignant.
The night that is before us promises to be just such a one
as Sir Gervaise Oakes delights in. He is never happier
than when he hears a gale howling through the cordage of
his ship.
I have heard him spoken of as a very daring and
self-relying
commander. But
you
cannot entertain such feelings,
Admiral Bluewater; for to me you seem better fitted for a
fireside, well filled with friends and relatives, than for the
conflicts and hardships of the sea.
Mildred had no difficulty now in forcing a smile, for the
sweet one she bestowed on the veteran almost tempted him
to rise and fold her in his arms, as a parent would wrap a
beloved daughter to his heart. Discretion, however,
prevented
a betrayal of feelings that might have been
misinterpreted
,
and he answered in his original vein.
I fear I am a wolf in sheep's clothing, he said; while
Oakes admits the happiness he feels in seeing his ship
ploughing through a raging sea, in a dark night, he
maintains
that my rapture is sought in a hurricane. I do not
plead guilty to the accusation, but I will allow there is a
sort of fierce delight in participating, as it might be, in a
wild strife of the elements. To me, my very nature seems
changed at such moments, and I forget all that is mild and
gentle. That comes of having lived so much estranged from
your sex, my dear; desolate bachelor, as I am.
Do you think sailors ought to marry? asked Mildred,
with a steadiness that surprised herself; for, while she put
the question, consciousness brought the blood to her temples.
I should be sorry to condemn a whole profession, and
that one I so well love, to the hopeless misery of single life.
There are miseries peculiar to the wedded lives of both
soldiers
and sailors; but are there not miseries peculiar to those
who never separate? I have heard seamen saymen, too,
who loved their wives and familiesthat they believed the
extreme pleasure of meetings after long separations, the
delights
of hope, and the zest of excited feelings, have rendered
their years of active service more replete with agreeable
sensations, than the stagnant periods of peace. Never
having
been married myself, I can only speak on report.
Ah! this may be so with
men;
butsurelysurely
women
never can feel thus!
I suppose, a sailor's daughter yourself, you know Jack's
account of his wife's domestic creed! `A good fire, a clean
hearth, the children abed, and the husband at sea,' is
supposed
to be the climax of felicity.
This may do for the sailor's jokes, Admiral Bluewater,
Vol. II.  3
answered Mildred, smiling; but it will hardly ease a
breaking heart. I fear, from all I have heard this afternoon,
and from the sudden sailing of the ships, that a great battle
is at hand?
And why should you, a British officer's daughter, dread
that? Have you so little faith in us, as to suppose a battle
will necessarily bring defeat! I have seen much of my
own profession, Miss Dutton, and trust I am in some small
degree above the rhodomontade of the braggarts; but it is
not
usual for us to meet the enemy, and to give those on
shore reason to be ashamed of the English flag. It has
never yet been my luck to meet a Frenchman who did not
manifest a manly desire to do his country credit; and I have
always felt that we must fight hard for him before we could
get him; nor has the result ever disappointed me. Still,
fortune, or skill, or
right
, is commonly of our side, and has
given us the advantage in the end.
And to which, sir, do you ascribe a success at sea, so
very uniform?
As a Protestant, I ought to say to our
religion;
but,
this my own knowledge of Protestant
vices
rejects. Then
to say
fortune
would be an exceeding self-abasementone,
that between us, is not needed; and I believe I must impute
it to skill. As plain seamen, I do believe we are more
expert than most of our neighbours; though I am far from
being positive we have any great advantage over them in
tactics. If any, the Dutch are our equals.
Notwithstanding, you are quite certain of success. It
must be a great encouragement to enter into the fight with
a strong confidence in victory! I supposethat is, it seems
to meit is a matter of course, sir,that our new Sir
Wycherly
will not be able to join in the battle, this time?
Mildred spoke timidly, and she endeavoured to seem
unconcerned
;
but Bluewater read her whole heart, and pitied
the pain which she had inflicted on herself, in asking the
question. It struck him, too, that a girl of his companion's
delicacy and sensibility would not thus advert to the young
man's movements at all, if the latter had done aught justly
to awaken censure; and this conviction greatly relieved his
mind as to the effect of sudden elevation on the handsome
lieutenant. As it was necessary to answer, however, lest
Mildred might detect his consciousness of her feelings, not
a moment was lost before making a reply.
It is not an easy matter to prevent a young, dashing
sailor, like this Sir Wycherly Wychecombe, from doing his
part in a general engagement, and that, too, of the character
of the one to which we are looking forward, he said.
Oakes has left the matter in my hands; I suppose I shall
have to grant the young man's request.
He has then requested to be received in your ship?
asked Mildred, her hand shaking as she used the spoon it
held.
That of course. No one who wears the uniform could
or would do less. It seems a ticklish moment for him to
quit Wychecombe, too; where I fancy he will have a battle of
his own to fight ere long; but professional feeling will
over-shadow
all others, in young men. Among us seamen, it is
said to be even stronger than love.
Mildred made no answer; but her pale cheek and
quivering
lips, evidences of feeling that her artlessness did not
enable her to conceal, caused Bluewater again to regret the
remark. With a view to restore the poor girl to her
self-command
,
he changed the subject of conversation, which did
not again advert to Wycherly. The remainder of the meal
was consequently eaten in peace, the admiral manifesting to
the last, however, the sudden and generous interest he had
taken in the character and welfare of his companion. When
they rose from table, Mildred joined her mother, and
Bluewater
walked out upon the cliffs again.
It was now evening, and the waste of water that lay
stretched before the eye, though the softness of summer was
shed upon it, had the wild and dreary aspect that the winds
and waves lend to a view, as the light of day is about to
abandon the ocean to the gloom of night. All this had no
effect on Bluewater, however, who knew that two-decked
ships, strongly manned, with their heavy canvass reduced,
would make light work of worrying through hours of
darkness
that menaced no more than these. Still the wind had
freshened, and when he stood on the verge of the cliff,
sustained
by the breeze, which pressed him back from the
precipice
,
rendering his head more steady, and his footing sure,
the Elizabeth was casting, under close-reefed topsails, and
two reefs in her courses, with a heavy staysail or two, to
ease her helm. He saw that the ponderous machine would
stagger under even this short canvass, and that her captain
had made his dispositions for a windy night. The lights
that the Dover and the York carried in their tops were just
beginning to be visible in the gathering gloom, the last
about a league and a half down channel, the ship standing
in that direction to get to windward, and the former, more
to the southward, the vessel having already tacked to follow
the admiral. A chain of lights connected the whole of the
long line, and placed the means of communication in the
power of the captains. At this moment, the Plantagenet
was fully fifty miles at sea, ploughing through a heavy
south-west swell, which the wind was driving into the chops
of the channel, from the direction of the Bay of Biscay,
and the broad Atlantic.
Bluewater buttoned his coat, and he felt his frame
invigorated
by a gale that came over his person, loaded with the
peculiar flavour of the sea. But two of the heavy ships
remained at their anchors, the Dublin and the Csar; and
his experienced eye could see that Stowel had every thing
on board the latter ready to trip and be off, as soon as he,
himself, should give the order. At this moment the
midshipman
,
who had been absent for hours, returned, and
stood again at his side.
Our turn will soon come, sir, said the gallant boy,
and, for one, I shall not be sorry to be in motion. Them
chaps on board the Plantagenet will swagger like so many
Dons, if they should happen to get a broadside at Monsieur
de Vervillin, while we are lying here, under the shore, like
a gentleman's yacht hauled into a bay, that the ladies might
eat without disturbing their stomachs.
Little fear of that, Geoffrey. The Active is too light
of foot, especially in the weather we have had, to suffer
heavy ships to be so close on her heels. She must have had
some fifteen or twenty miles the start, and the French have
been compelled to double Cape la Hogue and Alderney,
before
they could even look this way. If coming down
channel
at all, they are fully fifty miles to the eastward; and,
should our van stretch far enough by morning to head them
off, it will bring us handsomely to windward. Sir Gervaise
never set a better trap, than he has done this very day.
The Elizabeth has her hands full, boy, and the wind seems
to be getting scant for her. If it knock her off much more,
it will bring the flood on her weather-bow, and compel her
to tack. This will throw the rear of our line into
confusion
!
What should we do, sir, in such a case? It would never
answer to leave poor Sir Jarvy out there, by himself!
We would try not to do
that!
returned Bluewater,
smiling at the affectionate solicitude of the lad, a solicitude
that caused him slightly to forget his habitual respect for
the commander-in-chief, and to adopt the
sobriquet
of the
fleet. In such a case, it would become my duty to collect
as many ships as I could, and to make the best of our way
towards the place where we might hope to fall in with the
others, in the morning. There is little danger of losing
each other, for any length of time, in these narrow waters,
and I have few apprehensions of the French being far
enough west, to fall in with our leading vessels before
morning. If they
should
, indeed, Geoffrey
Ay, sir, if they
should
, I know well enough what
would come to pass!
What, boy?  On the supposition that Monsieur de
Vervillin
did
meet with Sir Gervaise by day-break, what,
in your experienced eyes, seem most likely to be the
consequences
?
Why, sir, Sir Jarvey would go at 'em, like a dolphin
at a flying-fish; and if he
should
really happen to catch
one or two of 'em, there'd be no sailing in company with the
Plantagenet's, for us Csar's!When we had the last 'bout
with Monsieur de Gravelin, they were as saucy as peacocks,
because we didn't close until their fore-yard and
mizzen-topgallant-mast
were gone, although the shift of wind
brought us dead to leeward, and, after all, we had eleven
men the most hurt in the fight. You don't know them
Plantagenet's, sir; for they never
dare
say any thing before
you!
Nor to the discredit of my young Csars, I 'll answer
for it. Yet, you 'll remember Sir Gervaise gave us full
credit, in his despatches.
3 *
Yes sir, all very true. Sir Gervaise knows better;
and then
he
understands what the Csar
is;
and what she
can
do, and
has
done. But it 's a very different matter with
his youngsters, who fancy because they carry a red flag at
the fore, they are so many Blakes and Howards, themselves.
There 's Jack Oldcastle, now; he 's always talking of our
reefers as if there was no sea-blood in our veins, and that
just because his own father happened to be a captaina
commodore
, he says, because he happened once to have
three frigates under his orders.
Well, that would make a commodore, for the time being.
But, surely he does not claim privilege for the Oldcastle
blood, over that of the Clevelands!
No, sir, it isn't that sort of thing, at all, returned the
fine boy, blushing a little, in spite of his contempt for any
such womanly weakness; you know we never talk of that
nonsense in our squadron. With us it 's all service, and
that sort of thing. Jack Oldcastle says the Clevelands are
all civilians, as he calls 'em; or
soldiers
, which isn't much
better, as you know, sir. Now, I tell him that there is an
old picture of one of 'em, with an anchor-button, and that
was long before Queen Anne's timeQueen Elizabeth's,
perhaps,and then you know, sir, I fetch him up with a
yarn about the Hedworths; for I am just as much Hedworth
as Cleveland.
And what does the impudent dog say to that, Geoffrey?
Why, sir, he says the name should be spelt Head
work
,
and that they were all
lawyers
. But I gave him as good as
he sent for that saucy speech, I 'm certain!
And what did you give him, in return for such a
compliment
?
Did you tell him the Oldcastles were just so much
stone, and wood, and old iron; and that, too, in a
tumble-down
condition?
No, sir, not I, answered the boy, laughing; I didn't
think of any answer half so clever; and so I just gave him
a dig in the nose, and that, laid on with right go will.
And how did he receive that argument? Was it
conclusive
;or
did the debate continue?
Oh, of course, sir, we fought it out. 'T was on board
the Dover, and the first lieutenant saw fair play. Jack
carried too many guns for me, sir, for he 's more than a
year older; but I hulled him so often that he owned it was
harder work than being mast-headed. After that the Dover's
chaps took my part, and they said the Hedworths had no
Head
work
at all, but they were regular sailors; admirals,
and captains, and youngsters, you know, sir, like all the
rest of us. I told 'em my grandfather Hedworth was an
admiral, and a good one, too.
In that you made a small mistake. Your mother's
father was only a
general;
but
his
father was a full admiral
of the red,for he lived before that grade was abolished
and as good an officer as ever trod a plank. He was my
mother's brother, and both Sir Gervaise and myself served
long under his orders. He was a sailor of whom you well
might boast.
I don't think any of the Plantagenets will chase in that
quarter again, sir; for we 've had an overhauling among
our chaps, and we find we can muster four admirals, two
commodores, and thirteen captains in our two messes; that
is, counting all sorts of relatives, you know, sir.
Well, my dear boy, I hope you may live to reckon all
that and more too, in your own persons, at some future day.
Yonder is Sir Reginald Wychecombe, coming this way, to
my surprise, and perhaps he wishes to see me alone. Go
down to the landing and ascertain if my barge is ashore,
and let me know it, as soon as is convenient. Remember,
Geoffrey, you will go off with me; and hunt up Sir
Wycherly
Wychecombe, who will lose his passage, unless ready
the instant he is wanted.
The boy touched his cap, and went bounding down the
hill to execute the order.
CHAPTER III.
So glozed the Tempter, and his poison tuned;
Into the heart of Eve his words made way,
Though at the voice much marvelling.
Milton
.
It
was, probably, a species of presentiment, that induced
Bluewater to send away the midshipman, when he saw the
adherent of the dethroned house approaching. Enough had
passed between the parties to satisfy each of the secret bias
of the other; and, by that sort of free-masonry which
generally
accompanies strong feelings of partisanship, the admiral
felt persuaded that the approaching interview was about to
relate to the political troubles of the day.
The season and the hour, and the spot, too, were all
poetically
favourable to an interview between conspirators. It
was now nearly dark; the head-land was deserted, Dutton
having retired, first to his bottle, and then to his bed; the
wind blew heavily athwart the bleak eminence, or was heard
scuffling in the caverns of the cliffs, while the portentous
clouds that drove through the air, now veiled entirely, and
now partially and dimly revealed the light of the moon, in
a way to render the scene both exciting and wild. No
wonder, then, that Bluewater, his visiter drawing near, felt
a stronger disposition than had ever yet come over him to
listen to the tale of the tempter, as, under all the
circumstances
,
it would scarcely exceed the bounds of justice to
call Sir Reginald.
In seeking you at such a spot, and in the midst of this
wild landscape, said the latter, I might have been assured
I should be certain of finding one who really loved the sea
and your noble profession. The Hall is a melancholy
house, just at this moment; and when I inquired for you,
no one could say whither you had strolled. In following
what I thought a seaman's instinct, it appears that I did
well.Do my eyes fail me, or are there no more than three
vessels at anchor yonder?
Your eyes are still good, Sir Reginald; Admiral Oakes
sailed several hours since, and he has been followed by all
the fleet, with the exception of the two line-of-battle ships,
and the frigate you see; leaving me to be the last to quit
the anchorage.
Is it a secret of state, or are you permitted to say
whither so strong a force has so suddenly sailed? demanded
the baronet, glancing his dark eye so expressively towards
the other as to give him, in the growing obscurity, the
appearance
of an inquisitor. I had been told the fleet would
wait for orders from London?
Such was the first intention of the commander-in-chief;
but intelligence of the sailing of the Comte de Vervillin has
induced Sir Gervaise to change his mind. An English
admiral seldom errs when he seeks and beats an active and
dangerous enemy.
Is this always true, Admiral Bluewater? returned Sir
Reginald, dropping in at the side of the other, and joining
in his walk, as he paced, to and fro, a short path that Dutton
called his own quarter-deck; or is it merely an
unmeaning
generality that sometimes causes men to become the
dupes of their own imaginations. Are those
always
our
enemies who may seem to be so? or, are we so infallible
that every feeling or prejudice may be safely set down as an
impulse to which we ought to submit, without questioning
its authority?
Do you esteem it a prejudice to view France as the
natural enemy of England, Sir Reginald?
By heaven, I do, sir! I can conceive that England
may be much more her own enemy than France has ever
proved to be. Then, conceding that ages of warfare have
contributed to awaken some such feeling as this you hint at,
is there not a question of right and wrong that lies behind
all. Reflect how often England has invaded the French
soil, and what serious injuries she has committed on the
territory of the latter, while France has so little wronged us,
in the same way; how, even her throne has been occupied
by our princes, and her provinces possessed by our armies.
I think you hardly allow for all the equity of the
different
cases. Parts of what is now France, were the just
inheritance of those who have sat on the English throne, and
the quarrels were no more than the usual difficulties of
neighbourhood. When our claims were just in themselves,
you surely could not have wished to see them abandoned.
Far from it; but when claims were disputed, is it not
natural for the loser to view them as a hardship. I believe
we should have had a much better neighbourhood, as you
call it, with France, had not the modern difficulties
connected
with religious changes, occurred.
I presume you know, Sir Reginald, that I, and all my
family, are Protestants.
I do, Admiral Bluewater; and I rejoice to find that a
difference of opinion on this great interest does not
necessarily
produce one on all others. From several little allusions
that have passed between us to-day, I am encouraged to
believe that we think alike on certain temporal matters,
however wide the chasm between us on spiritual things.
I confess I have fallen into the same conclusion; and
I should be sorry to be undeceived if wrong.
What occasion, then, for farther ambiguity? Surely
two honourable men may safely trust each other with their
common sentiments, when the times call for decision and
frankness! I am a Jacobite, Admiral Bluewater; if I risk
life or fortune by making the avowal, I place both, without
reserve, at your mercy.
They could not be in safer hands, sir; and I know no
better mode of giving you every possible assurance that the
confidence will not be abused, than by telling you in return,
that I would cheerfully lay down my life could the sacrifice
restore the deposed family to the throne.
This is noble, and manly, and frank, as I had hoped
from a sailor! exclaimed Sir Reginald, more delighted than
he well knew how to express at the moment. This simple
assurance from your lips, carries more weight than all the
oaths and pledges of vulgar conspiracy. We understand
each other, and I should be truly sorry to inspire less
confidence
than I feel.
What better proof can I give you of the reliance placed
on your faith, than the declaration you have heard, Sir
Reginald
?
My head would answer for your treachery in a
week; but I have never felt it more securely on my
shoulders
than at this moment.
The baronet grasped the other's hand, and each gave and
received a pressure that was full of meaning. Then both
walked on, thoughtful and relieved, for quite a minute, in
profound silence.
This sudden appearance of the prince in Scotland has
taken us all a little by surprise, Sir Reginald resumed, after
the pause; though a few of us knew that his intentions led
him this way. Perhaps he has done well to come
unattended
by a foreign force, and to throw himself, as it might
be singly, into the arms of his subjects; trusting everything
to their generosity, loyalty, and courage. Some blame
him; but I do not. He will awaken interest, now, in every
generous heart in the nation,this was artfully adapted to
the character of the listener;whereas, some might feel
disposed to be lukewarm under a less manly appeal to their
affections and loyalty. In Scotland, we learn from all
directions
that His Royal Highness is doing wonders, while
the friends of his house are full of activity in England,
though compelled, for a time, to be watchful and prudent.
I rejoice, from the bottom of my heart, to hear this!
said Bluewater, drawing a long breath, like one whose mind
was unexpectedly relieved from a heavy load. From the
bottom of my heart, do I rejoice! I had my apprehensions
that the sudden appearance of the prince might find his
well-wishers
unprepared, and timid through surprise.
As far from that as possible, my dear sir; though much
still depends on the promptitude and resolution of the master
spirits of the party. We are strong enough to control the
nation, if we can bring those forward who have the strength
to lead and control ourselves. All we now want are some
hundred or two of prominent men to step out of their
diffidence
and show us the way to honourable achievement and
certain success.
Can such men be wanting, at a moment like this?
I think we are secure of most of the high nobility,
though their great risks render them all a little wary in the
outset. It is among the professional menthe gallant
soldiers
,
and the bold, ardent seamen of the fleet, that we must
look for the first demonstrations of loyalty and true
patriotism
.
To be honest with you, sir, I tire of being ruled by a
German.
Do you know of any intention to rally a force in this
part of England, Sir Reginald? If so, say but the word
point out the spot where the standard is to be raised, and I
will rally under it, the instant circumstances will permit!
This is just what I expected, Mr. Bluewater, answered
the baronet, more gratified than he thought it prudent to
express; though it is not exactly the
form
in which you
can best serve us at this precise moment. Cut off from the
north, as we are in this part of the island, by all the
resources
of the actual government, it would be the height of
imprudence in us to show our hands, until all the cards are
ready to be played. Active and confidential agents are at
work in the army; London has its proper share of business
men, while others are in the counties, doing their best to
put things in a shape for the consummation we so anxiously
look for. I have been with several of our friends in this
vicinity, to bring matters into a combined state; and it was
my intention to visit this very estate, to see what my own
name might do with the tenantry, had not the late Sir
Wycherly
summoned me as he did, to attend his death-bed.
Have you any clue to the feelings of this new and young
head of my family, the sea-lieutenant and present baronet?
Not a very plain one, sir, though I doubt if they be
favourable to the House of Stuart.
I feared as much; this very evening I have had an
anonymous communication that I think must come from his
competitor, pretty plainly intimating that, by asserting
his
rights, as they are called, the whole Wychecombe tenantry
and interest could be united, in the present struggle, on
whichever side I might desire to see them.
This is a bold and decided stroke, truly! May I
inquire
as to your answer, Sir Reginald?
I shall give none. Under all circumstances I will ever
refuse to place a bastard in the seat of a legitimate
descendant
of my family. We contend for legal and natural rights,
my dear admiral, and the means employed should not be
unworthy of the end. Besides, I know the scoundrel to be
unworthy of trust, and shall not have the weakness to put
myself in his power. I could wish the other boy to be of
another mind; but, by getting him off to sea, whither he
tells me he is bound, we shall at least send him out of
harm's way.
In all this Sir Reginald was perfectly sincere; for, while
he did not always hesitate about the employment of means,
in matters of politics, he was rigidly honest in everything
that related to private property; a species of moral
contradiction
that is sometimes found among men who aim at the
management of human affairs; since those often yield to a
besetting weakness who are nearly irreproachable in other
matters. Bluewater was glad to hear this declaration; his
own simplicity of character inducing him to fancy it was an
indication to the general probity of his companion.
Yes, observed the latter, in all cases, we must
maintain
the laws of the land, in an affair of private right. This
young man is not capable, perhaps, of forming a just
estimate
of his political duties, in a crisis like this, and it may
be well, truly, to get him off to sea, lest by taking the losing
side, he endanger his estate before he is fairly possessed of
it. And having now disposed of Sir Wycherly, what can
I do most to aid the righteous and glorious cause?
This is coming to the point manfully, Sir RichardI
beg pardon for thus styling you, but I happen to know that
your name has been before the prince, for some time, as one
of those who are to receive the riband from a sovereign
really
authorized
to bestow it; if I have spoken a little
prematurely
,
I again entreat your pardon;but, this is at once
coming manfully to the point! Serve us you can, of course,
and that most effectually, and in an all-important manner.
I now greatly regret that my father had not put me in the
army, in my youth, that I might serve my prince as I could
wish, in this perilous trial. But we have many friends
accustomed
to arms, and among them your own honourable
name will appear conspicuous as to the past, and encouraging
as to the future.
I have carried arms from boyhood, it is true, Sir
Reginald
,
but it is in a service that will scarcely much avail us
in this warfare. Prince Edward has no ships, nor do I
know he will need any.
True, my dear sir, but King George has! As for the
necessity, permit me to say you are mistaken; it will soon
be all-important to keep open the communication with the
Vol. II.  4
continent. No doubt, Monsieur de Vervillin is out, with
some such object, already.
Bluewater started, and he recoiled from the firm grasp
which the other took of his arm, in the earnestness of
discourse
,
with some such instinctive aversion as a man recoils
from the touch of the reptile. The thought of a treachery
like that implied in the remark of his companion had never
occurred to him, and his honest mind turned with a strong
disrelish, from even the implied proposition of the other.
Still, he was not quite certain how far Sir Reginald wished
to urge him, and he felt it just to ascertain his real views
before he answered them. Plausible as this appeared, it
was a dangerous delay for one so simple-minded, when
brought in contact with a person as practised as the baronet;
Sir Reginald having the tact to perceive that his new friend's
feelings had already taken the alarm, and at once
determining
to be more wary.
What am I to understand by this, Sir Reginald
Wychecombe
?
demanded the rear-admiral. In what manner
can I possibly be connected with the naval resources of the
House of Hanover, when it is my intention to throw off its
service. King George's fleets will hardly aid the Stuarts;
and they will, at least, obey the orders of their own officers.
Not the least doubt in the world of this, Admiral
Bluewater
!
What a glorious privilege it was for Monk to have
it in his power to put his liege sovereign in his rightful seat,
and thus to save the empire, by a
coup de main
, from the
pains and grievances of a civil contest! Of all the glorious
names in English history, I esteem that of George Monk as
the one most to be envied! It is a great thing to be a prince
one born to be set apart as God's substitute on earth, in all
that relates to human justice and human power;and yet
it is greater, in my eyes, to be the subject to
restore
the
order of these almost divine successions, when once deranged
by lawless and presuming men.
This is true enough, sir; though I would rather have
joined Charles on the beach at Dover, armed only with an
untainted sword, than followed by an army at my heels!
What, when that army followed
cheerfully
, and was
equally eager with yourself to serve their sovereign!
That, indeed, might somewhat qualify the feeling. But
soldiers and sailors are usually influenced by the opinions
of those who have been placed in command over them by
the higher authorities.
No doubt they are; and that is as it should be. We
are encouraged to believe that some ten or fifteen captains
are already well-disposed towards us, and will cheerfully
take their respective ships to the points our wants require,
the moment they feel assured of being properly led, when
collected. By a little timely concert, we can command the
North Sea, and keep open important communications with
the continent. It is known the ministry intend to employ
as many German troops as they can assemble, and a naval
force will be all-important in keeping these mustachoed
foreigners at a distance. The quarrel is purely English,
sir, and ought to be decided by Englishmen only.
In that, indeed, I fully concur, Sir Reginald, answered
Bluewater, breathing more freely. I would cruise a whole
winter in the North Sea to keep the Dutchmen at home, and
let Englishmen decide who was to be England's king. To
me, foreign interference, in such a matter, is the next evil
to positive disloyalty to my rightful prince.
These are exactly my sentiments, dear sir, and I hope
to see you act on them. By the way, how happens it you
are left alone, and in what manner do you admirals divide
your authority when serving in company?
I do not know I comprehend your question, Sir
Reginald
.
I am left here to sail the last with the Csar; Sir
Gervaise leading out in the Plantagenet, with a view to
draw a line across the channel that shall effectually prevent
de Vervillin from getting to the westward.
To the
westward!
repeated the other, smiling
ironically
,
though the darkness prevented the admiral from
seeing
the expression of his features. Does Admiral Oakes
then think that the French ships are steering in
that
direction
?
Such is our information; have you any reason to
suppose
that the enemy intend differently?
The baronet paused, and he appeared to ruminate.
Enough had already passed to satisfy him he had not an
ordinary mind in that of his companion to deal with, and he
was slightly at a loss how to answer. To bring the other
within his lures, he was fully resolved; and the spirits that
aid the designing just at that moment suggested the plan
which, of all others, was most likely to be successful.
Bluewater
had betrayed his aversion to the interference of foreign
troops in the quarrel, and on this subject he intended to
strike a chord which he rightly fancied would thrill on the
rear-admiral's feelings.
We have our information, certainly, answered Sir
Reginald, like one who was reluctant to tell all he knew;
though good faith requires it should not actually be
exposed
.
Nevertheless, any one can reason on the
probabilities
.
The Duke of Cumberland will collect his German
auxiliaries, and they must get into England the best way
that they can. Would an intelligent enemy with a
well-appointed
fleet suffer this junction, if he could prevent it?
We know he would not; and when we remember the
precise
time of the sailing of the Comte, his probable ignorance
of the presence of this squadron of yours, in the channel,
and all the other circumstances of the case, who can
suppose
otherwise than to believe his aim is to intercept the
German regiments.
This does seem plausible; and yet the Active's signals
told us that the French were steering west; and that, too,
with a light westerly wind.
Do not fleets, like armies, frequently make false
demonstrations
?
Might not Monsieur de Vervillin, so long as his
vessels were in sight from the shore, have turned toward the
west, with an intention, as soon as covered by the darkness,
to incline to the east, again, and sail up channel, under
English
ensigns, perhaps? Is it not possible for him to pass the
Straits of Dover, even, as an English squadronyour own,
for instanceand thus deceive the Hanoverian cruisers until
ready to seize or destroy any transports that may be sent?
Hardly, Sir Reginald, said Bluewater, smiling. A
French ship can no more be mistaken for an English ship,
than a Frenchman can pass for a Briton. We sailors are
not as easily deceived as that would show. It is true,
however
,
that a fleet might well stand in one direction, until far
enough off the land or covered by night, when it might
change its course suddenly, in an opposite direction; and it
is possible
the Comte de Vervillin has adopted some such
stratagem. If he actually knew of the intention to throw
German troops into the island, it is even quite
probable
. In
that case, for one, I could actually wish him success!
Well, my dear sir, and what is to prevent it? asked
Sir Reginald, with a triumph that was not feigned.
Nothing
,
you will say, unless he fall in with Sir Gervaise
Oakes. But you have not answered my inquiry, as to the
manner in which flag-officers divide their commands, at
sea?
As soldiers divide their commands ashore. The
superior
orders, and the inferior obeys.
Ay, this is true; but it does not meet my question.
Here are eleven large ships, and two admirals; now what
portion of these ships are under your particular orders, and
what portion under those of Sir Gervaise Oakes?
The vice-admiral has assigned to himself a division of
six of the ships, and left me the other five. Each of us has
his frigates and smaller vessels. But an order that the
commander-in-chief
may choose to give any captain must be
obeyed by him, as the inferior submits, as a rule, to the last
order.
And
you
, resumed Sir Reginald, with quickness;
how are
you
situated, as respects these captains.
Should I give a direct order to any captain in the fleet,
it would certainly be his duty to obey it; though
circumstances
might occur which would render it obligatory on
him to let me know that he had different instructions from
our common superior. But, why these questions, Sir
Reginald
?
Your patience, my dear admiral;and what ships have
you specifically under your care?
The Csar, my own; the Dublin, the Elizabeth, the
York, and the Dover. To these must be added the Druid
frigate, the sloop of war, and the Gnat. My division
numbers eight in all.
What a magnificent force to possess at a moment as
critical as this!But where are all these vessels? I see but
four and a cutter, and only two of these seem to be large.
The light you perceive there, along the land to the
westward
,
is on board the Elizabeth; and that broad off here,
in the channel, is on board the York. The Dover's lantern
4 *
has disappeared further to the southward. Ah! there the
Dublin casts, and is off after the others!
And you intend to follow, Admiral Bluewater?
Within an hour, or I shall lose the division. As it is,
I have been deliberating on the propriety of calling back the
sternmost ships, and collecting them in close squadron; for
this increase and hauling of the wind render it probable they
will lose the vice-admiral, and that day-light will find the
line scattered and in confusion. One mind must control the
movements of ships, as well as of battalions, Sir Reginald,
if they are to act in concert.
With what view would you collect the vessels you have
mentioned, and in the manner you have named, if you do
not deem my inquiry indiscreet? demanded the baronet,
with quickness.
Simply that they might be kept together, and brought
in subjection to my own particular signals. This is the duty
that more especially falls to my share, as head of the
division
.
Have you the means to effect this, here, on this hill, and
by yourself, sir?
It would be a great oversight to neglect so important a
provision. My signal-officer is lying under yonder cover,
wrapped in his cloak, and two quarter-masters are in
readiness
to make the very signal in question; for its necessity
has been foreseen, and really would seem to be approaching.
If done at all, it must be done quickly, too. The light
of the York grows dim in the distance. It
shall
be done,
sir; prudence requires it, and you shall see the manner in
which we hold our distant ships in command.
Bluewater could not have announced more agreeable
intelligence
to his companion. Sir Reginald was afraid to
propose the open treason he meditated; but he fancied, if
the rear-admiral could fairly withdraw his own division from
the fleet, it would at once weaken the vice-admiral so much,
as to render an engagement with the French impossible,
and might lead to such a separation of the commands as to
render the final defection of the division in-shore easier of
accomplishment. It is true, Bluewater, himself, was actuated
by motives directly contrary to these wishes; but, as the
parties travelled the same road to a certain point, the
intriguing
baronet had his expectations of being able to
persuade
his new friend to continue on in his own route.
Promptitude is a military virtue, and, among seamen, it
is a maxim to do everything that is required to be done,
with activity and vigour. These laws were not neglected
on the present occasion. No sooner had the rear-admiral
determined on his course, than he summoned his agents to
put it in execution. Lord Geoffrey had returned to the
heights and was within call, and he carried the orders to the
lieutenant and the quarter-masters. The lanterns only
required
lighting, and then they were run aloft on Dutton's
staff, as regularly as the same duty could have been
performed
on the poop of the Csar. Three rockets were
thrown up, immediately after, and the gun kept on the cliffs
for that purpose was fired, to draw attention to the signal.
It might have been a minute ere the heavy ordnance of the
Csar repeated the summons, and the same signal was shown
at her mast-head. The Dublin was still so near that no
time was lost, but according to orders, she too repeated the
signal; for in the line that night, it was understood that an
order of this nature was to be sent from ship to ship.
Now for the Elizabeth! cried Bluewater; she cannot
fail to have heard our guns, and to see our signals.
The York is ahead of her, sir! exclaimed the boy;
see; she has the signal up already!
All this passed in a very few minutes, the last ships
having
sailed in the expectation of receiving some such recall.
The York preceded the ship next to her in the line, in
consequence
of having gone about, and being actually nearer
to the rear-admiral than her second astern. It was but a
minute, before the gun and the lanterns of the Elizabeth,
however, announced her knowledge of the order, also.
The two ships last named were no longer visible from the
cliffs, though their positions were known by their lights; but
no sign whatever indicated the part of the ocean on which
the Dover was struggling along through the billows. After
a pause of several minutes, Bluewater spoke.
I fear we shall collect no more, he said; one of my
ships must take her chance to find the commander-in-chief,
alone. Ha!that means something!
At this instant a faint, distant flash was seen, for a single
moment, in the gloom, and then all heads were bent forward
to listen, in breathless attention. A little time had elapsed,
when the dull, smothered report of a gun proclaimed that
even the Dover had caught the rapidly transmitted order.
What means that, sir? eagerly demanded Sir Reginald,
who had attended to everything with intense expectation.
It means, sir, that all of the division are still under my
command. No other ship would note the order.
Their
directions, unless specifically pointed out by their numbers,
must come from the vice-admiral. Is my barge ashore,
Lord Geoffrey Cleveland?
It is, sir, as well as the cutter for Mr. Cornet and the
quarter-masters.
It is well. Gentlemen, we will go on board; the Csar
must weigh and join the other vessels in the offing. I will
follow you to the landing, but you will shove off, at once,
and desire Captain Stowel to weigh and cast to-port. We
will fill on the starboard tack, and haul directly off the
land.
The whole party immediately left the station, hurrying
down to the boats, leaving Bluewater and Sir Reginald to
follow more leisurely. It was a critical moment for the
baronet, who had so nearly effected his purpose, that his
disappointment would have been double did he fail of his
object altogether. He determined, therefore, not to quit the
admiral while there was the slightest hope of success. The
two consequently descended together to the shore, walking,
for the first minute or two, in profound silence.
A great game is in your hands, Admiral Bluewater,
resumed the baronet; rightly played, it may secure the
triumph of the good cause. I think I may say I
know
de
Vervillin's object, and that his success will reseat the Stuarts
on the thrones of their ancestors! One who loves them
should ponder well before he does aught to mar so glorious
a result.
This speech was as bold as it was artful. In point of
fact, Sir Reginald Wychecombe knew no more of the Comte
de Vervillin's intended movements than his companion; but
he did not hesitate to assert what he now did, in order to
obtain a great political advantage, in a moment of so much
importance. To commit Bluewater and his captains openly
on the side of the Stuarts would be a great achievement in
itself; to frustrate the plans of Sir Gervaise might safely be
accounted another; and, then, there were all the chances
that the Frenchman was not at sea for nothing, and that his
operations might indeed succour the movements of the prince.
The baronet, upright as he was in other matters, had no
scruples of conscience on this occasion; having long since
brought himself over to the belief that it was justifiable to
attain ends as great as those he had in view, by the sacrifice
of any of the minor moral considerations.
The effect on Bluewater was not trifling. The devil had
placed the bait before his eyes in a most tempting form; for
he felt that he had only to hold his division in reserve to
render an engagement morally improbable. Abandon his
friend to a superior force he could and would not; but, it is
our painful duty to avow that his mind had glimpses of the
possibility of doing the adventurer in Scotland a great good,
without doing the vice-admiral and the van of the fleet any
very essential harm. Let us be understood, however. The
rear-admiral did not even contemplate treason, or serious
defection of any sort; but, through one of those avenues of
frailty by which men are environed, he had a glance at
results that the master-spirit of evil momentarily placed
before his mental vision as both great and glorious.
I wish we were really certain of de Vervillin's object,
he said; the only concession he made to this novel feeling,
in words. It might, indeed, throw a great light on the
course we ought to take ourselves. I do detest this German
alliance, and would abandon the service ere I would convoy
or transport a ragamuffin of them all to England.
Here Sir Reginald proved how truly expert he was in the
arts of management. A train of thought and feeling had
been lighted in the mind of his companion, which he felt
might lead to all he wished, while he was apprehensive that
further persuasion would awaken opposition, and renew old
sentiments. He wisely determined, therefore, to leave things
as they were, trusting to the strong and declared bias of the
admiral in favour of the revolution, to work out its own
consequences, with a visible and all-important advantage so
prominently placed before his eyes.
I know nothing of ships, he answered, modestly; but
I do
know
that the Comte has our succour in view. It would
ill become me to advise one of your experience how to lead
a force like this, which is subject to your orders; but, a
friend of the good cause, who is now in the west, and who
was lately in the presence itself, tells me that the prince
manifested extreme satisfaction when he learned how much
it might be in your power to serve him.
Do you then think my name has reached the royal
ear, and that the prince has any knowledge of my real
feelings?
Nothing but your extreme modesty could cause you to
doubt the first, sir; as to the last, ask yourself how came I
to approach you to-night, with my heart in my hand, as it
might be, making you master of my life as well as of my
secret. Love and hatred are emotions that soon betray
themselves.
It is matter of historical truth that men of the highest
principles and strongest minds have yielded to the flattery
of rank. Bluewater's political feelings had rendered him
indifferent to the blandishments of the court at London,
while his imagination, that chivalrous deference to antiquity
and poetical right, which lay at the root of his Jacobitism,
and his brooding sympathies, disposed him but too well to
become the dupe of language like this. Had he been more
a man of facts, one less under the influence of his own
imagination
;
had it been his good fortune to live even in
contact
with those he now so devoutly worshipped, in a political
sense at least, their influence over a mind as just and
clear-sighted
as his own, would soon have ceased; but, passing
his time at sea, they had the most powerful auxiliary
possible
,
in the high faculty he possessed of fancying things as
he wished them to be. No wonder, then, that he heard
this false assertion of Sir Reginald with a glow of pleasure;
with even a thrill at the heart to which he had long been a
stranger. For a time, his better feelings were smothered in
this new and treacherous sensation.
The gentlemen, by this time, were at the landing, and it
became necessary to separate. The barge of the
rear-admiral
was with difficulty kept from leaping on the rock, by
means of oars and boat-hooks, and each instant rendered
the embarkation more and more difficult. The moments
were precious on more accounts than one, and the
leave-taking
was short. Sir Reginald said but little, though he
intended the pressure of the hand he gave his companion to
express everything.
God be with you, he added; and as you prove true,
may you prove successful! Remember, `a lawful prince,
and the claims of birth-right.' God be with you!
Adieu, Sir Reginald; when we next meet, the future
will probably be more apparent to us all.But who comes
hither, rushing like a madman towards the boat?
A form came leaping through the darkness; nor was it
known, until it stood within two feet of Bluewater, it was
that of Wycherly. He had heard the guns and seen the
signals. Guessing at the reasons, he dashed from the park,
which he was pacing to cool his agitation, and which now
owned him for a master, and ran the whole distance to the
shore, in order not to be left. His arrival was most
opportune
;
for, in another minute, the barge left the rock.
CHAPTER IV.
O'er the glad waters of the dark-blue sea,
Our thoughts as boundless, and our souls as free,
Far as the breeze can bear, the billows foam,
Survey our empire and behold our home!
The Corsair
.
One
is never fully aware of the extent of the movement
that agitates the bosom of the ocean until fairly subject to
its action himself, when indeed we all feel its power and
reason closely on its dangers. The first pitch of his boat
told Bluewater that the night threatened to be serious. As
the lusty oarsmen bent to their stroke, the barge rose on a
swell, dividing the foam that glanced past it like a marine
Aurora Borealis, and then plunged into the trough as if
descending
to the bottom. It required several united and
vigorous efforts to force the little craft from its dangerous
vicinity to the rocks, and to get it in perfect command.
This once done, however, the well-practised crew urged the
barge slowly but steadily ahead.
A dirty night!  a dirty night! muttered Bluewater,
unconsciously to himself; we should have had a wild
berth, had we rode out this blow, at anchor. Oakes will
have a heavy time of it out yonder in the very chops of the
channel, with a westerly swell heaving in against this ebb.
Yes, sir, answered Wycherly; the vice-admiral will
be looking out for us all, anxiously enough, in the morning.
Not another syllable did Bluewater utter until his boat
had touched the side of the Csar. He reflected deeply on
his situation, and those who know his feelings will easily
understand that his reflections were not altogether free from
pain. Such as they were, he kept them to himself, however,
and in a man-of-war's boat, when a flag-officer chooses to be
silent, it is a matter of course for his inferiors to imitate his
example.
The barge was about a quarter of a mile from the
landing
,
when the heavy flap of the Csar's main-top-sail was
heard, as, close-reefed, it struggled for freedom, while her
crew drew its sheets down to the blocks on the lower
yard-arms
.
A minute later the Gnat, under the head of her
fore-and-aft-mainsail
,
was seen standing slowly off from the
land, looking in the darkness like some half-equipped shadow
of herself. The sloop of war, too, was seen bending low to the
force of the wind, with her mere apology of a topsail thrown
aback, in waiting for the flag-ship to cast.
The surface of the waters was a sheet of glancing foam,
while the air was filled with the blended sounds of the wash
of the element, and the roar of the winds. Still there was
nothing chilling or repulsive in the temperature of the air,
which was charged with the freshness of the sea, and was
bracing and animating, bringing with it the flavour that a
seaman loves. After fully fifteen minutes' severe tugging at
the oars, the barge drew near enough to permit the black
mass of the Csar to be seen. For some time, Lord
Geoffrey
,
who had seated himself at the tiller,yoke-lines were
not used a century since,steered by the top-light of the
rear-admiral; but now the maze of hamper was seen waving
slowly to and fro in the lurid heavens, and the huge hull
became visible, heaving and setting, as if the ocean groaned
with the labour of lifting such a pile of wood and iron. A
light gleamed from the cabin-windows, and ever and anon,
one glanced athwart an open gun-room port. In all other
respects, the ship presented but one hue of blackness. Nor
was it an easy undertaking, even after the barge was under
the lee of the ship, for those in it, to quit its uneasy support
and get a firm footing on the cleets that lined the vessel's
side like a ladder. This was done, however, and all
ascended
to the deck but two of the crew, who remained to
hook-on the yard and stay-tackles. This effected, the shrill
whistle gave the word, and that large boat, built to carry at
need some twenty souls, was raised from the raging water,
as it were by some gigantic effort of the ship herself, and
safely deposited in her bosom.
We are none too soon, sir, said Stowel, the moment he
had received the rear-admiral with the customary etiquette
of the hour. It 's a cap-full of wind already, and it
promises
to blow harder before morning. We are catted and
fished, sir, and the forecastle-men are passing the
shank-painter
,
at this moment.
Fill, sir, and stretch off, on an easy bowline, was the
answer; when a league in the offing, let me know it. Mr.
Cornet, I have need of you, in my cabin.
As this was said, Bluewater went below, followed by his
signal-officer. At the same instant the first lieutenant called
out to man the main-braces, and to fill the topsail. As soon
as this command was obeyed, the Csar started ahead. Her
movement was slow, but it had a majesty in it, that set at
naught the turbulence of the elements.
Bluewater had paced to and fro in his cabin no less than
six times, with his head drooping, in a thoughtful attitude,
ere his attention was called to any external object.
Do you wish my presence, Admiral Bluewater? the
signal-officer at length inquired.
I ask your pardon, Mr. Cornet; I was really
unconscious
that you were in the cabin. Let me seeayour
last signal was, `division come within hail of rear-admiral.'
They must get close to us, to be able to do
that
, to-night,
Cornet! The winds and waves have begun their song in
earnest.
Vol. II.  5
And yet, sir, I 'll venture a month's pay that Captain
Drinkwater brings the Dover so near us, as to put the officer
of the deck and the quarter-master at the wheel in a fever.
We once made that signal, in a gale of wind, and he passed
his jib-boom-end over our taffrail.
He is certainly a most literal gentleman, that Captain
Drinkwater, but he knows how to take care of his ship.
Look for the number of `follow the rear-admiral's motions.'
'T is 211, I think.
No, sir; but 212. Blue, red and white, with the flags.
With the lanterns, 't is one of the simplest signals we have.
We will make it, at once. When that is done, show
`the rear-admiral; keep in his wake, in the general order
of sailing.' That I am sure is 204.
Yes, sir; you are quite right. Shall I show the second
signal as soon as all the vessels have answered the first,
sir?
That is my intention, Cornet. When all have answered,
let me know it.
Mr. Cornet now left the cabin, and Bluewater took a seat
in an arm-chair, in deep meditation. For quite half an
hour the former was busy on the poop, with his two
quarter-masters
,
going through the slow and far from easy duty of
making night-signals, as they were then practised at sea. It
was some time before the most distant vessel, the Dover,
gave any evidence of comprehending the first order, and
then the same tardy operation had to be gone through with
for the second. At length the sentinel threw open the
cabin-door
,
and Cornet reappeared. During the whole of his
absence
on deck, Bluewater had not stirred; scarce seemed
to breathe. His thoughts were away from his ships, and
for the first time, in the ten years he had worn a flag, he
had forgotten the order he had given.
The signals are made and answered, sir, said Cornet,
as soon as he had advanced to the edge of the table, on
which the rear-admiral's elbow was leaning. The Dublin
is already in our wake, and the Elizabeth is bearing down
fast on our weather-quarter; she will bring herself into her
station in ten minutes.
What news of the York and Dover, Cornet? asked
Bluewater, rousing himself from a fit of deep abstraction.
The York's light nears us, quite evidently; though that
of the Dover is still a fixed star, sir, answered the
lieutenant
,
chuckling a little at his own humour; it seems no
larger than it did when we first made it.
It is something to have made it at all. I was not aware
it could be seen from deck?
Nor can it, sir; but, by going up half-a-dozen ratlins
we get a look at it. Captain Drinkwater bowses up his
lights to the gaff-end, and I can see him always ten minutes
sooner than any other ship in the fleet, under the same
circumstances
.
Drinkwater is a careful officer; do the bearings of his
light alter enough to tell the course he is steering?
I think they do, sir, though our standing out athwart
his line of sailing would make the change slow, of course.
Every foot we get to the southward, you know, sir, would
throw his bearings farther west; while every foot he comes
east, would counteract that change and throw his bearings
further south.
That 's very clear; but, as he must go three fathoms
to our one, running off with square yards before such a
breeze, I think we should be constantly altering his
bearings
to the southward.
No doubt of it, in the world, sir; and that is just what
we
are
doing. I think I can see a difference of half a point,
already; but, when we get his light fairly in view from the
poop, we shall be able to tell with perfect accuracy.
All very well, Cornet. Do me the favour to desire
Captain Stowel to step into the cabin; and keep a bright
look-out for the ships of the division. Stay, for a single
instant
;
what particularly sharp-eyed youngster happens to
belong to the watch on deck?
I know none keener in that way than Lord Geoffrey
Cleveland, sir; he can see all the roguery that is going on
in the whole fleet, at any rate, and ought to see other
things.
He will do perfectly well; send the young gentleman to
me, sir; but, first inform the officer of the watch that I have
need of him.
Bluewater was unusually fastidious in exercising his
authority
over those who had temporary superiors on the
assigned duty of the ship; and he never sent an order to
any of the watch, without causing it to pass through the
officer of that watch. He waited but a minute before the
boy appeared.
Have you a good gripe to-night, boy? asked the
rear-admiral
,
smiling; or will it be both hands for yourself and
none for the king? I want you on the fore-top-gallant-yard,
for eight or ten minutes.
Well, sir, it 's a plain road there, and one I 've often
travelled, returned the lad, cheerfully.
That I well know; you are certainly no skulk when
duty is to be done. Go aloft then, and ascertain if the lights
of any of Sir Gervaise's squadron are to be seen. You will
remember that the Dover bears somewhere about south-west
from us, and that she is still a long way to seaward. I
should think all of Sir Gervaise's ships must be quite as far
to windward as that point would bring them, but much
further
off. By looking sharp a point or half a point to
windward
of the Dover, you may possibly see the light of the
Warspite, and then we shall get a correct idea of the
bearings
of all the rest of the division
Ay-ay-sir, interrupted the boy; I think I understand
exactly what you wish to know, Admiral Bluewater.
That is a natural gift at sixteen, my lord, returned the
admiral, smiling; but it may be improved a little, perhaps,
by the experience of fifty. Now, it is possible Sir Gervaise
may have gone about; as soon as the flood made; in which
case he ought to bear nearly west of us, and you will also
look in that direction. On the other hand, Sir Gervaise
may have stretched so far over towards the French coast
before night shut in, as to feel satisfied Monsieur de
Vervillin
is still to the eastward of him; in which case he would
keep off a little, and may, at this moment, be nearly ahead
of us. So that, under all the circumstances, you will sweep
the horizon, from the weather-beam to the lee-bow, ranging
forward. Am I understood, now, my lord?
Yes, sir, I think you are, answered the boy, blushing
at his own impetuosity. You will excuse my indiscretion,
Admiral Bluewater; but I
thought
I understood all you
desired, when I spoke so hastily.
No doubt you did, Geoffrey, but you perceive you did
not. Nature has made you quick of apprehension, but not
quick enough to
foresee
all an old man's gossip. Come
nearer, now, and let us shake hands. So go aloft, and hold
on well, for it is a windy night, and I do not desire to lose
you overboard.
The boy did as told, squeezed Bluewater's hand, and
dashed out of the cabin to conceal his tears. As for the
rear-admiral, he immediately relapsed into his fit of
forgetfulness
,
waiting for the arrival of Stowel.
A summons to a captain does not as immediately produce
a visit, on board a vessel of war, as a summons to a
midshipman
.
Captain Stowel was busy in looking at the
manner
in which his boats were stowed, when Cornet told him
of the rear-admiral's request; and then he had to give some
orders to the first lieutenant concerning the fresh meat that
had been got off, and one or two other similar little things,
before he was at leisure to comply.
See me, do you say, Mr. Cornet; in his own cabin, as
soon as it is convenient? he at length remarked, when all
these several offices had been duly performed.
The signal-officer repeated the request, word for word as
he had heard it, and then he turned to take another look at
the light of the Dover. As for Stowel, he cared no more
for the Dover, windy and dark as the night promised to be,
than the burgher is apt to care for his neighbour's house
when the whole street is threatened with destruction. To
him the Csar was the great centre of attraction, and Cornet
paid him off in kind; for, of all the vessels in the fleet, the
Csar was precisely the one to which he gave the least
attention; and this for the simple reason that she was the
only ship to which he never gave, or from which he never
received, a signal.
Well, Mr. Bluff, said Stowel to the first lieutenant;
one of us will have to be on deck most of the night, and
I 'll take a slant below, for half an hour first, and see what
the admiral wishes.
Thus saying, the captain left the deck, in order to
ascertain
his superior's pleasure. Captain Stowel was several
years the senior of Bluewater, having actually been a
lieutenant
in one of the frigates in which the rear-admiral had
served as a midshipman; a circumstance to which he
occasionally
5 *
alluded in their present intercourse. The change
in the relative positions was the result of the family influence
of the junior, who had passed his senior in the grade of
master and commander; a rank that then brought many an
honest man up for life, in the English marine. At the age
of five-and-forty, that at which Bluewater first hoisted his
flag, Stowel was posted; and soon after he was invited by
his old shipmate, who had once had him under him as his
first lieutenant in a sloop of war, to take the command of
his flag-ship. From that day down to the present moment,
the two officers had sailed together, whenever they sailed at
all, perfectly good friends; though the captain never
appeared
entirely to forget the time when they were in the
aforesaid frigate; one a gun-room officer, and the other only
a youngster.
Stowel must now have been about sixty-five; a square,
hard-featured, red-faced seaman, who knew all about his
ship, from her truck to her limber-rope, but who troubled
himself very little about anything else. He had married a
widow when he was posted, but was childless, and had long
since permitted his affections to wander back into their own
channels; from the domestic hearth to his ship. He seldom
spoke of matrimony, but the little he saw fit to say on the
subject was comprehensive and to the point. A perfectly
sober man, he consumed large quantities of both wine and
brandy, as well as of tobacco, and never seemed to be the
worse for either. Loyal he was by political faith, and he
looked upon a revolution, let its object be what it might, as
he would have regarded a mutiny in the Csar. He was
exceedingly pertinacious of his rights as captain of his
own ship, both ashore and afloat; a disposition that
produced
less trouble with the mild and gentlemanly
rear-admiral
,
than with Mrs. Stowel. If we add that this plain
sailor never looked into a book, his proper scientific works
excepted, we shall have said all of him that his connection
with our tale demands.
Good-evening, Admiral Bluewater, said this true tar,
saluting the rear-admiral, as one neighbour would greet
another, on dropping in of an evening, for they occupied
different cabins. Mr. Cornet told me you would like to
say a word to me, before I turned in; if, indeed, turn in at
all, I do this blessed night.
Take a seat, Stowel, and a glass of this sherry, in the
bargain, Bluewater answered, kindly, showing how well he
understood his man, by the manner in which he shoved both
bottle and glass within reach of his hand. How goes the
night?and is this wind likely to stand?
I 'm of opinion, sir,we 'll drink His Majesty, if you 've
no objection, Admiral Bluewater,I 'm of opinion we shall
stretch the threads of that new main-top-sail, before we 've
done with the breeze, sir. I believe I 've not told you, yet,
that I 've had the new sail bent, since we last spoke together
on the subject. It 's a good fit, sir; and, close-reefed, the
sail stands like the side of a house.
I 'm glad to hear it, Stowel; though I think all your
canvass usually appears to be in its place.
Why you know, Admiral Bluewater, that I 've been
long enough at it, to understand something about the matter.
It is now more than forty years since we were in the Calypso
together, and ever since that time I 've borne the
commission
of an officer. You were then a youngster, and thought
more of your joke, than of bending sails, or of seeing how
they would stand.
There wasn't much of me, certainly, forty years ago,
Stowel; but I well remember the knack you had of making
every robin, sheet, bowline, and thread do its duty, then, as
you do to-day. By the way, can you tell me anything of
the Dover, this evening?
Not I, sir; she came out with the rest of us I suppose,
and must be somewhere in the fleet; though I dare say the
log will have it all, if she has been anywhere near us,
lately. I am sorry we did not go into one of the
watering-ports
,
instead of this open roadstead, for we must be at least
twenty-seven hundred gallons short of what we ought to
have, by my calculation; and then we want a new set of
light spars, pretty much all round; and the lower hold
hasn't as many barrels of provision in it, by thirty-odd, as
I could wish to see there.
I leave these things to you, entirely, Stowel; you will
report in time to keep the ship efficient.
No fear of the Csar, sir; for, between Mr. Bluff, the
master, and myself, we know pretty much all about
her;
though I dare say there are men in the fleet who can tell you
more about the Dublin, or the Dover, or the York. We
will drink the queen, and all the royal family, if you please,
sir.
As usual, Bluewater merely bowed, for his companion
required no further acquiescence in his toasts. Just at that
moment, too, it would have needed a general order, at least,
to induce him to drink any of the family of the reigning
house.
Oakes must be well off, mid-channel, by this time,
Captain Stowel?
I should think he might be, sir; though I can't say I
took particular notice of the time he sailed. I dare say it 's
all in the log. The Plantagenet is a fast ship, sir, and
Captain Greenly understands her trim, and what she can
do on all tacks; and, yet, I do think His Majesty has one
ship in this fleet that can find a Frenchman quite as soon,
and deal with him, when found, quite as much to the
purpose
.
Of course you mean the Csar;well, I 'm quite of
your way of thinking, though Sir Gervaise manages never
to be in a slow ship. I suppose you know, Stowel, that
Monsieur de Vervillin is out, and that we may expect to see
or hear something of him, to-morrow.
Yes, sir, there is some such conversation in the ship, I
know; but the quantity of galley-news is so great in this
squadron, that I never attend much to what is said. One of
the officers brought off a rumour, I believe, that there was a
sort of a row in Scotland. By the way, sir, there is a
supernumerary
lieutenant on board, and as he has joined
entirely without orders, I 'm at a loss how to berth or to
provision
him. We can treat the gentleman hospitably
to-night
;
but in the morning I shall be obliged to get him
regularly on paper.
You mean Sir Wycherly Wychecombe; he shall come
into my mess, rather than give you any trouble.
I shall not presume to meddle with any gentleman you
may please to invite into your cabin, sir, answered Stowel,
with a stiff bow, in the way of apology. That 's what I
always tell Mrs. Stowel, sir;that my
cabin
is my
own
,
and even a wife has no right to shake a broom in it.
Which is a great advantage to us seamen; for it gives
us a citadel to retreat to, when the outworks are pressed.
You appear to take but little interest in this civil war,
Stowel!
Then it 's true, is it, sir? I didn't know but it might turn
out to be galley-news. Pray what is the rumpus all about,
Admiral Bluewater; for, I never could get that story fidded
properly, so as to set up the rigging, and have the spar well
stayed in its place.
It is merely a war to decide who shall be king of
England
;
nothing else, I do assure you, sir.
They 're an uneasy set ashore, sir, if the truth must be
said of them! We 've got one king, already; and on what
principle does any man wish for more? Now, there was
Captain Blakely, from the Elizabeth, on board of me this
afternoon; and we talked the matter over a little, and both
of us concluded that they got these things up much as a
matter of profit among the army contractors, and the dealers
in warlike stores.
Bluewater listened with intense interest, for here was
proof how completely two of his captains, at least, would be
at his own command, and how little they would be likely,
for a time, at least, to dispute any of his orders. He thought
of Sir Reginald, and of the rapture with which
he
would
have received this trait of nautical character.
There are people who set their hearts on the result,
notwithstanding
,
carelessly observed the rear-admiral; and
some who see their fortunes marred or promoted, by the
success or downfall of the parties. They think de Vervillin
is out on some errand connected with this rising in the
north.
Well, I don't see what
he
has got to do with the matter
at all; for, I don't suppose that King Louis is such a fool
as to expect to be king of England as well as king of
France!
The dignity would be too much for one pair of shoulders
to bear. As well might one admiral wish to command all
the divisions of his own fleet, though they were fifty leagues
asunder.
Or one captain two ships; or what is more to the
purpose
,
sir, one ship to keep two captains. We 'll drink to
discipline, if you 've no objection, sir. 'T is the soul of
order and quiet, ashore or afloat. For my part, I want no
co-equal
I believe that 's the cant word they use on such
occasionsbut I want no co-equal, in the Csar, and I am
unwilling to have one in the house at Greenwich; though
Mrs. Stowel thinks differently. Here 's my ship; she 's in
her place in the line; it 's my business to see she is fit for
any service that a first-class two-decker can undertake, and
that duty I endeavour to perform; and I make no doubt it
is all the better performed because there 's no wife or
co-equal
aboard here.
Where
the ship is to
go
, and
what
she is to
do
, are other matters, which I take from general
orders, special orders, or signals. Let them act up to this
principle in London, and we should hear no more of
disturbances
,
north or south.
Certainly, Stowel, your doctrine would make a quiet
nation, as well as a quiet ship. I hope you do me the justice
to think there is no co-equal in my commands?
That there is not, sirand I have the honour to drink
your health  that there is not. When we were in the
Calypso together, I had the advantage; and I must say that
I never had a youngster under me who ever did his duty
more cheerfully. Since that day we 've shifted places; end
for end, as one might say; and I endeavour to pay you, in
your own coin. There is no man whose orders I obey more
willingly or more to my own advantage; always excepting
thoseof Admiral Oakes, who, being commander-in-chief,
overlays
us all with his anchor. We must dowse our peaks to
his signals, though we
can
maintain, without mutinying,
that the Csar is as good a boat, on or off a wind, as the
Plantagenet, the best day Sir Jarvy ever saw.
There is no manner of doubt of that. You have all the
notions of a true sailor, I find, Stowel; obey orders before
all other things. I am curious to know how our captains,
generally, stand affected to this claim which the Pretender
has set up to the throne?
Can't tell you, on my soul, sir; though I fancy few of
them give themselves any great anxiety in the matter.
When the wind is fair we can run off large, and when it is
foul we must haul upon a bowline, let who will reign. I
was a youngster under Queen Anne, and she was a Stuart,
I believe; and I have served under the German family ever
since; and to be frank with you, Admiral Bluewater, I see
but little difference in the duty, the pay, or the rations. My
maxim is to obey orders, and then I know the blame will
fall on them that give them, if anything goes wrong.
We have many Scotchmen in the fleet, Stowel,
observed
the rear-admiral, in a musing manner, like one who
rather thought aloud than spoke. Several of the captains
are from north of Tweed.
Ay, sir, one is pretty certain of meeting gentlemen from
that part of the island, in almost all situations in life. I
never have understood that Scotland had much of a navy in
ancient times, and yet the moment old England has to pay
for it, the lairds are willing enough to send their children to
sea.
Nevertheless it must be owned that they make gallant
and useful officers, Stowel.
No doubt they do, sir; but gallant and useful men are
not scarce anywhere. You and I are too old and too
experienced
,
Admiral Bluewater, to put any faith in the notion
that courage belongs to any particular part of the world, or
usefulness either. I never fought a Frenchman yet that I
thought a coward; and, in my judgment, there are brave
men enough in England to command all her ships, and to
fight them too.
Let this be so, Stowel, still we must take things as they
come. What do you think of the night?
Dirty enough before morning, I should think, sir, though
it is a little out of rule, that it does not rain with this wind,
already. The next time we come-to, Admiral Bluewater, I
intend to anchor with a shorter scope of cable than we have
been doing lately; for, I begin to think there is no use in
wetting so many yarns in the summer months. They tell
me the York brings up always on forty fathoms.
That 's a short range, I should think, for a heavy ship.
But here is a visiter.
The sentinel opened the cabin-door, and Lord Geoffrey,
with his cap fastened to his head by a pocket-handkerchief,
and his face red with exposure to the wind, entered the
cabin.
Well, said Bluewater, quietly; what is the report
from aloft?
The Dover is running down athwart our forefoot, and
nearing us fast, sir, returned the midshipman. The York
is close on our weather-beam, edging in to her station; but
I can make out nothing ahead of us, though I was on the
yard twenty minutes.
Did you look well on the weather-beam, and thence
forward to the lee-bow?
I did, sir; if any light is in view, better eyes than mine
must find it.
Stowel looked from one to the other, as this short
conversation
was held; but, as soon as there was a pause, he put
in a word in behalf of the ship.
You 've been up forward, my lord? he said.
Yes, I have, Captain Stowel.
And did you think of seeing how the heel of the
top-gallant-mast
stood it, in this sea? Bluff tells me 't is too
loose to be fit for very heavy weather.
I did not, sir. I was sent aloft to look out for the ships
of the commander-in-chief's division, and didn't think of the
heel of the top-gallant-mast's being too loose, at all.
Ay, that 's the way with all the youngsters, now-a-days.
In my time, or even in
yours
, Admiral Bluewater, we never
put our feet on a ratlin, but hands and eyes were at work,
until we reached the halting place, even though it should be
the truck. That is the manner to know what a ship is made
of!
I kept my hands and eyes at work, too, Captain Stowel;
but it was to hold on well, and to look out well.
That will never dothat will never do, if you wish to
make yourself a sailor. Begin with your own ship first;
learn all about
her
, and then, when you get to be an
admiral, as your father's son, my lord, will be certain to
become, it will be time enough to be inquiring about the rest
of the fleet.
You forget, Captain Stowel
That will do, Lord Georffrey, Bluewater soothingly
interposed
,
for he knew that the captain preached no more
than he literally practised; if
I
am satisfied with your
report, no one else has a right to complain. Desire Sir
Wycherly Wychecombe to meet me on deck, where we will
now go, Stowel, and take a look at the weather for
ourselves
.
With all my heart, Admiral Bluewater, though I 'll just
drink the First Lord's health before we quit this excellent
liquor. That youngster has stuff in him, in spite of his
nobility, and by fetching him up, with round turns,
occasionally
,
I hope to make a man of him, yet.
If he do not grow into that character, physically and
morally, within the next few years, sir, he will be the first
person of his family who has ever failed of it.
As Bluewater said this, he and the captain left his cabin,
and ascended to the quarter-deck. Here Stowel stopped to
hold a consultation with his first lieutenant, while the
admiral
went up the poop-ladder, and joined Cornet. The
last had nothing new to communicate, and as he was
permitted
to go below, he was desired to send Wycherly up to
the poop, where the young man would be expected by the
rear-admiral.
Some little time elapsed before the Virginian could be
found; no sooner was this effected, however, than he joined
Bluewater. They had a private conversation of fully half
an hour, pacing the poop the whole time, and then Cornet
was summoned back, again, to his usual station. The latter
immediately received an order to acquaint Captain Stowel
the rear-admiral desired that the Csar might be
hoveto
,
and to make a signal for the Druid 36, to come under
the flag-ship's lee, and back her main-top-sail. No sooner
did this order reach the quarter-deck than the watch was
sent to the braces, and the main-yard was rounded in, until
the portion of sail that was still set lay against the mast.
This deadened the way of the huge body, which rose and
fell heavily in the seas, as they washed under her, scarcely
large enough to lift the burthen it imposed upon them. Just
at this instant, the signal was made.
The sudden check to the movement of the Csar brought
the Dublin booming up in the darkness, when putting her
helm up, that ship surged slowly past to leeward, resembling
a black mountain moving by in the gloom. She was hailed
Vol. II.  6
and directed to heave-to, also, as soon as far enough ahead.
The Elizabeth followed, clearing the flag-ship by merely
twenty fathoms, and receiving a similar order. The Druid
had been on the admiral's weather-quarter, but she now
came gliding down, with the wind abeam, taking room to
back her top-sail under the Csar's lee-bow. By this time
a cutter was in the water, rising six or eight feet up the
black side of the ship, and sinking as low apparently
beneath
her bottom, and then Wycherly reported himself as
ready to proceed.
You will not forget, sir, said Bluewater, any part
of my commission; but inform the commander-in-chief of
the
whole
. It may be important that we understand each
other fully. You will also hand him this letter which I
have hastily written while the boat was getting ready.
I think I understand your wishes, sir;at least, I
hope
so;and I will endeavour to execute them.
God bless you, Sir Wycherly Wychecombe, added
Bluewater, with emotion. We may never meet again;
we sailors carry uncertain lives; and we may be said to
carry them in our hands.
Wycherly took his leave of the admiral, and he ran
down the poop-ladder to descend into the boat. Twice he
paused on the quarter-deck, however, in the manner of one
who felt disposed to return and ask some explanation; but
each time he moved on, decided to proceed.
It needed all the agility of our young sailor to get safely
into the boat. This done, the oars fell and the cutter was
driven swiftly away to leeward. In a few minutes, it shot
beneath the lee of the frigate, and discharged its freight.
Wycherly could not have been three minutes on the deck
of the Druid, ere her yards were braced up, and her
topsail
filled with a heavy flap. This caused her to draw
slowly ahead. Five minutes later, however, a white cloud
was seen dimly fluttering over her hull, and the reefed
main-sail
was distended to the wind. The effect was so
instantaneous
that the frigate seemed to glide away from the
flag-ship
,
and in a quarter of an hour, under her three top-sails
double-reefed, and her courses, she was a mile distant on
her weather-bow. Those who watched her movements
without understanding them, observed that she lowered her
light, and appeared to detach herself from the rest of the
division.
It was some time before the Csar's boat was enabled to
pull up against the tide, wind, and sea. When this hard
task was successfully accomplished, the ship filled, passed
the Dublin and Elizabeth, and resumed her place in the line.
Bluewater paced the poop an hour longer, having
dismissed
his signal-officer and the quarter-masters to their
hammocks. Even Stowel had turned in, nor did Mr. Bluff
deem it necessary to remain on deck any longer. At the
end of the hour, the rear-admiral bethought him of retiring
too. Before he quitted the poop, however, he stood at the
weather-ladder, holding on to the mizzen-rigging, and gazing
at the scene.
The wind had increased, as had the sea, but it was not
yet a gale. The York had long before hauled up in her
station, a cable's length ahead of the Csar, and was
standing
on, under the same canvass as the flag-ship, looking
stately and black. The Dover was just shooting into her
berth, under the standing sailing-orders, at the same
distance
ahead of the York; visible, but much less distinct and
imposing. The sloop and the cutter were running along, under
the lee of the heavy ships, a quarter of a mile distant, each
vessel keeping her relative position, by close attention to
her canvass. Further than this, nothing was in sight. The
sea had that wild mixture of brightness and gloom, which
belongs to the element when much agitated in a dark night,
while the heavens were murky and threatening.
Within the ship, all was still. Here and there a lantern
threw its wavering light around, but the shadows of the
masts and guns, and other objects, rendered this relief to
the night trifling. The lieutenant of the watch paced the
weather side of the quarter-deck, silent but attentive.
Occasionally
he hailed the look-outs, and admonished them to be
vigilant, also, and at each turn he glanced upward to see
how the top-sail stood. Four or five old and thoughtful
seamen
walked the waist and forecastle, but most of the watch
were stowed between the guns, or in the best places they
could find, under the lee of the bulwarks, catching cat's
naps. This was an indulgence denied the young gentlemen,
of whom one was on the forecastle, leaning against the
mast, dreaming of home, one in the waist, supporting the
nettings, and one walking the lee-side of the quarter-deck,
his eyes shut, his thoughts confused, and his footing
uncertain
.
As Bluewater stepped on the quarter-deck-ladder, to
descend to his own cabin, the youngster hit his foot against
an eye-bolt, and fetched away plump up against his superior.
Bluewater caught the lad in his arms, and saved him from
a fall, setting him fairly on his feet before he let him go.
'T is seven bells, Geoffrey, said the admiral, in an
under tone. Hold on for half an hour longer, and then
go dream of your dear mother.
Before the boy could recover himself to thank his
superior
,
the latter had disappeared.
CHAPTER V.
Yet notwithstanding, being incensed, he 's flint;
As humorous as winter, and as sudden
As flaws congealed in the spring of day.
His temper, therefore, must be well observed.
Shakspeare
.
The
reader will remember that the wind had not become
fresh when Sir Gervaise Oakes got into his barge, with the
intention of carrying his fleet to sea. A retrospective glance
at the state of the weather, will become necessary to the
reader, therefore, in carrying his mind back to that precise
period, whither it has now become our duty to transport
him in imagination.
The vice-admiral governed a fleet on principles very
different
from those of Bluewater. While the last left so much
to the commanders of the different vessels, his friend looked
into everything himself. The details of the service he knew
were indispensable to success on a larger scale, and his
active mind descended into all these minuti, to a degree
sometimes, that annoyed his captains. On the whole, how
ever, he was sufficiently observant of that formidable barrier
to excessive familiarity, and that great promoter of
heart-burnings
in a squadron, naval etiquette, to prevent anything
like serious misunderstandings, and the best feelings
prevailed
between him and the several magnates under his
orders. Perhaps the circumstance that he was a
fighting
admiral contributed to this internal tranquillity; for, it has
been often remarked, that armies and fleets will both tolerate
more in leaders that give them plenty to do with the
enemy, than in commanders who leave them inactive and
less exposed. The constant encounters with the foe would
seem to let out all the superfluous quarrelsome tendencies.
Nelson, to a certain extent, was an example of this influence
in the English marine, Suffren
[1]
[1]
Suffren, though one of the best sea-captains France ever possessed,
was a man of extreme severity and great roughness of manner. Still
he must have been a man of family, as his title of
Bailli
de Suffren,
was derived from his being a Knight of Malta. It is a singular
circumstance
connected with the death of this distinguished officer, which
occurred not long before the French revolution, that he disappeared in
an extraordinary manner, and is buried no one knows where. It is
supposed that he was killed by one of his own officers, in a rencontre
in the streets of Paris, at night, and that the influence of the friends of
the victor was sufficiently great to suppress inquiry. The cause of the
quarrel is attributed to harsh treatment on service.
in that of France, and
Preble, to a much greater degree than in either of the other
cases, in our own. At all events, while most of his captains
sensibly felt themselves less of commanders, while Sir
Gervaise
was on board or around their ships, than when he was
in the cabin of the Plantagenet, the peace was rarely broken
between them, and he was generally beloved as well as
obeyed. Bluewater was a more invariable favourite,
perhaps
,
though scarcely as much respected; and certainly
not half as much feared.
On the present occasion, the vice-admiral did not pull
through the fleet, without discovering the peculiar
propensity
to which we have alluded. In passing one of the ships,
he made a sign to his coxswain to cause the boat's crew to
lay on their oars, when he hailed the vessel, and the
following
dialogue occurred.
Carnatic, ahoy! cried the admiral.
6 *
Sir, exclaimed the officer of the deck, jumping on a
quarter-deck gun, and raising his hat.
Is Captain Parker on board, sir?
He is, Sir Gervaise; will you see him, sir?
A nod of the head sufficed to bring the said Captain Parker
on deck, and to the gangway, where he could converse with
his superior, without inconvenience to either.
How do you do,
Captain
Parker?a certain sign Sir
Gervaise meant to rap the other over the knuckles, else
would it have been
Parker
.How do you do,
Captain
Parker? I am sorry to see you have got your ship too
much down by the head, sir. She 'll steer off the wind, like
a colt when he first feels the bridle; now with his head on
one side, and now on the other. You know I like a
compact
line, and straight wakes, sir.
I am well aware of that, Sir Gervaise, returned Parker,
a grey-headed, meek old man, who had fought his way up
from the forecastle to his present honourable station, and,
who, though brave as a lion before the enemy, had a
particular
dread of all his commanders; but we have been obliged
to use more water aft than we could wish, on account of the
tiers. We shall coil away the cables anew, and come at
some of the leaguers forward, and bring all right again, in
a week, I hope, sir.
A week?  the dl, sir; that will never do, when I
expect to see de Vervillin
to-morrow
. Fill all your empty
casks aft with salt-water, immediately; and if that wont do,
shift some of your shot from forward. I know that craft of
yours, well; she is as tender as a fellow with corns, and the
shoe musn't pinch anywhere.
Very well, Sir Gervaise; the ship shall be brought in
trim, as soon as possible.
Ay, ay, sir, that is what I expect from every vessel, at
all
times; and more especially when we are ready to meet
an enemy. And, I say,
Parker
,making a sign to his
boat's crew to stop rowing againI say,
Parker
, I know
you love brawn;I 'll send you some that Galleygo tells
me he has picked up, along-shore here, as soon as I get
aboard. The fellow has been robbing all the hen-roosts in
Devonshire, by his own account of the matter.
Sir Gervaise waved his hand,
Parker
smiled and bowed
his thanks, and the two parted with feelings of perfect
kindness
,
notwithstanding the little skirmish with which the
interview had commenced.
Mr. Williamson, said Captain Parker to his first
lieutenant
,
on quitting the gangway, you hear what the
commander-in-chief
says; and he must be obeyed. I
don't
think the Carnatic would have sheered out of the line, even
if she is a little by the head; but have the empty casks
filled, and bring her down six inches more by the stern.
That 's a good fellow, that old Parker, said Sir
Gervaise
to his purser, whom he was carrying off good-naturedly
to the ship, lest he might lose his passage; and I wonder
how he let his ship get her nose under water, in that fashion.
I like to have him for a second astern; for I feel sure he 'd
follow if I stood into Cherbourg, bows on! Yes; a good
fellow is Parker; and, Locker,to his own man, who was
also in the boat;mind you send him
two
of the best
pieces of that brawnhey!hey!hey!what the dl
has Lord Morganica descendant from royalty, by the
left-hand,been doing now! That ship is kept like a
tailor's lay-figure, just to stuff jackets and gim-cracks on
herAchilles, there!
A quarter-master ran to the edge of the poop, and then
turning, he spoke to his captain, who was walking the deck,
and informed him that the commander-in-chief hailed the
ship. The Earl of Morganic, a young man of
four-and-twenty
,
who had succeeded to the title a few years before by
the death of an elder brother,the usual process by which
an
old
peer is brought into the British navy, the work being
too discouraging for those who have fortune before their
eyes from the start,now advanced to the quarter of the
ship, bowed with respectful ease, and spoke with a
self-possession
that not one of the old commanders of the fleet would
have dared to use. In general, this nobleman's intercourse
with his superiors in naval rank, betrayed the consciousness
of his own superiority in civil rank; but, Sir Gervaise being
of an old family, and quite as rich as he was himself, the
vice-admiral commanded more of his homage than was
customary
.
His ship was full of nobs, as they term it in
the British navy, or the sons and relatives of nobles; and
it was by no means an uncommon thing for her messes to
have their jokes at the expense of even flag-officers, who
were believed to be a little ignorant of the peculiar
sensibilities
that are rightly enough imagined to characterize social
station.
Good-morning, Sir Gervaise, called out this noble
captain; I 'm glad to see you looking so well, after our
long cruise in the Bay; I intended to have the honour to
inquire after your health in person, this morning, but they
told me you slept out of your ship. We shall have to hold
a court on you, sir, if you fall much into that habit!
All within hearing smiled, even to the rough old tars,
who were astraddle of the yards; and even Sir Gervaise's
lip curled a little, though he was not exactly in a joking
humour.
Come, come, Morganic, do you let my habits alone, and
look out for your own fore-top-mast. Why, in the name
of seamnship, is that spar stayed forward in such a fashion,
looking like a xebec's foremast?
Do you dislike it, Sir Gervaise?Now to our fancies
aboard here, it gives the Achilles a knowing look, and we
hope to set a fashion. By carrying the head-sails well
forward
,
we help the ship round in a sea, you know, sir.
Indeed, I know no such thing, my lord. What you gain
after being taken aback, you lose in coming to the wind.
If I had a pair of scales suitable to such a purpose, I would
have all that hamper you have stayed away yonder over
your bows, on the end of such a long lever, weighed, in
order that you might learn what a beautiful contrivance
you've invented, among you, to make a ship pitch in a head
sea. Why, de, if I think you 'd lie-to, at all, with so
much stuff aloft to knock you off to leeward. Come up,
everything, forward; come up everything, my lord, and
bring the mast as near perpendicular as possible. It 's a
hard matter, I find, to make one of your new-fashioned
captains keep things in their places.
Well, now, Sir Gervaise, I think the Achilles makes as
good an appearance as most of the other ships; and as to
travelling or working, I do not know that she is either dull
or clumsy!
She 's pretty well, Morganic, considering how many
Bond-street ideas you have got among you; but she 'll never
do in a head sea, with that fore-top-mast threatening your
knight-heads. So get the mast up-and-down, again, as soon
as convenient, and come and dine with me, without further
invitation, the first fine day we have at sea. I 'm going to
send Parker some brawn; but, I 'll feed
you
on some of
Galleygo's turtle-soup, made out of pig's heads.
Thank 'ee, Sir Gervaise; we 'll endeavour to straighten
the stick, since you
will
have it so; though, I confess I get
tired of seeing everything to-day, just as we had it
yesterday
.
Yesyesthat 's the way with most of them St. James
cruisers, continued the vice-admiral, as he rowed away.
They want a fashionable tailor to rig a man-of-war, as
they are rigged themselves. There 's my old friend and
neighbour, Lord Scuppertonhe 's taken a fancy to
yachting
,
lately, and when his new brig was put into the water,
Lady Scupperton made him send for an upholsterer from
town to fit out the cabin; and when the blackguard had
surveyed
the unfortunate craft, as if it were a country box,
what does he do but give an opinion, that `this here edifice,
my lord, in my judgment, should be furnished in cottage
style,'the vagabond!
This story, which was not particularly original, for Sir
Gervaise himself had told it at least a dozen times before,
put the admiral in a good humour, and he found no more
fault with his captains, until he reached the Plantagenet.
Daly, said the Earl of Morganic to his first lieutenant,
an experienced old Irishman of fifty, who still sung a good
song and told a good story, and what was a little
extraordinary
for either of these accomplishments, knew how to take
good care of a ship;Daly, I suppose we must humour
the old gentleman, or he 'll be quarantining me, and that I
shouldn't particularly like on the eve of a general action;
so we 'll ease off forward, and set up the strings aft, again.
Hang me if I think he could find it out if we didn't, so long
as we kept dead in his wake!
That wouldn't be a very safe desait for Sir Jarvy, my
lord, for he 's a wonderful eye for a rope! Were it Admiral
Blue, now, I 'd engage to cruise in his company for a week,
with my mizzen-mast stowed in the hold, and there should
be no bother about the novelty, at all; quite likely he 'd be
hailing us, and ask `what brig 's that?' But none of these
tricks will answer with t'other, who misses the whipping off
the end of a gasket, as soon as any first luff of us all. And
so I 'll just go about the business in earnest; get the
carpenter
up with his plumb-bob, and set everything as straight
up-and-down as the back of a grenadier.
Lord Morganic laughed, as was usual with him when his
lieutenant saw fit to be humorous; and then his caprice in
changing the staying of his masts, as well as the order
which countermanded it, was forgotten.
The arrival of Sir Gervaise on board his own ship was
always an event in the fleet, even though his absence had
lasted no longer than twenty-four hours. The effect was
like that which is produced on a team of high-mettled cattle,
when they feel that the reins are in the hands of an
experienced
and spirited coachman.
Good-morning, Greenly, good-morning to you all,
gentlemen
,
said the vice-admiral, bowing to the quarter-deck
in gross, in return for the `present-arms,' and rattling of
drums, and lowering of hats that greeted his arrival; a
fine day, and it is likely we shall have a fresh breeze.
Captain Greenly, your sprit-sail-yard wants squaring by
the lifts; and, Bunting, make the Thunderer's signal to get
her fore-yard in its place, as soon as possible. She 's had
it down long enough to make a new one, instead of merely
fishing it. Are your boats all aboard, Greenly?
All but your own barge, Sir Gervaise, and that is hooked
on.
In with it, sir; then trip, and we 'll be off. Monsieur
de Vervillin has got some mischief in his head, gentlemen,
and we must go and take it out of him.
These orders were promptly obeyed; but, as the manner
in which the Plantagenet passed out of the fleet, and led the
other ships to sea, has been already related, it is unnecessary
to repeat it. There was the usual bustle, the customary
orderly confusion, the winding of calls, the creaking of
blocks, and the swinging of yards, ere the vessels were in
motion. As the breeze freshened, sail was reduced, as
already related, until, by the time the leading ship was ten
leagues at sea, all were under short canvass, and the
appearance
of a windy, if not a dirty night, had set in. Of
course, all means of communication between the Plantagenet
and the vessels still at anchor, had ceased, except by
sending
signals down the line; but, to those Sir Gervaise had
no recourse, since he was satisfied Bluewater understood his
plans, and he then entertained no manner of doubt of his
friend's willingness to aid them.
Little heed was taken of anything astern, by those on
board the Plantagenet. Every one saw, it is true, that ship
followed ship in due succession, as long as the movements
of those in-shore could be perceived at all; but the great
interest centred on the horizon to the southward and
eastward
.
In that quarter of the channel the French were
expected
to appear, for the cause of this sudden departure was
a secret from no one in the fleet. A dozen of the best
look-outs
in the ship were kept aloft the whole afternoon, and
Captain Greenly, himself, sat in the forward-cross-trees,
with a glass, for more than an hour, just as the sun was
setting, in order to sweep the horizon. Two or three sail
were made, it is true, but they all proved to be English
coasters; Guernsey or Jerseymen, standing for ports in the
west of England, most probably laden with prohibited
articles
from the country of the enemy. Whatever may be the
dislike of an Englishman for a Frenchman, he has no
dislike
to the labour of his hands; and there probably has not
been a period since civilization has introduced the art of
smuggling among its other arts, when French brandies, and
laces, and silks, were not exchanged against English
to-bacco
and guineas, and that in a contraband way, let it be
in peace or let it be in war. One of the characteristics of
Sir Gervaise Oakes was to despise all petty means of
annoyance
;
usually he disdained even to turn aside to chase a
smuggler. Fishermen he never molested at all; and, on
the whole, he carried on a marine warfare, a century since,
in a way that some of his successors might have imitated to
advantage in our own times. Like that high-spirited
Irishman
,
Caldwell,
[2]
[2]
The writer believes this noble-minded sailor to have been the late
Admiral Sir Benjamin Caldwell. It is scarcely necessary to say that
the invitation could not be accepted, though quite seriously given.
who conducted a blockade in the
Chesapeake
,
at the commencement of the revolution, with so much
liberality, that his enemies actually sent him an invitation to
a public dinner, Sir Gervaise knew how to distinguish
between
the combatant and the non-combatant, and heartily
disdained all the money-making parts of his profession,
though large sums had fallen into his hands, in this way,
as pure God-sends. No notice was taken, therefore, of
anything that had not a warlike look; the noble old ship
standing steadily on towards the French coast, as the
mastiff
passes the cur, on his way to encounter another animal,
of a mould and courage more worthy of his powers.
Make nothing of 'em, hey! Greenly, said Sir
Gervaise
,
as the captain came down from his perch, in
consequence
of the gathering obscurity of evening, followed by
half-a-dozen lieutenants and midshipmen, who had been
aloft as volunteers. Well, we know they cannot yet be
to the westward of us, and by standing on shall be certain
of heading them off, before this time six months. How
beautifully
all the ships behave, following each other as
accurately
as if Bluewater himself were aboard each vessel to
conn her!
Yes, sir, they do keep the line uncommonly well,
considering
that the tides run in streaks in the channel. I
do
think if we were to drop a hammock overboard, that the
Carnatic would pick it up, although she must be quite four
leagues astern of us.
Let old Parker alone for that! I 'll warrant you,
he
is
never out of the way. Were it Lord Morganic, now, in the
Achilles, I should expect him to be away off here on our
weather-quarter, just to show us how his ship can eat us out
of the wind when he
tries;
or away down yonder, under
our lee, that we might understand how she falls off, when
he
don't
try.
My lord is a gallant officer, and no bad seaman, for his
years, notwithstanding, Sir Gervaise, observed Greenly,
who generally took the part of the absent, whenever his
superior felt disposed to berate them.
I deny neither, Greenly, most particularly the first. I
know very well, were I to signal Morganic to run into Brest,
he 'd do it; but whether he would go in, ring-tail-boom or
jib-boom first, I couldn't tell till I saw it. Now you are a
youngish man yourself, Greenly
Every day of eight-and-thirty, Sir Gervaise, and a few
months to spare; and I care not if the ladies know it.
Poh!They like us old fellows, half the time, as well
as they do the boys. But you are of an age not to feel
time in your bones, and can see the folly of some of our
old-fashioned notions, perhaps; though you are not quite as
likely to understand the fooleries that have come in, in your
own day. Nothing is more absurd than to be
experimenting
on the settled principles of ships. They are machines,
Greenly, and have their laws, just the same as the planets
in the heavens. The idea comes from a fish,head, run,
and helm; and all we have to do is to study the fishes in
order to get the sort of craft we want. If there is occasion
for bulk, take the whale, and you get a round bottom, full
fore-body, and a clean run. When you want speed, models
are plentytake the dolphin, for instance,and there you
find an entrance, like a wedge, a lean fore-body, and a run
as clean as this ship's decks. But some of our young
captains
would spoil a dolphin's sailing, if they could breathe
under water, so as to get at the poor devils. Look at their
fancies! The First Lord shall give one of his cousins a
frigate
,
now, that is moulded after nature itself, as one might
say; with a bottom that would put a trout to shame. Well,
one of the first things the lad does, when he gets on board
her, is to lengthen his gaff, perhaps, put a cloth or two in
his mizzen, and call it a spanker, settle away the peak till
it sticks out over his taffrail like a sign-post, and then away
he goes upon a wind, with his helm hard-up, bragging what
a weatherly craft he has, and how hard it is to make her
even
look
to leeward.
I have known such sailors, I must confess, Sir Gervaise;
but time cures them of that folly.
That is to be hoped; for what would a man think of a
fish to which nature had fitted a tail athwart-ships, and which
was obliged to carry a fin, like a lee-board, under its
lee-jaw
,
to prevent falling off dead before the wind!
Here Sir Gervaise laughed heartily at the picture of the
awkward creature to which his own imagination had given
birth; Greenly joining in the merriment, partly from the
oddity of the conceit, and partly from the docility with which
a commander-in-chief's jokes are usually received. The
Vol. II.  7
feeling of momentary indignation which had aroused Sir
Gervaise to such an expression of his disgust at modern
innovations
,
was appeased by this little success; and, inviting
his captain to sup with him,a substitute for a dinner,he
led the way below in high good-humour, Galleygo having
just announced that the table was ready.
The
convives
on this occasion were merely the admiral
himself, Greenly, and Atwood. The fare was substantial,
rather than scientific; but the service was rich; Sir
Gervaise
uniformly eating off of plate. In addition to Galleygo,
no less than five domestics attended to the wants of the
party. As a ship of the Plantagenet's size was reasonably
steady at all times, a gale of wind excepted, when the lamps
and candles were lighted, and the group was arranged, aided
by the admixture of rich furniture with frowning artillery
and the other appliances of war, the great cabin of the
Plantagenet
was not without a certain air of rude magnificence.
Sir Gervaise kept no less than three servants in livery, as
a part of his personal establishment, tolerating Galleygo,
and one or two more of the same stamp, as a homage due
to Neptune.
The situation not being novel to either of the party, and
the day's work having been severe, the first twenty minutes
were pretty studiously devoted to the duty of restoration,
as it is termed by the great masters of the science of the
table. By the end of that time, however, the glass began to
circulate, though moderately, and with it tongues to loosen.
Your health, Captain GreenlyAtwood, I remember
you, said the vice-admiral, nodding his head familiarly to
his two guests, on the eve of tossing off a glass of sherry.
These Spanish wines go directly to the heart, and I only
wonder why a people who can make them, don't make better
sailors.
In the days of Columbus, the Spaniards had something
to boast of in that way, too, Sir Gervaise, Atwood
remarked
.
Ay, but that was a long time ago, and they have got
bravely over it. I account for the deficiencies of both the
French and Spanish marines something in this way, Greenly.
Columbus, and the discovery of America, brought ships and
sailors into fashion. But a ship without an officer fit to
command her, is like a body without a soul. Fashion,
however
,
brought your young nobles into their services, and
men were given vessels because their fathers were dukes
and counts, and not because they knew anything about
them.
Is our own service entirely free from this sort of
favouritism
?
quietly demanded the captain.
Far from it, Greenly; else would not Morganic been
made a captain at twenty, and old Parker, for instance, one
only at fifty. But, somehow, our classes slide into each
other, in a way that neutralizes, in a great degree, the effect
of birth. Is it not so, Atwood?
Some
of our classes, Sir Gervaise, manage to
slide
into
all the best places, if the truth must be said.
Well, that is pretty bold for a Scotchman! rejoined the
vice-admiral, good-humouredly. Ever since the accession
of the house of Stuart, we 've built a bridge across the Tweed
that lets people pass in only one direction. I make no
doubt this Pretender's son will bring down half Scotland at
his heels, to fill all the berths they may fancy suitable to
their merits. It 's an easy way of paying bounty
promises
.
This affair in the north, they tell me, seems a little
serious, said Greenly. I believe this is Mr. Atwood's
opinion?
You 'll find it serious enough, if Sir Gervaise's notion
about the bounty be true, answered the immovable
secretary
.
Scotia is a small country, but it 's well filled with
`braw sperits,' if there 's an opening for them to prove it.
Well, well, this war between England and Scotland is
out of place, while we have the French and Spaniards on
our hands. Most extraordinary scenes have we had ashore,
yonder, Greenly, with an old Devonshire baronet, who
slipped and is off for the other world, while we were in his
house.
Magrath has told me something of it, sir; and he tells
me the
fill-us null-us
hang me if I can make out his
gibberish
,
five minutes after it was told to me.
Filius nullius
, you mean; nobody's babythe son of
nobodyhave you forgotten your Latin, man?
Faith, Sir Gervaise, I never had any to forget. My
father was a captain of a man-of-war before me, and he
kept me afloat from the time I was five, down to the day of
his death; Latin was no part of my spoon-meat.
Ayaymy good fellow, I knew your father, and was
in the third ship from him, in the action in which he fell,
returned the vice-admiral, kindly. Bluewater was just
ahead of him, and we all loved him, as we did an elder
brother. You were not promoted, then.
No, sir, I was only a midshipman, and didn't happen
to be in his own ship that day, answered Greenly, sensibly
touched with this tribute to his parent's merit; but I was
old enough to remember how nobly you all behaved on the
occasion. Well,slily brushing his eye with his hand,
Latin may do a schoolmaster good, but it is of little use
on board ship. I never had but one scholar among all my
cronies and intimates.
And who was he, Greenly? You shouldn't despise
knowledge, because you don't understand it. I dare say
your intimate was none the worse for a little Latinenough
to go through
nullus, nulla, nullum
, for instance. Who was
this intimate, Greenly?
John Bluewaterhandsome Jack, as he was called; the
younger brother of the admiral. They sent him to sea, to
keep him out of harm's way in some love affair; and you
may remember that while he was with the admiral, or
Captain
Bluewater, as he was then, I was one of the lieutenants.
Although poor Jack was a soldier and in the guards, and he
was four or five years my senior, he took a fancy to me,
and we became intimate.
He
understood Latin, better than
he did his own interests.
In what did he fail?Bluewater was never very
communicative
to me about that brother.
There was a private marriage, and cross guardians, and
the usual difficulties. In the midst of it all, poor John fell
in battle, as you know, and his widow followed him to the
grave, within a month or two. 'T was a sad story all
round, and I try to think of it as little as possible.
A private marriage! repeated Sir Gervaise, slowly.
Are you quite sure of
that?
I don't think Bluewater is
aware of that circumstance; at least, I never heard him
allude to it. Could there have been any issue?
No one can know it better than myself, as I helped to
get the lady off, and was present at the ceremony. That
much I
know
. Of issue, I should think there was none;
though the colonel lived a year after the marriage. How
far the admiral is familiar with all these circumstances I
cannot say, as one would not like to introduce the
particulars
of a private marriage of a deceased brother, to his
commanding
officer.
I am glad there was no issue, Greenlyparticular
circumstances
make me glad of that. But we will change the
discourse, as these family disasters make one melancholy;
and a melancholy dinner is like ingratitude to Him who
bestows it.
The conversation now grew general, and in due season,
in common with the feast, it ended. After sitting the usual
time, the guests retired. Sir Gervaise then went on deck,
and paced the poop for an hour, looking anxiously ahead, in
quest of the French signals; and, failing of discovering them,
he was fain to seek his berth out of sheer fatigue. Before he
did this, however, the necessary orders were given; and that
to call him, should anything out of the common track occur,
was repeated no less than four times.
CHAPTER VI.
Roll on, thou deep and dark-blue oceanroll!
Ten thousand fleets sweep over thee in vain;
Man marks the earth with ruinhis control
Stops with the shore;upon the wat'ry plain
The wrecks are all thy deed.
Childe Harold
.
It
was broad day-light, when Sir Gervaise Oakes next
appeared on deck. As the scene then offered to his view, as
well as the impression it made on his mind, will sufficiently
explain to the reader the state of affairs, some six hours later
7 *
than the time last included in our account, we refer him to
those for his own impressions. The wind now blew a real
gale, though the season of the year rendered it less
unpleasant
to the feelings than is usual with wintry tempests. The
air was even bland, and still charged with the moisture of
the ocean; though it came sweeping athwart sheets of foam,
with a fury, at moments, which threatened to carry the
entire summits of waves miles from their beds, in spray.
Even the aquatic birds seemed to be terrified, in the instants
of the greatest power of the winds, actually wheeling
suddenly
on their wings, and plunging into the element beneath
to seek protection from the maddened efforts of that to which
they more properly belonged.
Still, Sir Gervaise saw that his ships bore up nobly
against the fierce strife. Each vessel showed the same
canvass
;
viz.a reefed fore-sail; a small triangular piece of
strong, heavy cloth, fitted between the end of the bowsprit
and the head of the fore-top-mast; a similar sail over the
quarter-deck, between the mizzen and main masts, and a
close-reefed main-top-sail. Several times that morning,
Captain Greenly had thought he should be compelled to
substitute
a lower surface to the wind than that of the sail last
mentioned. As it was an important auxiliary, however, in
steadying the ship, and in keeping her under the command
of her helm, on each occasion the order had been delayed,
until he now began to question whether the canvass could
be reduced, without too great a risk to the men whom it
would be necessary to send aloft. He had decided to let it
stand or blow away, as fortune might decide. Similar
reasoning
left nearly all the other vessels under precisely the
same canvass.
The ships of the vice-admiral's division had closed in the
night, agreeably to an order given before quitting the
anchorage
,
which had directed them to come within the usual
sailing distance, in the event of the weather's menacing a
separation. This command had been obeyed by the ships
astern carrying sail hard, long after the leading vessels had
been eased by reducing their canvass. The order of sailing
was the Plantagenet in the van, and the Carnatic, Achilles,
Thunderer, Blenheim, and Warspite's following, in the order
named; some changes having been made in the night, in
order to bring the ships of the division into their
fighting-stations
,
in a line ahead, the vice-admiral leading. The
superiority of the Plantagenet was a little apparent,
notwithstanding
;
the Carnatic alone, and that only by means of the
most careful watching, being able to keep literally in the
commander-in-chief's wake; all the other vessels gradually
but almost imperceptibly setting to leeward of it. These
several circumstances struck Sir Gervaise, the moment his
foot touched the poop, where he found Greenly keeping an
anxious look-out on the state of the weather and the
condition
of his own ship; leaning at the same time, against the
spanker-boom to steady himself in the gusts of the gale.
The vice-admiral braced his own well-knit and compact
frame, by spreading his legs, and then he turned his
handsome
but weather-beaten face towards the line, scanning
each ship in succession, as she lay over to the wind, and
came wallowing on, shoving aside vast mounds of water
with her bows, her masts describing short arcs in the air,
and her hull rolling to windward, and then lurching, as if
boring her way through the ocean. Galleygo, who never
regarded himself as a steward in a gale of wind, was the
only other person on the poop, whither he went at pleasure
by a sort of imprescriptible right.
Well done, old Planter! cried Sir Gervaise, heartily,
as soon as his eye had taken in the leading peculiarities of
the view. You see, Greenly, she has everybody but old
Parker to leeward, and she would have him there, too, but
he would carry every stick he has, out of the Carnatic,
rather than not keep his berth. Look at Master Morganic;
he has his main course close-reefed on the Achilles, to luff
into his station, and I 'll warrant you will get a good six
months' wear out of that ship in this one gale; loosening
her knees, and jerking her spars like so many whip-handles;
and all for love of the new fashion of rigging an English
two-decker like an Algerine xebec! Well, let him tug his
way up to windward, Bond-street fashion, if he likes the fun.
What has become of the Chloe, Greenly?
Here she is, sir, quite a league on our lee-bow, looking
out, according to orders.
Ay, that is her work, and she 'll do it effectually.But
I don't see the Driver!
She 's dead ahead, sir, answered Greenly, smiling;
her
orders being rather more difficult of execution. Her
station would be off yonder to windward, half a league ahead
of us; but it 's no easy matter to get into that position, Sir
Gervaise, when the Plantagenet is really in earnest.
Sir Gervaise laughed, and rubbed his hands, and then he
turned to look for the Active, the only other vessel of his
division. This little cutter was dancing over the seas, half
the time under water, notwithstanding, under the head of
her mainsail, broad off, on the admiral's weather-beam;
finding no difficulty in maintaining her station there, in the
absence of all top-hamper, and favoured by the lowness of
her hull. After this he glanced upward at the sails and
spars of the Plantagenet, which he studied closely.
No signs of
de Vervillin
, hey, Greenly! the admiral
asked, when his survey of the whole fleet had ended. I
was in hopes we might see something of
him
, when the light
returned this morning.
Perhaps it is quite as well as it is, Sir Gervaise,
returned
the captain. We could do little besides look at
each other, in this gale, and then Admiral Bluewater ought
to join before I should like even to do
that
.
Think you so, Master Greenly!There you are
mistaken
,
then; for I 'd lie by him, were I alone in this ship,
that I might know where he was to be found as soon as the
weather would permit us to having something to say to him.
These words were scarcely uttered, when the look-out in
the forward cross-trees, shouted at the top of his voice,
sail-ho! At the next instant the Chloe fired a gun, the
report of which was just heard amid the roaring of the gale,
though the smoke was distinctly seen floating above the
mists of the ocean; and she set a signal at her naked
mizzen-top-gallant-mast-head
.
Run below, young gentleman, said the vice-admiral,
advancing to the break of the poop and speaking to a
midshipman
on the quarter-deck; and desire Mr. Bunting to
make his appearance. The Chloe signals ustell him not
to look for his knee-buckles.
A century since, the last injunction, though still so much
in use on ship-board, was far more literal than it is to-day,
nearly all classes of men possessing the articles in question,
though not invariably wearing them when at sea. The
midshipman dove below, however, as soon as the words
were out of his superior's mouth; and, in a very few
minutes
,
Bunting appeared, having actually stopped on the
main-deck ladder to assume his coat, lest he might too
unceremoniously
invade the sacred precincts of the
quarter-deck
,
in his shirt-sleeves.
There it is, Bunting, said Sir Gervaise, handing the
lieutenant the glass; two hundred and twenty-seven`a
large sail ahead,' if I remember right.
No, Sir Gervaise, `
sails
ahead;' the number of them
to follow. Hoist the answering flag, quarter-master.
So much the better! So much the better, Bunting!
The number to follow?Well,
we 'll
follow the number,
let it be greater or smaller. Come, sirrah, bear a hand up
with your answering flag.
The usual signal that the message was understood was
now run up between the masts, and instantly hauled down
again, the flags seen in the Chloe descending at the same
moment.
Now for the number of the sails, ahead, said Sir
Gervaise
,
as he, Greenly, and Bunting, each levelled a glass at
the frigate, on board which the next signal was momentarily
expected. Eleven, by George!
No, Sir Gervaise, exclaimed Greenly, I know better
than
that
. Red above, and blue beneath, with the
distinguishing
pennant
beneath
, make
fourteen
, in our books,
now!
Well, sir, if they are
forty
, we 'll go nearer and see of
what sort of stuff they are made. Show your answering
flag, Bunting, that we may know what else the Chloe has to
tell us.
This was done, the frigate hauling down her signals in
haste, and showing a new set as soon as possible.
What now, Bunting?what now, Greenly? demanded
Sir Gervaise, a sea having struck the side of the ship and
thrown so much spray into his face as to reduce him to the
necessity of using his pocket-handkerchief, at the very
moment
he was anxious to be looking through his glass.
What do you make of
that
, gentlemen?
I make out the number to be 382, answered Greenly;
but what it means, I know not.
`Strange sails,
enemies
, read Bunting from the book.
Show the answer, quarter-master.
We hardly wanted a signal for
that
, Greenly, since
there can be no friendly force, hereaway; and fourteen sail,
on this coast, always means mischief. What says the Chloe
next?
`Strange sails on the larboard tack, heading as
follows
.'
By George, crossing our course!We shall soon see
them from deck. Do the ships astern notice the signals?
Every one of them, Sir Gervaise, answered the
captain
;
the Thunderer has just lowered her answering flag,
and the Active is repeating. I have never seen
quarter-masters
so nimble!
So much the better  so much the better  down he
comes; stand by for another.
After the necessary pause, the signal to denote the point
of the compass was shown from the Chloe.
Heading how, Bunting? the vice-admiral eagerly
inquired
.
Heading how, sir?
North-west-and-by-north, or as Bunting pronounced it,
nor-west-and-by-noathe, I believe sir,no, I am mistaken,
Sir Gervaise; it is nor-nor-west.
Jammed up like ourselves, hard on a wind! This gale
comes directly in from the broad Atlantic, and one party is
crossing over to the north and the other to the south shore.
We
must
meet, unless one of us run awayhey! Greenly?
True enough, Sir Gervaise; though fourteen sail is
rather an awkward odds for seven.
You forget the Driver and Active, sir; we've
nine;
nine hearty, substantial British cruisers.
To wit: six ships of the line, one frigate, a
sloop
, and a
cutter
, laying heavy emphasis on the two last classes of
vessels.
What does the Chloe say now, Bunting? That we 're
enough for the French, although they
are
two to one?
Not exactly that, I believe, Sir Gervaise. `Five more
sail, ahead.' They increase fast, sir.
Ay, at that rate, they may indeed grow too strong for
us, answered Sir Gervaise, with more coolness of manner;
nineteen to nine are rather heavy odds. I wish we had
Bluewater here?
That is what I was about to suggest, Sir Gervaise,
observed
the captain. If we had the other division, as some
of the Frenchmen are probably frigates and corvettes, we
might do better. Admiral Bluewater cannot be far from us;
somewhere down here, towards north-eastor nor-nor-east.
By waring round, I think we should make his division in
the course of a couple of hours.
What, and leave to Monsieur de Vervillin the advantage
of swearing he frightened us away! NonoGreenly;
we will first
pass
him fairly and manfully, and that, too,
within reach of shot; and then it will be time enough to go
round and look after our friends.
Will not that be putting the French exactly between our
two divisions, Sir Gervaise, and give him the advantage of
dividing our force. If he stand far, on a nor-nor-west
course, I think he will infallibly get between us and Admiral
Bluewater.
And what will he gain by that, Greenly?What,
according
to your notions of matters and things, will be the
great advantage of having an English fleet on each side of
him!
Not much, certainly, Sir Gervaise, answered Greenly,
laughing; if these fleets were at all equal to his own. But
as they will be much inferior to him, the Comte may manage
to close with one division, while the other is so far off as to
be unable to assist; and one hour of a hot fire may dispose
of the victory.
All this is apparent enough, Greenly, and yet I could
hardly brook letting the enemy go scatheless. So long as
it blows as it does now, there will not be much fighting;
and there can be no harm in taking a near look at Mr. de
Vervillin. In half an hour, or an hour at most, we must
get a sight of him from off deck, even with this slow
headway
of the two fleets. Let them heave the log, and
ascertain
how fast we go, sir.
Should we engage the French in such weather, Sir
Gervaise
,
answered Greenly, after giving the order just
mentioned
;
it would be giving them the very advantage they
like. They usually fire at the spars, and one shot would
do more mischief, with such a strain on the masts, than
half-a-dozen in a moderate blow.
That will do, Greenlythat will do, said the
vice-admiral
,
impatiently; if I didn't so well know you, and
hadn't seen you so often engaged, I should think you were
afraid of these nineteen sail. You have lectured long enough
to render me prudent, and we 'll say no more.
Here Sir Gervaise turned on his heel, and began to pace
the poop, for he was slightly vexed, though not angered.
Such little dialogues often occurred between him and his
captain, the latter knowing that his commander's greatest
professional failing was excess of daring, while he felt that
his own reputation was too well established to be afraid to
inculcate prudence. Next to the honour of the flag, and
his own perhaps, Greenly felt the greatest interest in that
of Sir Gervaise Oakes, under whom he had served as
midshipman
,
lieutenant, and captain; and this his superior
knew, a circumstance that would have excused far greater
liberties. After moving swiftly to and fro several times, the
vice-admiral began to cool, and then he forgot this passing
ebullition of quick feelings. Greenly, on the other hand,
satisfied that the just mind of the commander-in-chief would
not fail to appreciate facts that had been so plainly presented
to it, was content to change the subject. They conversed
together, in a most friendly manner, Sir Gervaise being even
unusually frank and communicative, in order to prove he
was not displeased, the matter in discussion being the state
of the ship and the situation of the crew.
You are always ready for battle, Greenly, the
vice-admiral
said, smilingly, in conclusion; when there is a
necessity; and always just as ready to point out the
inexpediency
of engaging, where you fancy nothing is to be
gained by it. You would not have me run away from a
shadow, however; or a signal; and that is much the same
thing: so we will stand on, until we make the Frenchmen
fairly from off-deck, when it will be time enough to
determine
what shall come next.
Sail-ho! shouted one of the look-outs from aloft, a cry
that immediately drew all eyes towards the
mizzen-top-mast-cross-trees
,
whence the sound proceeded.
The wind blew too fresh to render conversation, even by
means of a trumpet, easy, and the man was ordered down
to give an account of what he had seen. Of course he first
touched the poop-deck, where he was met by the admiral
and captain, the officer of the watch, to whom he properly
belonged, giving him up to the examination of his two
superiors
,
without a grimace.
Where-away is the sail you 've seen, sir? demanded
Sir Gervaise a little sharply, for he suspected it was no
more than one of the ships ahead, already signalled. Down
yonder to the southward and eastwardhey! sirrah?
No, Sir Jarvy, answered the top-man, hitching his
trowsers with one hand, and smoothing the hair on his
forehead
with the other; but out here, to the nor'ard and
west'ard, on our weather-quarter. It's none o' them French
chaps as is with the County of Fairvillian,for so all the
common men of the fleet believed their gallant enemy to be
rightly named,but is a square-rigged craft by herself,
jammed up on a wind, pretty much like all on us.
That alters the matter, Greenly! How do you know
she is square-rigged, my man?
Why, Sir Jarvy, your honour, she 's under her fore
and main-taw-sails, close-reefed, with a bit of the mainsail
set, as well as I can make it out, sir.
The devil she is! It must be some fellow in a great
hurry, to carry that canvass in this blow! Can it be
possible
,
Greenly, that the leading vessel of Bluewater is heaving
in sight?
I rather think not, Sir Gervaise; it would be too far to
windward for any of his two-deckers. It may turn out to
be a look-out ship of the French, got round on the other
tack to keep her station, and carrying sail hard, because
she dislikes our appearance.
In that case she must claw well to windward to escape
us! What's your name, my ladTom Davis, if I 'm not
mistaken?
No, Sir Jarvy, it 's Jack Brown; which is much the
same, your honour. We 's no ways partic'lar about names.
Well, Jack, does it blow hard aloft? So as to give you
any trouble in holding on?
Nothing to speak on, Sir Jarvy. A'ter cruising a winter
Vol. II.  8
and spring in the Bay of Biscay, I looks on this as no more
nor a puff. Half a hand will keep a fellow in his berth,
aloft.
Galleygo take Jack Brown below to my cabin, and
give him a fresh nip in his jiggerhe 'll hold on all the
better for it.
This was Sir Gervaise's mode of atoning for the error
in doing the man injustice, by supposing he was mistaken
about the new sail, and Jack Brown went aloft devoted to
the commander-in-chief. It costs the great and powerful so
little to become popular, that one is sometimes surprised to
find that any are otherwise; but, when we remember that
it is also their duty to be just, astonishment ceases; justice
being precisely the quality to which a large portion of the
human race are most averse.
Half an hour passed, and no further reports were received
from aloft. In a few minutes, however, the Warspite
signalled
the admiral, to report the stranger on her
weather-quarter
,
and, not long after, the Active did the same. Still
neither told his character; and the course being substantially
the same, the unknown ship approached but slowly,
notwithstanding
the unusual quantity of sail she had set. At
the end of the period mentioned, the vessels in the
south-eastern
board began to be visible from the deck. The ocean
was so white with foam, that it was not easy to distinguish
a ship, under short canvass, at any great distance; but, by
the aid of glasses, both Sir Gervaise and Greenly satisfied
themselves that the number of the enemy at the southward
amounted to just twenty; one more having hove in sight,
and been signalled by the Chloe, since her first report.
Several of these vessels, however, were small; and, the
vice-admiral, after a long and anxious survey, lowered his
glass and turned to his captain in order to compare opinions.
Well, Greenly, he asked, what do you make of
them, now?According to my reckoning, there are thirteen
of the line, two frigates, four corvettes, and a lugger; or
twenty sail in all.
There can be no doubt of the twenty sail, Sir Gervaise,
though the vessels astern are still too distant to speak of
their size. I rather think it will turn out
fourteen
of the
line and only three frigates.
That is rather too much for us, certainly, without
Bluewater
.
His five ships, now, and this westerly position,
would make a cheering prospect for us. We might stick by
Mr. de Vervillin until it moderated, and then pay our
respects
to him. What do you say to
that
, Greenly?
That it is of no great moment, Sir Gervaise, so long as
the other division is
not
with us. But yonder are signals
flying on board the Active, the Warspite, and the Blenheim.
Ay, they 've something to tell us of the chap astern and
to windward. Come, Bunting, give us the news.
`Stranger in the northwest shows the Druid's
number
;'
the signal-officer read mechanically from the book.
The deuce he does! Then Bluewater cannot be far off.
Let Dick alone for keeping in his proper place; he has an
instinct for a line of battle, and I never knew him fail to be
in the very spot I could wish to have him, looking as much
at home, as if his ships had all been built there! The
Druid's number! The Csar and the rest of them are in a
line ahead, further north, heading up well to windward even
of our own wake. This puts the Comte fairly under our
lee.
But Greenly was far from being of a temperament as
sanguine as that of the vice-admiral's. He did not like the
circumstance of the Druid's being alone visible, and she,
too, under what in so heavy a gale, might be deemed a press
of canvass. There was no apparent reason for the
division's
carrying sail so hard, while the frigate would be
obliged to do it, did she wish to overtake vessels like the
Plantagenet and her consorts. He suggested, therefore, the
probability that the ship was alone, and that her object might
be to speak them.
There is something in what you say, Greenly,
answered
Sir Gervaise, after a minute's reflection; and we
must look into it. If Denham doesn't give us anything new
from the Count to change our plans, it may be well to learn
what the Druid is after.
Denham was the commander of the Chloe, which ship,
a neat six-and-thirty, was pitching into the heavy seas that
now came rolling in heavily from the broad Atlantic, the
water streaming from her hawse-holes, as she rose from
each plunge, like the spouts of a whale. This vessel, it
has been stated, was fully a league ahead and to leeward of
the Plantagenet, and consequently so much nearer to the
French, who were approaching from that precise quarter of
the ocean, in a long single line, like that of the English; a
little relieved, however, by the look-out vessels, all of which,
in their case, were sailing along on the weather-beam of
their friends. The distance was still so great, as to render
glasses necessary in getting any very accurate notions of the
force and the point of sailing of Monsieur de Vervillin's
fleet, the ships astern being yet so remote as to require long
practice to speak with any certainty of their characters. In
nothing, notwithstanding, was the superior practical
seamanship
of the English more apparent, than in the manner in
which these respective lines were formed. That of Sir
Gervaise
Oakes was compact, each ship being as near as might
be a cable's-length distant from her seconds ahead and
astern. This was a point on which the vice-admiral prided
himself; and by compelling his captains rigidly to respect
their line of sailing, and by keeping the same ships and
officers, as much as possible, under his orders, each captain
of the fleet had got to know his own vessel's rate of speed,
and all the other qualities that were necessary to maintain
her precise position. All the ships being weatherly, though
some, in a slight degree, were more so than others, it was
easy to keep the line in weather like the present, the wind
not blowing sufficiently hard to render a few cloths more or
less of canvass of any very great moment. If there was
a vessel sensibly out of her place, in the entire line, it was
the Achilles; Lord Morganic not having had time to get all
his forward spars as far aft as they should have been; a
circumstance that had knocked him off a little more than
had happened to the other vessels. Nevertheless, had an
air-line been drawn at this moment, from the mizzen-top of
the Plantagenet to that of the Warspite, it would have been
found to pass through the spars of quite half the intermediate
vessels, and no one of them all would have been a pistol-shot
out of the way. As there were six intervals between the
vessels, and each interval as near as could be guessed at
was a cable's-length, the extent of the whole line a little
exceeded three-quarters of a mile.
On the other hand, the French, though they preserved a
very respectable degree of order, were much less compact,
and by no means as methodical in their manner of sailing.
Some of their ships were a quarter of a mile to leeward of
the line, and the intervals were irregular and ill-observed.
These circumstances arose from several causes, neither of
which proceeded from any fault in the commander-in-chief,
who was both an experienced seaman and a skilful tactician.
But his captains were new to each other, and some of them
were recently appointed to their ships; it being just as much
a matter of course that a seaman should ascertain the
qualities
of his vessel, by familiarity, as that a man should learn
the character of his wife, in the intimacy of wedlock.
At the precise moment of which we are now writing, the
Chloe might have been about a league from the leading
vessel of the enemy, and her position to leeward of her own
fleet threatened to bring her, half an hour later, within
range of the Frenchmen's guns. This fact was apparent to
all in the squadron; still the frigate stood on, having been
placed in that station, and the whole being under the
immediate
supervision of the commander-in-chief.
Denham will have a warm berth of it, sir, should he
stand on much longer, said Greenly, when ten minutes
more had passed, during which the ships had gradually
drawn nearer.
I was hoping he might get between the most weatherly
French frigate and her line, answered Sir Gervaise; when
I think, by edging rapidly away, we could take her alive,
with the Plantagenet.
In which case we might as well clear for action; such
a manuvre being certain to bring on a general
engagement
.
NonoI 'm not quite mad enough for that, Master
Telemachus; but, we can wait a little longer for the chances.
How many flags can you make out among the enemy,
Bunting?
I see but two, Sir Gervaise; one at the fore, and the
other at the mizzen, like our own. I can make out, now,
only twelve ships of the line, too; neither of which is a
three-decker.
So much for rumour; as flagrant a liar as ever wagged
a tongue! Twelve ships on two decks, and eight frigates,
8 *
sloops, and luggers. There can be no great mistake in
this.
I think not, Sir Gervaise; their commander-in-chief is
in the fourth ship from the head of the line. His flag is just
discernible, by means of our best glass. Ay, there goes a
signal, this instant, up at the end of his gaff!
If one could only read French now, Greenly, said the
vice-admiral, smiling; we might get into some of Mr. de
Vervillin's secrets. Perhaps it 's an order to go to quarters
or to clear; look out sharp, Bunting, for any signs of such
a movement. What do you make of it?
It 's to the frigates, Sir Gervaise; all of which answer,
while the other vessels do not.
We want no French to read that signal, sir, put in
Greenly; the frigates themselves telling us what it means.
Monsieur de Vervillin has no idea of letting the Plantagenet
take anything he has,
alive
.
This was true enough. Just as the captain spoke, the
object of the order was made sufficiently apparent, by all
the light vessels to windward of the French fleet, bearing up
together, until they brought the wind abaft their beams,
when away they glided to leeward, like floating objects that
have suddenly struck a swift current. Before this change
in their course, these frigates and corvettes had been
struggling
along, the seas meeting them on their weather-bows,
at the rate of about two knots, or rather less; whereas, their
speed was now quadrupled, and in a few minutes, the whole
of them had sailed through the different intervals in their
main line, and had formed as before, nearly half a league to
leeward of it. Here, in the event of an action, their principal
duties would have been to succour crippled ships that might
be forced out of their allotted stations during the combat.
All this Sir Gervaise viewed with disgust. He had hoped
his enemy might have presumed on the state of the elements,
and suffered his light vessels to maintain their original
positions
.
It would be a great triumph to us, Greenly, he said,
if Denham could pass without shifting his berth. There
would be something manly and seamanlike in an inferior
fleet's passing a superior, in such a style.
Yes, sir, though it
might
cost us a fine frigate. The
count can have no difficulty in fighting his weather
main-deck
guns, and a discharge from two or three of his leading
vessels might cut away some spar that Denham would miss
sadly, just at such a moment.
Sir Gervaise placed his hands behind his back, paced the
deck a minute, and then said decidedly
Bunting, make the Chloe's signal to waretacking in
this sea, and under that short canvass, is out of the question.
Bunting had anticipated this order, and had even ventured
clandestinely to direct the quarter-masters to bend on the
necessary flags, and Sir Gervaise had scarcely got the words
out of his mouth, before the signal was abroad. The Chloe
was equally on the alert; for she too each moment expected
the command, and ere her answering flag was seen, her
helm was up, the mizzen-staysail down, and her head falling
off rapidly towards the enemy. This movement seemed to
be expected all roundand it certainly had been delayed to
the very last momentfor the leading French ship fell off
three or four points, and as the frigate was exactly end-on
to her, let fly the contents of all the guns on her forecastle,
as well as of those on her main-deck, as far aft as they could
be brought to bear. One of the top-sail-sheets of the frigate
was shot away by this rapid and unexpected fire, and some
little damage was done to the standing rigging; but, luckily,
none of immediate moment. Captain Denham was active,
and the instant he found his topsail flapping, he ordered it
clewed up, and the mainsail loosed. The latter was set,
close-reefed, as the ship came to the wind on the larboard
tack, and by the time everything was braced up and hauled
aft, on that tack, the main-top-sail was ready to be sheeted
home, anew. During the few minutes that these evolutions
required, Sir Gervaise kept his eye riveted on the vessel;
and when he saw her fairly round, and trimmed by the
wind, again, with the mainsail dragging her ahead, to own
the truth, he felt mentally relieved.
Not a minute too soon, Sir Gervaise, observed the
cautious Greenly, smiling. I should not be surprised if
Denham hears more from that fellow at the head of the
French line. His weather chase-guns are exactly in a range
with the frigate, and the two upper ones might be worked,
well enough.
I think not, Greenly. The forecastle gun, possibly;
scarcely anything below it.
Sir Gervaise proved to be partly right and partly wrong.
The Frenchman
did
attempt a fire with his main-deck gun;
but, at the first plunge of the ship, a sea slapped up against
her weather-bow, and sent a column of water through the
port, that drove half its crew into the lee-scuppers. In the
midst of this water-spout, the gun exploded, the loggerhead
having been applied an instant before, giving a sort of chaotic
wildness to the scene in-board. This satisfied the party
below; though that on the forecastle fared better. The last
fired their gun several times, and always without success.
This failure proceeded from a cause that is seldom sufficiently
estimated by nautical gunners; the shot having swerved
from the line of sight, by the force of the wind against which
it flew, two or three hundred feet, by the time it had gone
the mile that lay between the vessels. Sir Gervaise anxiously
watched the effect of the fire, and perceiving that all the shot
fell to leeward of the Chloe, he was no longer uneasy about
that vessel, and he began to turn his attention to other and
more important concerns.
As we are now approaching a moment when it is
necessary
that the reader should receive some tolerably distinct
impressions of the relative positions of the two entire fleets,
we shall close the present chapter, here; reserving the
duty of explanation for the commencement of a new one.
CHAPTER VII.
All were glad,
And laughed, and shouted, as she darted on,
And plunged amid the foam, and tossed it high,
Over the deck, as when a strong, curbed steed
Flings the froth from him in his eager race.
Percival
.
The
long twilight of a high latitude had now ended, and
the sun, though concealed behind clouds, had risen. The
additional light contributed to lessen the gloomy look of the
ocean, though the fury of the winds and waves still lent to
it a dark and menacing aspect. To windward there were
no signs of an abatement of the gale, while the heavens
continued
to abstain from letting down their floods, on the
raging waters beneath. By this time, the fleet was
materially
to the southward of Cape la Hogue, though far to the
westward, where the channel received the winds and waves
from the whole rake of the Atlantic, and the seas were
setting
in, in the long, regular swells of the ocean, a little
disturbed
by the influence of the tides. Ships as heavy as the
two-deckers moved along with groaning efforts, their
bulk-heads
and timbers complaining, to use the language of
the sea, as the huge masses, loaded with their iron artillery,
rose and sunk on the coming and receding billows. But
their movements were stately and full of majesty; whereas,
the cutter, sloop, and even the frigates, seemed to be tossed
like foam, very much at the mercy of the elements. The
Chloe was passing the admiral, on the opposite tack, quite a
mile to leeward, and yet, as she mounted to the summit of
a wave, her cut-water was often visible nearly to the keel.
These are the trials of a vessel's strength; for, were a ship
always water-borne equally on all her lines, there would not
be the necessity which now exists to make her the well-knit
mass of wood and iron she is.
The progress of the two fleets was very much the same,
both squadrons struggling along through the billows, at the
rate of about a marine league in the hour. As no lofty sail
was carried, and the vessels were first made in the haze of a
clouded morning, the ships had not become visible to each
other until nearer than common; and, by the time at which
we have now arrived in our tale, the leading vessels were
separated
by a space that did not exceed two miles, estimating
the distance only on their respective lines of sailing; though
there would be about the same space between them when
abreast, the English being so much to windward of their
enemies
.
Any one in the least familiar with nautical
manuvres
will understand that these circumstances would bring
the van of the French and the rear of their foes much nearer
together in passing, both fleets being close-hauled.
Sir Gervaise Oakes, as a matter of course, watched the
progress of the two lines with close and intelligent attention.
Mons. de Vervillin did the same from the poop of le
Foudroyant
,
a noble eighty-gun ship in which his flag of
vice-amiral
was flying, as it might be, in defiance. By the
side of the former stood Greenly, Bunting, and Bury, the
Plantagenet's first lieutenant; by the side of the latter his
capitaine de vaisseau, a man as little like the caricatures of
such officers, as a hostile feeling has laid before the readers
of English literature, as Washington was like the man held
up to odium in the London journals, at the commencement
of the great American war. M. de Vervillin himself was
a man of respectable birth, of a scientific education, and of
great familiarity with ships, so far as a knowledge of their
general powers and principles was concerned; but here his
professional excellence ceased, all that infinity of detail
which composes the distinctive merit of the practical seaman
being, in a great degree, unknown to him, rendering it
necessary
for him to
think
in moments of emergency; periods
when the really prime mariner seems more to act by a sort
of
instinct
than by any very intelligible process of
ratiocination
.
With his fleet drawn out before him, however, and
with no unusual demands on his resources, this gallant
officer
was an exceedingly formidable foe to contend with in
squadron.
Sir Gervaise Oakes lost all his constitutional and feverish
impatience while the fleets drew nigher and nigher. As is
not unusual with brave men, who are naturally excitable,
as the crisis approached he grew calmer, and obtained a
more perfect command over himself; seeing all things in
their true colours, and feeling more and more equal to
control
them. He continued to walk the poop, but it was with a
slower step; and, though his hands were still closed behind
his back, the fingers were passive, while his countenance
became grave and his eye thoughtful. Greenly knew that
his interference would now be hazardous; for whenever the
vice-admiral assumed that air, he literally became
commander-in-chief
;
and any attempt to control or influence him,
unless sustained by the communication of new facts, could
only draw down resentment on his own head. Bunting, too,
was aware that the admiral was aboard, as the officers,
among themselves, used to describe this state of their
superior's
mind, and was prepared to discharge his own duty in
the most silent and rapid manner in his power. All the
others present felt more or less of this same influence of an
established character.
Mr.
Bunting, said Sir Gervaise, when the distance
between the Plantagenet and le Tmraire, the leading
French vessel, might have been about a league, allowing for
the difference in the respective lines of sailing
Mr.
Bunting
,
bend on the signal for the ships to go to quarters. We
may as well be ready for any turn of the dice.
No one dared to comment on this order: it was obeyed in
readiness and silence.
Signal ready, Sir Gervaise, said Bunting, the instant
the last flag was in its place.
Run it up at once, sir, and have a bright look-out for
the answers. Captain Greenly, go to quarters, and see all
clear on the main-deck, to use the batteries if wanted. The
people can stand fast below, as I think it might be
dangerous
to open the ports.
Captain Greenly passed off the poop to the quarter-deck,
and in a minute the drum and fife struck up the air which
is known all over the civilized world as the call to arms.
In most services this summons is made by the drum alone,
which emits sounds to which the fancy has attached
peculiar
words; those of the soldiers of France being
prend
ton sacprend ton sacprend ton sac
, no bad
representatives
of the meaning; but in English and American ships,
this appeal is usually made in company with the notes of the
ear-piercing fife, which gives it a melody that might
otherwise be wanting.
Signal answered throughout the fleet, Sir Gervaise,
said Bunting.
No answer was given to this report beyond a quiet
inclination
of the head. After a moment's pause, however, the
vice-admiral turned to his signal officer and said
I should think, Bunting, no captain can need an order
to tell him
not
to open his lee-lower-deck ports in such a sea
as this?
I rather fancy not, Sir Gervaise, answered Bunting,
looking drolly at the boiling element that gushed up each
minute from beneath the bottom of the ship, in a way to
appear as high as the hammock-cloths. The people at
the
main
-deck guns would have rather a wet time of it.
Bend on the signal, sir, for the ships astern to keep in
the vice-admiral's wake. Young gentleman, to the
midshipman
who always acted as his aid in battle, tell Captain
Greenly I desire to see him as soon as he has received all
the reports.
Down to the moment when the first tap of the drum was
heard, the Plantagenet had presented a scene of singular
quiet and unconcern, considering the circumstances in which
she was placed. A landsman would scarcely credit that
men could be so near their enemies, and display so much
indifference to their vicinity; but this was the result of long
habit, and a certain marine instinct that tells the sailor when
anything serious is in the wind, and when not. The
difference
in the force of the two fleets, the heavy gale, and
the weatherly position of the English, all conspired to assure
the crew that nothing decisive could yet occur. Here and
there an officer or an old seaman might be seen glancing
through a port, to ascertain the force and position of the
French; but, on the whole, their fleet excited little more
attention
than if lying at anchor in Cherbourg. The
breakfast
hour was approaching, and that important event
monopolized
the principal interest of the moment. The officers'
boys, in particular, began to make their appearance around
the galley, provided, as usual, with their pots and dishes,
and, now and then, one cast a careless glance through the
nearest opening to see how the strangers looked; but as to
warfare, there was much more the appearance of it between
the protectors of the rights of the different messes, than
between
the two great belligerent navies themselves.
Nor was the state of things materially different in the
gun-room, or cock-pit, or on the orlops. Most of the people
of a two-decked ship are berthed on the lower gun-deck, and
the order to clear ship is more necessary to a vessel of
that construction, before going to quarters seriously, than to
smaller craft; though it is usual in all. So long as the
bags, mess-chests, and other similar appliances were left in
their ordinary positions, Jack saw little reason to derange
himself; and as reports were brought below, from time to
time, respecting the approach of the enemy, and more
especially
of his being well to leeward, few of those whose duty
did not call them on deck troubled themselves about the
matter
at all. This habit of considering his fortune as attached
to that of his ship, and of regarding himself as a point on
her mass, as we all look on ourselves as particles of the orb
we accompany in its revolutions, is sufficiently general
among mariners; but it was particularly so as respects the
sailors of a fleet, who were kept so much at sea, and who
had been so often, with all sorts of results, in the presence
of the enemy. The scene that was passing in the gun-room
at the precise moment at which our tale has arrived, was
so characteristic, in particular, as to merit a brief
description
.
All the idlers by this time were out of their berths and
cotts; the signs of those who slept in the country, as it
is termed, or who were obliged, for want of state-rooms, to
sling in the common apartment, having disappeared.
Magrath
was reading a treatise on medicine, in good Leyden
Latin, by a lamp. The purser was endeavouring to decipher
his steward's hieroglyphics, favoured by the same light, and
the captain of marines was examining the lock of an aged
musket. The third and fourth lieutenants were helping each
other to untangle one of their Bay-of-Biscay reckonings,
which had set both plane and spherical trigonometry at
defiance
,
by a lamp of their own; and the chaplain was
hurrying
the steward and the boys along with the breakfasthis
usual occupation at that witching time in the morning.
While things were in this state, the first lieutenant, Mr.
Vol. II.  9
Bury, appeared in the gun-room. His arrival caused one
or two of the mess to glance upward at him, though no one
spoke but the junior lieutenant, who, being an honourable,
was at his ease with every one on board, short of the
captain
.
What's the news from deck, Bury? asked this officer,
a youth of twenty, his senior being a man ten years older.
Is Mr. de Vervillin thinking of running away yet?
Not he, sir; there's too much of the game-cock about
him for
that
.
I 'll warrant you, he can
crow!
But what
is
the news,
Bury?
The news is that the old Planter is as wet as a
washtub
,
forward, and I must have a dry jacketdo you hear,
there, Tom? Soundings, turning to the master, who just
then came in from forward, have you taken a look out of
doors this morning?
You know I seldom forget that, Mr. Bury. A pretty
pickle the ship would soon be in, if
I
forgot to look about
me!
He swallowed the deep-sea, down in the bay, cried the
honourable, laughing, and goes every morning at
day-light
to look for it out at the bridle-ports.
Well, then, Soundings, what do you think of the third
ship in the French line? continued Bury, disregarding the
levity of the youth: did you ever see such top-masts, as
she carries, before?
I scarce ever saw a Frenchman without them, Mr.
Bury. You 'd have just such sticks in this fleet, if Sir
Jarvy would stand them.
Ay, but Sir Jarvy
won't
stand them. The captain who
sent such a stick up in his ship, would have to throw it
over-board
before night. I never saw such a pole in the air in
my life!
What's the matter with the mast, Mr. Bury? put in
Magrath, who kept up what he called constant scientific
skirmishes with the
elder
sea-officers; the
junior
being too
inexperienced in his view to be worthy of a contest. I 'll
engage the spar is moulded and fashioned agreeably to the
most approved pheelosphical principles; for in
that
the
French certainly excel us.
Who ever heard of
moulding
a spar? interrupted
Soundings, laughing loudly, we
mould
a ship's frame,
Doctor, but we
lengthen
and
shorten
, and
scrape
and
fid
her masts.
I'm answered as usual, gentlemen, and voted down, I
suppose, by acclamation, as they call it in other learned
bodies
.
I would advise no creature that has a reason to go to
sea; an instinct being all that is needed to make a Lord
High Admiral of twenty tails.
I should like Sir Jarvy to hear
that
, my man of books,
cried the fourth, who had just satisfied himself that a book
was not his own forteI fancy your instinct, doctor, will
prevent you from whispering this in the vice-admiral's ear!
Although Magrath had a profound respect for the
commander-in-chief
,
he was averse to giving in, in a
gun-room
discussion. His answer, therefore, partook of the
feeling of the moment.
Sir Gervaise, (he pronounced this word Jairvis) Sir
Gervaise Oakes,
honourable
sir, he said, with a sneer,
may be a good seaman, but he's no linguist. Now, there
he was, ashore among the dead and dying, just as ignorant
of the meaning of
filius nullius
, which is boy's Latin, as if
he had never seen a horn-book! Nevertheless, gentlemen,
it is science, and not even the classics, that makes the man;
as for a creature's getting the sciences by instinct, I shall
contend it is against the possibilities, whereas the attainment
of what you call seamanship, is among even the lesser
probabilities
.
This is the most marine-ish talk I ever heard from your
mouth, doctor, interrupted Soundings. How the devil
can a man tell how to ware ship by instinct, as you call it,
if one may ask the question?
Simply, Soundings, because the process of ratiocination
is dispensed with. Do you have to
think
in waring ship,
now?I 'll put it to your own honour, for the answer.
Think!I should be a poor creature for a master,
indeed
,
if much thinking were wanting in so simple a matter
as tacking or veering. Nonoyour real sea-dog has no
occasion for
thinking
, when he has his work before him.
That 'll just be it, gentlemen!that 'll be just what I 'm
telling ye, cried the doctor, exulting in the success of his
artifice. Not only will Mr. Soundings not
think
, when
he has his ordinary duties to perform, but he holds the
process
itself in merited contempt, ye 'll obsairve; and so my
theory is established, by evidence of a pairty concerned;
which is more than a postulate logically requires.
Here Magrath dropped his book, and laughed with that
sort of hissing sound that seems peculiar to the genus of
which he formed a part. He was still indulging in his
triumph, when the first tap of the drum was heard. All
listened; every ear pricking like that of a deer that hears
the hound, when there followedr-r-r-ap tapr-r-r-ap
tapr-r-r-ap tap a-tap-taprap-a-tapa-rap-a-tap a-rap-a
tapa-tap-tap.
Instinct or reason, Sir Jarvy is going to quarters!
exclaimed the honourable. I 'd no notion we were near
enough to the Monsieurs, for
that!
Now, said Magrath, with a grinning sneer, as he rose
to descend to the cock-pit, there 'll may be arise an
occasion
for a little learning, when I 'll promise ye all the science
that can be mustered in my unworthy knowledge.
Soundings
,
I may have to heave the lead in the depths of your
physical formation, in which case I 'll just endeevour to
avoid the breakers of ignorance.
Go to the devil, or to the cock-pit, whichever you
please, sir, answered the master; I 've served in six
general actions, already, and have never been obliged to one
of your kidney for so much as a bit of court-plaster or lint.
With me, oakum answers for one, and canvass for the
other.
While this was saying, all hands were in motion. The
sea and marine officers looking for their side-arms, the
surgeon
carefully collecting his books, and the chaplain seizing
a dish of cold beef, that was hurriedly set upon a table,
carrying
it down with him to his quarters, by way of taking it
out of harm's way. In a minute, the gun-room was cleared
of all who usually dwelt there, and their places were
supplied
by the seamen who manned the three or four
thirty-two's
that were mounted in the apartment, together with
their opposites. As the sea-officers, in particular, appeared
among the men, their faces assumed an air of authority, and
their voices were heard calling out the order to tumble
up, as they hastened themselves to their several stations.
All this time, Sir Gervaise Oakes paced the poop.
Bunting
and the quarter-master were in readiness to hoist the
new signal, and Greenly merely waited for the reports, to
join the commander-in-chief. In about five minutes after
the drum had given its first tap, these were completed, and
the captain ascended to the poop.
By standing on, on our present course, Captain Greenly,
observed Sir Gervaise, anxious to justify to himself the
evolution
he contemplated, the rear of our line and the van
of the French will be brought within fair range of shot from
each other, and, by an accident, we might lose a ship; since
any vessel that was crippled, would necessarily sag directly
down upon the enemy. Now, I propose to keep away in
the Plantagenet, and just brush past the leading French
ships, at about the distance the Warspite will
have
to pass,
and so alter the face of matters a little. What do you think
would be the consequence of such a manuvre?
That the van of our line and the van of the French will
be brought as near together, as you have just said must
happen to the rear, Sir Gervaise, in any case.
It does not require a mathematician to tell that much,
sir. You will keep away, as soon as Bunting shows the
signal, and bring the wind a-beam. Never mind the braces;
let
them
stand fast; as soon as we have passed the French
admiral, I shall luff, again. This will cause us to lose a
little of our weatherly position, but about that I am very
indifferent
.
Give the order, sirBunting, run up the signal.
These commands were silently obeyed, and presently the
Plantagenet was running directly in the troughs of the seas,
with quite double her former velocity. The other ships
answered
promptly, each keeping away as her second ahead
came down to the proper line of sailing, and all complying
to the letter with an order that was very easy of execution.
The effect, besides giving every prospect of a distant
engagement
,
was to straighten the line to nearly mathematical
precision.
Is it your wish, Sir Gervaise, that we should endeavour
to open our lee lower ports? asked Greenly. Unless we
attempt something of the sort, we shall have nothing heavier
9 *
than the eighteens to depend on, should Monsieur de
Vervillin
see fit to begin.
And will
he
be any better off?It would be next to
madness to think of fighting the lower-deck guns, in such
weather, and we will keep all fast. Should the French
commence the sport, we shall have the advantage of being
to windward; and the loss of a few weather shrouds might
bring down the best mast in their fleet.
Greenly made no answer, though he perfectly understood
that the loss of a mast would almost certainly ensure the
loss of the ship, did one of his own heavier spars go. But
this was Sir Gervaise's greatest weakness as a commander,
and he knew it would be useless to attempt persuading him
to suffer a single ship under his order to pass the enemy
nearer than he went himself in the Plantagenet. This was
what he called covering his ships; though it amounted to no
more than putting all of them in the jeopardy that happened
to be unavoidable, as regarded one or two.
The Comte de Vervillin seemed at a loss to understand
this sudden and extraordinary movement in the van of his
enemy. His signals followed, and his crews went to their
guns; but it was not an easy matter for ships that
persevered
in hugging the wind to make any material alterations
in their relative positions, in such a gale. The rate of
sailing
of the English, however, now menaced a speedy
collision
,
if collision were intended, and it was time to be
stirring
,
in order to be ready for it.
On the other hand, all was quiet, and, seemingly,
death-like
,
in the English ships. Their people were at their
quarters
,
already, and this is a moment of profound stillness in
a vessel of war. The lower ports being down, the portions
of the crews stationed on those decks were buried, as it
might be, in obscurity, while even those above were still
partly concealed by the half-ports. There was virtually
nothing for the sail-trimmers to do, and everything was
apparently
left to the evolutions of the vast machines
themselves
,
in which they floated. Sir Gervaise, Greenly, and
the usual attendants still remained on the poop, their eyes
scarcely turning for an instant from the fleet of the enemy.
By this time the Plantagenet and le Tmraire were little
more than a mile apart, each minute lessening this distance.
The latter ship was struggling along, her bows plunging
into the seas to the hawse-holes, while the former had a
swift, easy motion through the troughs, and along the
summits
of the waves, her flattened sails aiding in steadying her
in the heavy lurches that unavoidably accompanied such a
movement. Still, a sea would occasionally break against
her weather side, sending its crest upward in a brilliant
jetd'eau
,
and leaving tons of water on the decks. Sir
Gervaise's
manner had now lost every glimmering of
excitement
.
When he spoke, it was in a gentle, pleasant tone,
such as a gentleman might use in the society of women.
The truth was, all his energy had concentrated in the
determination
to do a daring deed; and, as is not unusual with
the most resolute men, the nearer he approached to the
consummation of his purpose, the more he seemed to reject
all the spurious aids of manner.
The French do not open their lower ports, Greenly,
observed the vice-admiral, dropping the glass after one of
his long looks at the enemy, although they have the
advantage
of being to leeward. I take that to be a sign they
intend nothing very serious.
We shall know better five minutes hence, Sir Gervaise.
This ship slides along like a London coach.
His line is lubberly, after all, Greenly! Look at those
two ships asternthey are near half a mile to windward of
the rest of the fleet, and at least half a mile astern. Hey!
Greenly?
The captain turned towards the rear of the French, and
examined the positions of the two ships mentioned with
sufficient
deliberation; but Sir Gervaise dropped his head in a
musing manner, and began to pace the poop again. Once
or twice he stopped to look at the rear of the French line,
then distant from him quite a league, and as often did he
resume his walk.
Bunting, said the vice-admiral, mildly, come this way,
a moment. Our last signal was to keep in the
commander-in-chief's
wake, and to follow his motions?
It was, Sir Gervaise. The old order to follow motions,
`with or without signals,' as one might say.
Bend on the signals to close up in line, as near as safe,
and to carry sail by the flag-ship.
Ay, ay, Sir Gervaise  we 'll have 'em both up in five
minutes, sir.
The commander-in-chief now even seemed pleased. His
physical excitement returned a little, and a smile struggled
round his lip. His eye glanced at Greenly, to see if he
were suspected, and then all his calmness of exterior
returned
.
In the meantime the signals were made and
answered
.
The latter circumstance was reported to Sir
Gervaise
,
who cast his eyes down the line astern, and saw that
the different ships were already bracing in, and easing off
their sheets, in order to diminish the spaces between the
different vessels. As soon as it was apparent that the
Carnatic
was drawing ahead, Captain Greenly was told to lay
his main and fore-yards nearly square, to light up all his
staysail sheets, and to keep away sufficiently to make
everything
draw. Although these orders occasioned surprise,
they were implicitly obeyed.
The moment of meeting had now come. In consequence
of having kept away so much, the Plantagenet could not be
quite three-fourths of a mile on the weather-bow of
le
Temeraire
,
coming up rapidly, and threatening a
semi-transverse
fire. In order to prevent this, the French ship edged
off a little, giving herself an easier and more rapid
movement
through the water, and bringing her own broadside
more fairly to the shock. This evolution was followed by
the two next ships, a little prematurely, perhaps; but the
admiral in
le Foudroyant
, disdaining to edge off from her
enemy, kept her luff. The ships astern were governed by
the course of their superior. This change produced a little
disorder in the van of the French, menacing still greater,
unless one party or the other receded from the course taken.
But time pressed, and the two fleets were closing so fast as
to induce other thoughts.
There 's lubberly work for you, Greenly! said Sir
Gervaise, smiling. A commander-in-chief heading up
with the bowlines dragged, and his second and third ahead
not to say fourth  running off with the wind abeam!
Now, if we can knock the Comte off a couple of points, in
passing, all his fellows astern will follow, and the Warspite
and Blenheim and Thunderer will slip by like girls in a
country-dance! Send Bury down to the main-deck, with
orders to be ready with those eighteens.
Greenly obeyed, of course, and he began to think better
of audacity in naval warfare, than he had done before, that
day. This was the usual course of things with these two
officers; one arguing and deciding according to the dictates
of a cool judgment, and the other following his impulses
quite as much as anything else, until facts supervened to
prove that human things are as much controlled by
adventitious
agencies, the results of remote and unseen causes, as
by any well-digested plans laid at the moment. In their
cooler hours, when they came to reason on the past, the
vice-admiral generally consummated his triumphs, by
reminding
his captain that if he had not been in the way of
luck, he never could have profited by it; no bad creed for a
naval officer, who is otherwise prudent and vigilant.
The quarter-masters of the fleet were just striking six
bells, or proclaiming that it was seven o'clock in the
morning
watch, as the Plantagenet and
le Tmraire
came
abeam of each other. Both ships lurched heavily in the
troughs of the seas, and both rolled to windward in stately
majesty, and yet both slid through the brine with a
momentum
that resembled the imperceptible motion of a planet.
The water rolled back from their black sides and shining
hammock-cloths, and all the other dark panoply that
distinguishes
a ship of war glistened with the spray; but no sign
of hostility proceeded from either. The French admiral
made no signal to engage, and Sir Gervaise had reasons of
his own for wishing to pass the enemy's van, if possible,
unnoticed. Minute passed after minute, in breathless
silence
,
on board the Plantagenet and the Carnatic, the latter
vessel being now but half a cable's-length astern of the
admiral
.
Every eye that had any outlet for such a purpose,
was riveted on the main-deck ports of le Tmraire, in
expectation of seeing the fire issue from her guns. Each
instant, however, lessened the chances, as regarded that
particular vessel, which was soon out of the line of fire from
the Plantagenet, when the same scene was to follow with
the same result, in connection with
le Conquereur
, the
second ship of the French line. Sir Gervaise smiled as he
passed the three first ships, seemingly unnoticed; but as he
drew nearer to the admiral, he felt confident this impunity
must cease.
What they
mean
by it all, Greenly, he observed to his
companion, is more than I can say; but we will go nearer,
and try to find out. Keep her away a little more, sir; keep
her away half a point. Greenly was not disposed to
remonstrate
now, for his prudent temperament was yielding to
the excitement of the moment, just reversing the traits of
Sir Gervaise's character; the one losing his extreme
discretion
in feeling, as the other gained by the pressure of
circumstances
.
The helm was eased a little, and the ship
sheered nearer to le Foudroyant.
As is usual in all services, the French
commander-in-chief
was in one of the best vessels of his fleet. Not only
was the Foudroyant a heavy ship, carrying French
forty-twos
below, a circumstance that made her rate as an eighty,
but, like the Plantagenet, she was one of the fastest and
most weatherly vessels of her class known. By hugging
the wind, this noble vessel had got, by this time,
materially
to windward of her second and third ahead, and had
increased her distance essentially from her supports astern.
In a word, she was far from being in a position to be
sustained
as she ought to be, unless she edged off herself, a
movement that no one on board her seemed to contemplate.
He 's a noble fellow, Greenly, that Comte de Vervillin!
murmured Sir Gervaise, in a tone of admiration, and so
have I always found him, and so have I always
reported
him, too! The fools about the Gazettes, and the knaves
about the offices, may splutter as they will; Mr. de Vervillin
would give them plenty of occupation were they
here
. I
question if he mean to keep off in the least, but insists on
holding every inch he can gain!
The next moment, however, satisfied Sir Gervaise that
he was mistaken in his last conjecture, the bows of the
Foudroyant gradually falling off, until the line of her
larboard
guns bore, when she made a general discharge of the
whole of them, with the exception of those on the lower
deck. The Plantagenets waited until the ship rose on a sea,
and then they returned the compliment in the same manner.
The Carnatic's side showed a sheet of flame immediately
after; and the Achilles, Lord Morganic, luffing briskly to
the wind, so as to bring her guns to bear, followed up the
game, like flashes of lightning. All three of these ships
had directed their fire at le Foudroyant, and the smoke had
not yet driven from among her spars, when Sir Gervaise
perceived that all three of her top-masts were hanging to
leeward. At this sight, Greenly fairly sprang from the
deck, and gave three cheers. The men below caught up
the cry, even to those who were, in a manner, buried on the
lower deck, and presently, spite of the gale, the Carnatic's
were heard following their example astern. At this instant
the whole French and English lines opened their fire, from
van to rear, as far as their guns would bear, or the shot
tell.
Now, sir, now is our time to close with de Vervillin!
exclaimed Greenly, the instant he perceived the manner in
which his ship was crippled. In our close order we might
hope to make a thorough wreck of him.
Not so, Greenly, returned Sir Gervaise calmly. You
see he edges away already, and will be down among his
other ships in five minutes; we should have a general
action with twice our force. What is done, is
well
done,
and we will let it stand. It is
something
to have dismasted
the enemy's commander-in-chief; do you look to it that the
enemy don't do the same with ours. I heard shot rattling
aloft, and every thing now bears a hard strain.
Greenly went to look after his duty, while Sir Gervaise
continued to pace the poop. The whole of le
Foudroyant's
fire had been directed at the Plantagenet, but so
rough was the ocean that not a shot touched the hull. A
little injury had been done aloft, but nothing that the ready
skill of the seamen was not able to repair even in that rough
weather. The fact is, most of the shot had touched the
waves, and had flown off from their varying surfaces at
every angle that offered. One of the secrets that Sir
Gervaise
had taught his captains was to avoid hitting the
surface
of the sea, if possible, unless that surface was
reasonably
smooth, and the object intended to be injured was near
at hand. Then the French admiral received the
first
fire
always the most destructiveof three fresh vessels; and his
injuries were in proportion.
The scene was now animated, and not without a wild
magnificence. The gale continued as heavy as ever, and
with the raging of the ocean and the howling of the winds,
mingled the roar of artillery, and the smoky canopy of battle.
Still the destruction on neither side bore any proportion to
the grandeur of the accompaniments; the distance and the
unsteadiness of the ships preventing much accuracy of aim.
In that day, a large two-decked ship never carried heavier
metal than an eighteen above her lower batteries; and this
gun, efficient as it is on most occasions, does not bring with
it the fearful destruction that attends a more modern
broadside
.
There was a good deal of noise, notwithstanding, and
some blood shed in passing; but, on the whole, when the
Warspite, the last of the English ships, ceased her fire, on
account of the distance of the enemy abreast of her, it would
have been difficult to tell that any vessel but le Foudroyant,
had been doing more than saluting. At this instant
Greenly
re-appeared on the poop, his own ship having ceased to
fire for several minutes.
Well, Greenly, the main-deck guns are at least scaled,
said Sir Gervaise, smiling; and
that
is not to be done
over again for some time. You keep everything ready in
the batteries, I trust?
We are all ready, Sir Gervaise, but there is nothing to
be done. It would be useless to waste our ammunition at
ships quite two miles under our lee.
Very truevery true, sir. But
all
the Frenchmen are
not quite so far to leeward, Greenly, as you may see by
looking ahead. Yonder two, at least, are not absolutely out
of harm's way!
Greenly turned, gazed an instant in the direction in which
the commander-in-chief pointed, and then the truth of what
Sir Gervaise had really in view in keeping away, flashed on
his mind, as it might be, at a glance. Without saying
a word, he immediately quitted the poop, and descending
even to the lower deck, passed through the whole of his
batteries, giving his orders, and examining their condition.
CHAPTER VIII.
By Heaven! it is a splendid sight to see,
(For one who hath no friend, no brother there,)
Their rival scarfs of mixed embroidery
Their various arms that glitter in the air!
Childe Harold
.
The
little conflict between the English ships and the head
of the French line, the evolutions that had grown out of it,
the crippling of le Foudroyant, and the continuance of the
gale, contributed to produce material changes in the relative
positions of the two fleets. All the English vessels kept their
stations with beautiful accuracy, still running to the
southward
in a close line ahead, having the wind a trifle abaft
the beam, with their yards braced in. Under the
circumstances
,
it needed but some seven or eight minutes for these
ships to glide a mile through the troubled ocean, and this was
about the period the most exposed of them all had been
under the random and slow fire that the state of the weather
permitted. The trifling damages sustained were already
repaired, or in a way soon to be so. On the other hand,
considerable disorder prevailed among the French. Their
line had never been perfect, extending quite a league; a
few of the leading vessels, or those near the
commander-in-chief
,
sustaining each other as well as could be desired,
while long intervals existed between the ships astern.
Among the latter, too, as has been stated, some were much
farther to windward than the others; an irregularity that
proceeded from a desire of the comte to luff up as near as
possible to the enemya desire, which, practised on,
necessarily
threw the least weatherly vessels to leeward. Thus
the two ships in the extreme rear, as has been hinted at
already, being jammed up unusually hard upon the wind,
had weathered materially on their consorts, while their way
through the water had been proportionably less. It was
these combined circumstances which brought them so far
astern and to windward.
At the time Sir Gervaise pointed out their positions to
Vol. II.  10
Greenly, the two vessels just mentioned were quite half a
mile to the westward of their nearest consort, and more than
that distance to the southward. When it is remembered
that the wind was nearly due west, and that all the French
vessels, these two excepted, were steering north, the
relative
positions of the latter will be understood. Le
Foudroyant
,
too, had kept away, after the loss of her top-masts,
until fairly in the wake of the ships ahead of her, in her
own line, and, as the vessels had been running off with the
wind abeam, for several minutes, this manuvre threw the
French still farther to leeward. To make the matter worse,
just as the Warspite drew out of the range of shot from the
French, M. de Vervillin showed a signal at the end of his
gaff, for his whole fleet to ware in succession; an order,
which, while it certainly had a gallant semblance, as it was
bringing his vessels round on the same tack as his enemy,
and looked like a defiance, was singularly adapted to
restoring
to the latter all the advantage of the wind they had
lost by keeping away. As it was necessary to take room
to execute this evolution, in order to clear the ships that
were now crowded in the van, when le Tmraire came to
the wind again on the starboard tack, she was fully half a
mile to leeward of the admiral, who had just put his helm
up. As a matter of course, in order to form anew, with the
heads of the ships to the southward, each vessel had to get
into her leader's wake, which would be virtually throwing
the whole French line, again, two miles to leeward of the
English. Nevertheless, the stragglers in the rear of the
French continued to hug the wind, with a pertinacity that
denoted a resolution to have a brush with their enemies in
passing. The vessels were le Scipion and la Victoire, each
of seventy-four guns. The first of these ships was
commanded
by a young man of very little professional
experience
,
but of high court influence; while the second had a
captain who, like old Parker, had worked his way up to his
present station, through great difficulties, and by dint of
hard knocks, and harder work. Unfortunately the first
ranked, and the humble
capitaine de frgate
, placed by
accident in command of a ship of the line, did not dare to
desert a
capitaine de vaisseau
, who had a
duc
for an elder
brother, and called himself
comte
. There was perhaps a
redeeming gallantry in the spirit which determined the
Comte de Chlincourt to incur the risk of passing so near
six vessels with only two, that might throw a veil over the
indiscretion; more especially as his own fleet was near
enough to support him in the event of any disaster, and it
was certainly possible that the loss of a material spar on
board either of his foes, might induce the capture of the
vessel. At all events, thus reasoned M. de Chlincourt;
who continued boldly on, with his larboard tacks aboard,
always hugging the wind, even after the Tmraire was
round; and M. Comptant chose to follow him in la Victoire.
The Plantagenet, by this time, being not a mile distant from
the Scipio, coming on with steady velocity, these intentions
and circumstances created every human probability that she
would soon be passing her weather beam, within a quarter
of a mile, and, consequently, that a cannonade, far more
serious than what had yet occurred, must follow. The few
intervening minutes gave Sir Gervaise time to throw a
glance around him, and to come to his final decision.
The English fleet was never in better line than at that
precise moment. The ships were as close to each other as
comported with safety, and every thing stood and drew as
in the trade winds. The leading French vessels were
waring
and increasing their distance to leeward, and it would
require an hour for them to get up near enough to be at all
dangerous in such weather, while all the rest were
following
,
regardless of the two that continued their luff. The
Chloe had already got round, and, hugging the wind, was
actually coming up to windward of her own line, though
under a press of canvass that nearly buried her. The
Active
and Driver were in their stations, as usual; one on the
weather beam, and the other on the weather bow; while the
Druid had got so near as to show her hull, closing fast,
with square yards.
That is either a very bold, or a very obstinate fellow;
he, who commands the two ships ahead of us, observed
Greenly, as he stood at the vice-admiral's side, and just as
the latter terminated his survey. What object can he
possibly
have in braving three times his force in a gale like
this?
If it were an Englishman, Greenly, we should call him
a hero! By taking a mast out of one of us, he might cause
the loss of the ship, or compel us to engage double
our
force.
Do not blame him, but help me, rather, to disappoint him.
Now, listen, and see all done immediately.
Sir Gervaise then explained to the captain what his
intentions
really were, first ordering, himself, (a very unusual
course for one of his habits,) the first lieutenant, to keep the
ship off as much as practicable, without seeming to wish to
do so; but, as the orders will be explained incidentally, in
the course of the narrative, it is not necessary to give them
here. Greenly then went below, leaving Sir Gervaise,
Bunting, and their auxiliaries, in possession of the poop. A
private signal had been bent on some little time, and it was
now hoisted. In about five minutes it was read, understood,
and answered by all the ships of the fleet. Sir Gervaise
rubbed his hands like a man who was delighted, and he
beckoned to Bury, who had the trumpet on the quarter-deck,
to join him on the poop.
Did Captain Greenly let you into our plot, Bury, asked
the vice-admiral, in high good-humour, as soon as obeyed.
I saw he spoke to you in going below?
He only told me, Sir Gervaise, to edge down upon the
Frenchmen as close as I could, and this we are doing, I
think, as fast as mounsheerBury was an Anglo-Gallican
will at all like.
Ah! there old Parker sheers bravely to leeward! Trust
to him to be in the right place. The Carnatic went fifty
fathoms out of the line at that one twist. The Thunderer
and Warspite too! Never was a signal more beautifully
obeyed. If the Frenchmen don't take the alarm, now,
everything
will be to our minds.
By this time, Bury began to understand the manuvre.
Each alternate ship of the English was sheering fast to
leeward
,
forming a weather and a lee line, with increased
intervals
between the vessels, while all of them were edging
rapidly away, so as greatly to near the enemy. It was
apparent
now, indeed, that the Plantagenet herself must pass
within a hundred fathoms of the Scipio, and that in less
than two minutes. The delay in issuing the orders for this
evolution was in favour of its success, inasmuch as it did
not give the enemy time for deliberation. The Comte de
Chlincourt, in fact, did not detect it; or, at least, did not
foresee the consequences; though both were quite apparent
to the more experienced
capitaine de frgate
astern. It
was too late, or the latter would have signalled his superior
to put him on his guard; but, as things were, there
remained
no alternative, apparently, but to run the gauntlet, and
trust all to the chances of battle.
In a moment like that we are describing, events occur
much more rapidly than they can be related. The
Plantagenet
was now within pistol-shot of le Scipion, and on
her weather-bow. At that precise instant, when the
bowguns
,
on both sides, began to play, the Carnatic, then nearly
in a line with the enemy, made a rank sheer to leeward, and
drove on, opening in the very act with her weather-bow
guns. The Thunderer and Warspite imitated this
manuvre
,
leaving the Frenchman the cheerless prospect of being
attacked on both sides. It is not to be concealed that M.
de Chlincourt was considerably disturbed by this sudden
change in his situation. That which, an instant before, had
the prospect of being a chivalrous, but extremely hazardous,
passage in front of a formidable enemy, now began to
assume
the appearance of something very like destruction.
It was too late, however, to remedy the evil, and the young
Comte, as brave a man as existed, determined to face it
manfully. He had scarcely time to utter a few cheering
sentiments, in a dramatic manner, to those on the
quarter-deck
,
when the English flag-ship came sweeping past in a
cloud of smoke, and a blaze of fire. His own broadside
was nobly returned, or as much of it as the weather
permitted
,
but the smoke of both discharges was still driving
between his masts, when the dark hamper of the Carnatic
glided into the drifting canopy, which was made to whirl
back on the devoted Frenchman in another torrent of flame.
Three times was this fearful assault renewed on the Scipio,
at intervals of about a minute, the iron hurricane first
coming
from to windward, and then seeming to be driven back
from to leeward, as by its own rebound, leaving no
breathing
time to meet it. The effect was completely to silence
her own fire; for what between the power of the raging
elements
,
and the destruction of the shot, a species of wild and
blood-fraught confusion took the place of system and order.
10 *
Her decks were covered with killed and wounded, among
the latter of whom was the Comte de Chlincourt, while
orders
were given and countermanded in a way to render them
useless, if not incoherent. From the time when the
Plantagenet
fired her first gun, to that when the Warspite fired
her last, was just five minutes by the watch. It seemed an
hour to the French, and but a moment to their enemies.
One hundred and eighty-two men and boys were included
in the casualties of those teeming moments on board the
Scipion alone; and when that ship issued slowly from the
scene of havoc, more by the velocity of her assailants in
passing than by her own, the foremast was all that stood,
the remainder of her spars dragging under her lee. To cut
the last adrift, and to run off nearly before the wind, in
order
to save the spars forward, and to get within the cover
of her own fleet, was all that could now be done. It may
as well be said here, that these two objects were effected.
The Plantagenet had received damage from the fire of
her opponent. Some ten or fifteen men were killed and
wounded; her main-top-sail was split by a shot, from clew
to earing; one of the quarter-masters was carried from the
poop, literally dragged overboard by the sinews that
connected
head and body; and several of the spars, with a
good deal of rigging, required to be looked to, on account
of injuries. But no one thought of these things, except as
they were connected with present and pressing duties. Sir
Gervaise got a sight of la Victoire, some hundred and
twenty fathoms ahead, just as the roar of the Carnatic's
guns was rushing upon his ears. The French commander
saw and understood the extreme jeopardy of his consort,
and he had already put his helm hard up.
Starboard  starboard hard, Bury! shouted Sir
Gervaise
from the poop. Damn him, run him aboard, if he
dare hold on long enough to meet us.
The lieutenant signed with his hand that the order was
understood, and the helm being put up, the ship went
whirling
off to leeward on the summit of a hill of foam. A cheer
was heard struggling in the tempest, and glancing over his
left shoulder, Sir Gervaise perceived the Carnatic shooting
out of the smoke, and imitating his own movement, by
making another and still ranker sheer to leeward. At the
same moment she set her mainsail close-reefed, as if
determined
to outstrip her antagonist, and maintain her station.
None but a prime seaman could have done such a thing so
steadily and so well, in the midst of the wild haste and
confusion
of such a scene. Sir Gervaise, now not a hundred
yards from the Carnatic, waved high his hat in exultation
and praise; and old Parker, alone on his own poop, bared
his grey hairs in acknowledgment of the compliment. All
this time the two ships drove madly ahead, while the crash
and roar of the battle was heard astern.
The remaining French ship was well and nimbly
handled
.
As she came round she unavoidably sheered towards
her enemies, and Sir Gervaise found it necessary to
countermand
his last order, and to come swiftly up to the wind,
both to avoid her raking broadside, and to prevent running
into his own consort. But the Carnatic, having a little
more room, first kept off, and then came to the wind again,
as soon as the Frenchman had fired, in a way to compel him
to haul up on the other tack, or to fall fairly aboard.
Almost
at the same instant, the Plantagenet closed on his
weather quarter and raked. Parker had got abeam, and
pressing nearer, he compelled la Victoire to haul her
bowlines
,
bringing her completely between two fires. Spar went
after spar, and being left with nothing standing but the lower
masts, the Plantagenet and Carnatic could not prevent
themselves
from passing their victim, though each shortened sail;
the first being already without a topsail. Their places,
however
,
were immediately supplied by the Achilles and the
Thunderer, both ships having hauled down their staysails
to lessen their way. As the Blenheim and Warspite were
quite near astern, and an eighteen-pound shot had closed
the earthly career of the poor
capitaine de frgate
, his
successor
in command deemed it prudent to lower his ensign;
after a resistance that in its duration was unequal to the
promise of its commencement. Still the ship had suffered
materially, and had fifty of her crew among the casualties.
Of course, this submission terminated the combat, for the
moment.
Sir Gervaise Oakes had now leisure, and, as the smoke
soon cleared before the gale, opportunity, to look about him.
Most of the French ships had got round; but, besides being
quite as far astern, when they should get up abeam,
supposing
himself to remain where he was, they would be at
very long gun-shot dead to leeward. To remain where he
was, however, formed no part of his plan, for he was fully
resolved to maintain all his advantages. The great difficulty
was to take possession of his prize, the sea running so high
as to render it questionable if a boat would live. Lord
Morganic
,
however, was just of an age and a temperament to
bring that question to a speedy issue. Being on the
weather-beam
of la Victoire, as her flag came down, he ordered his
own first lieutenant into the larger cutter, and putting
half-a-dozen
marines, with the proper crew, into the boat, it was
soon seen dangling in the air over the cauldron of the ocean;
the oars on-end. To lower, let go, and unhook, were the
acts of an instant; the oars fell, and the boat was swept
away to leeward. A commander's commission depended on
his success, and Daly made desperate efforts to obtain it.
The prize offered a lee, and the French, with a national
benevolence
,
courtesy, and magnanimity, that would scarcely
have been imitated had matters been reversed, threw ropes
to their conquerors, to help to rescue them from a very
awkward
dilemma. The men did succeed in getting into the
prize; but the boat, in the end, was stove and lost.
The appearance of the red flag of England, the symbol
of his own professional rank, and worn by most under his
own orders, over the white ensign of France, was the sign
to Sir Gervaise that the prize-officer was in possession. He
immediately made the signal for the fleet to follow the
motions
of the commander-in-chief. By this time, his own
mainsail, close-reefed, had taken the place of the torn
topsail
,
and the Plantagenet led off to the southward again, as
if nothing unusual had occurred. Daly had a quarter of an
hour of extreme exertion on board the prize, before he could
get her fairly in motion as he desired; but, by dint of using
the axe freely, he cut the wreck adrift, and soon had la
Victoire
liberated from that incumbrance. The fore-sail and
fore and mizzen staysails were on the ship, and the mainsail,
close-reefed also, was about to be set, to drag her from the
mle of her foes, when her ensign came down. By getting
the tack of the latter aboard, and the sheet aft, he would have
all the canvass set the gale would allow, and to this
all-essential
point he directed his wits. To ride down the
main-tack
of a two-decked ship, in a gale of wind, or what fell
little short of a real gale, was not to be undertaken with
twenty men, the extent of Daly's command; and he had
recourse to the assistance of his enemies. A good-natured,
facetious Irishman, himself, with a smattering of French, he
soon got forty or fifty of the prisoners in a sufficient humour
to lend their aid, and the sail was set, though not without
great risk of its splitting. From this moment, la Victoire
was better off, as respected the gale and keeping a weatherly
position, than any of the English ships; inasmuch as she
could carry all the canvass the wind permitted, while she
was relieved from the drift inseparable from much hamper
aloft. The effect, indeed, was visible in the first hour, to
Daly's great delight and exultation. At the end of that
period, he found himself quite a cable's-length to windward
of the line, and this simply because he had not made the
customary set to leeward. But in relating this last particular,
events have been a little anticipated.
Greenly, who had gone below to attend to the batteries,
which were not worked without great difficulty in so heavy
a sea, and to be in readiness to open the lower ports should
occasion offer, reappeared on deck just as the
commander-in-chief
showed the signal for the ships to follow his own
motions. The line was soon formed, as mentioned, and ere
long it became apparent that the prize could easily keep in
her station. As most of the day was still before him, Sir
Gervaise had little doubt of being able to secure the latter,
ere night should come to render it indispensable.
The vice-admiral and his captain shook hands cordially
on the poop, and the former pointed out to the latter, with
honest exultation, the result of his own bold manuvres.
We 've clipped the wings of two of them, added Sir
Gervaise, and have fairly bagged a third, my good friend;
and, God willing, when Bluewater joins, there will not be
much difficulty with the remainder. I cannot see that any
of our vessels have suffered much, and I set them all down
as sound. There 's been time for a signal of inability, that
curse to an admiral's evolutions, but no one seems disposed
to make it. If we really escape that nuisance, it will be the
first instance in my life!
Half-a-dozen yards may be crippled, and no one the
worse for it, in this heavy weather. Were we under a press
of canvass, it would be a different matter; but, now, so long
as the main sticks stand, we shall probably do well enough.
I can find no injury in my own ship that may not be
remedied
at sea.
And she has had the worst of it. 'T was a decided
thing, Greenly, to engage such an odds in a gale; but we
owe our success, most probably, to the audacity of the
attack. Had the enemy believed it possible, it is probable
he would have frustrated it. Well, Master Galleygo, I 'm
glad to see you unhurt! What is your pleasure?
Why, Sir Jarvy, I 've two opportunities, as a body
might say, on the poop, just now. One is to shake hands,
as we always does a'ter a a brush, you knows, sir, and to look
a'ter each other's health; and the other is to report a
misfortin
that will bear hard on this day's dinner. You see,
Sir Jarvy, I had the dead poultry slung in a net, over the
live stock, to be out of harm's way; well, sir, a shot cut the
lanyard, and let all the chickens down by the run, in among
the gun-room grunters; and as they never half feeds them
hanimals, there isn't as much left of the birds as would
make a meal for a sick young gentleman. To my notion,
no one ought to
have
live stock but the
commanders-in-chief
.
To the devil with you and the stock! Give me a shake
of the hand, and back into your tophow came you, sir, to
quit your quarters without leave?
I didn't, Sir Jarvy. Seeing how things was a going
on, among the pigs, for our top hoverlooks the awful scene,
I axed the young gentleman to let me come down to
condole
with your honour; and as they always lets me do as
I axes, in such matters, why down I come. We has had
one rattler in at our top, howsever, that came nigh to clear
us all out on it!
Is any spar injured? asked Sir Gervaise, quickly.
This must be looked to  hey! Greenly?
Not to signify, your honour; not to signify. One of
them French eighteens aboard the prize just cocked its nose
up, as the ship lurched, and let fly a round 'un and a grist
of grape, right into our faces. I see'd it coming and sung
out `scaldings;' and 't was well I did. We all ducked in
time, and the round 'un cleared everything, but a handful
of the marbles are planted in the head of the mast, making
the spar look like a plum-pudding, or a fellow with the
small-pox.
Enough of this. You are excused from returning to
the top;and, Greenly, beat the retreat. Bunting, show
the signal for the retreat from quarters. Let the ships pipe
to breakfast, if they will.
This order affords a fair picture of the strange admixture
of feelings and employments that characterize the ordinary
life of a ship. At one moment, its inmates find themselves
engaged in scenes of wild magnificence and fierce confusion,
while at the next they revert to the most familiar duties of
humanity. The crews of the whole fleet now retired from
the guns, and immediately after they were seated around
their kids, indulging ravenously in the food for which the
exercise of the morning had given keen appetites. Still
there was something of the sternness of battle in the
merriment
of this meal, and the few jokes that passed were
seasoned
with a bitterness that is not usual among the
light-hearted
followers of the sea. Here and there, a mess-mate
was missed, and the vacancy produced some quaint and
even pathetic allusion to his habits, or to the manner in
which he met his death; seamen usually treating the ravages
of this great enemy of the race, after the blow has been
struck, with as much solemnity and even tenderness, as
they regard his approaches with levity. It is when spared
themselves, that they most regard the destruction of battle.
A man's standing in a ship, too, carries great weight with
it, at such times; the loss of the quarter-master, in
particular
,
being much regretted in the Plantagenet. This man
messed with a portion of the petty officers, a set of men
altogether more thoughtful and grave than the body of the
crew; and who met, when they assembled around their
mess-chest, that morning, with a sobriety and even
sternness
of mien, that showed how much in the management
of the vessel had depended on their individual exertions.
Several minutes elapsed in the particular mess of the dead
man, before a word was spoken; all eating with appetites
that were of proof, but no one breaking the silence. At
length an old quarter-gunner, named Tom Sponge, who
generally led the discourse, said in a sort of half-inquiring,
half-regretting, way
I suppose there 's no great use in asking why Jack
Glass's spoon is idle, this morning. They says, them
fore-castle
chaps, that they see'd his body streaming out over
the starboard quarter, as if it had been the fly of one of his
own ensigns. How was it, Ned? you was thereaway, and
ought to know all about it.
To be sure I does, said Ned, who was Bunting's
remaining
assistant. I was there, as you says, and see'd as
much of it as a man can see of what passes between a poor
fellow and a shot, when they comes together, and that not
in a very loving manner. It happened just as we come up
on the weather beam of that first chaphim as we winged
so handsomely among us. Well, Sir Jarvy had clapped a
stopper on the signals, seeing as we had got fairly into the
smoke, and Jack and I was a looking about us for the
muskets
,
not knowing but a chance might turn up to chuck a
little lead into some of the parly-woods; and so says Jack,
says he, `Ned, you 's got my musket;  (as I
had
, sure
enough)  and says he, `Ned, you 's got my musket; but
no matter arter all, as they 're much of a muchness.' So
when he 'd said this, he lets fly; but whether he hit
anybody
,
is more than I can say. If he
did
, 'twas likely a
Frenchman, as he shot that-a-way. `Now,' says Jack, says
he, `Ned, as this is your musket, you can load it, and hand
over mine, and I 'll sheet home another of the bs. Well,
at that moment the Frenchman lifted for'ard, on a heavy
swell, and let drive at us, with all his forecastle guns, fired
as it might be with one priming
That was bad gunnery, growled Tom Sponge, as it
racks a ship woundily.
Yes, they'se no judgment in ships in general. Well,
them French twelves are spiteful guns; and a
little
afore
they fired, it seemed to me I heard something give Jack a
rap on the cheek, that sounded as if a fellow's ear was boxed
with a clap of thunder. I looked up, and there was Jack
streaming out like the fly of the ensign, head foremost, with
the body towing after it by strings in the neck.
I thought when a fellow's head was shot off, put in
another quarter-master named Ben Barrel, that the body
was left in the ship while only the truck went!
That comes of not seeing them things, Ben, rejoined
the eye-witness. A fellow's head is stayed in its berth
just like a ship's mast. There 's for'ard and back-stays,
and shrouds, all 's one as aboard here; the only difference
is that the lanyards are a little looser, so as to give a man
more play for his head, than it might be safe to give to a
mast. When a fellow makes a bow, why he only comes
up a little aft, and bowses on the fore-stay, and now and
then you falls in with a chap that is stayed altogether too
far for'ard, or who 's got a list perhaps from having the
shrouds set up too taut to port, or to starboard.
That sounds reasonable, put in the quarter-gunner,
gravely; I 've seen such droggers myself.
If you 'd been on the poop an hour or too ago, you 'd
ha' seen more on it! Now, there 's all our marines, their
back-stays have had a fresh pull since they were launched,
and, as for their captain, I 'll warrant you,
he
had a luff
upon luff!
I 've heard the carpenter overhauling them matters,
remarked Sam Wad, another quarter-gunner, and he
chalked it all out by the square and compass. It seems
reasonable, too.
If you 'd seen Jack's head dragging his body overboard
just like the Frenchman dragging his wreck under his lee,
you'd ha'
thought
it reasonable. What 's a fellow's
shoulders
for, but to give a spread to his shrouds, which lead
down the neck and are set up under the arms somewhere.
They says a great deal about the heart, and I reckons it 's
likely everything is key'd there.
Hearkee, Ned, observed a quarter-master, who knew
little more than the mess generally, if what you say is
true, why don't these shrouds lead straight from the head to
the shoulders, instead of being all tucked up under a skin
in the neck? Answer me that, now.
Who the devil ever saw a ship's shrouds that wasn't
cat-harpened in! exclaimed Ned, with some heat. A
pretty hand a wife would make of it, in putting her arms
around a fellow's neck if the rigging spread in the way you
Vol. II.  11
mean! Them things is all settled accordin' to reason when
a chap's keel 's laid.
This last argument seemed to dispose of the matter, the
discourse gradually turning on, and confining itself to the
merits of the deceased.
Sir Gervaise had directed Galleygo to prepare his
breakfast
as soon as the people were piped to their own; but he
was still detained on deck in consequence of a movement in
one of his vessels, to which it has now become necessary
more particularly to recur.
The appearance of the Druid to the northward, early in
the morning, will doubtless be remembered by the reader.
When near enough to have it made out, this frigate had
shown her number; after which she rested satisfied with
carrying sail much harder than any vessel in sight. When
the fleets engaged, she made an effort to set the fore-top-sail,
close-reefed, but several of the critics in the other ships,
who occasionally noticed her movements, fancied that some
accident must have befallen her, as the canvass was soon
taken in, and she appeared disposed to remain content with
the sail carried when first seen. As this ship was
materially
to windward of the line, and she was running the whole
time a little free, her velocity was much greater than that
of the other vessels, and by this time she had got so near
that Sir Gervaise observed she was fairly abeam of the
Plantagenet, and a little to leeward of the Active. Of course
her hull, even to the bottom, as she rose on a sea, was
plainly visible, and such of her people as were in the tops
and rigging could be easily distinguished by the naked eye.
The Druid must have some communication for us from
the other division of the fleet, observed the vice-admiral to
his signal-officer, as they stood watching the movements of
the frigate; it is a little extraordinary Blewet does not
signal
!
Look at the book, and find me a question to put that
will ask his errand?
Bunting was in the act of turning over the leaves of his
little vocabulary of questions and answers, when three or
four dark balls, that Sir Gervaise, by the aid of the glass,
saw suspended between the frigate's masts, opened into flags,
effectually proving that Blewet was not absolutely asleep.
Four hundred and sixteen, ordinary communication,
observed the vice-admiral, with his eye still at the glass.
Look up that, Bunting, and let us know what it means.
The commander-in-chief  wish to speak him! read
Bunting, in the customary formal manner in which he
announced
the purport of a signal.
Very wellanswer; then make the Druid's number
to come within hail! The fellow has got cloth enough spread
to travel two feet to our one; let him edge away and come
under our lee. Speaking will be rather close work to-day.
I doubt if a ship
can
come near enough to make
herself
heard, returned the other, though the second
lieutenant
of that ship never uses a trumpet in the heaviest
weather
,
they tell me, sir. Our gents say his father was a
town-crier, and that he has inherited the family estate.
Ay, our gents are a set of saucy fellows, as is usually
the case when there isn't work enough aboard.
You should make a little allowance, Sir Gervaise, for
being in the ship of a successful commander-in-chief. That
makes us all carry weather-helms among the other messes.
Up with your signal, sir; up with your signal. I shall
be obliged to order Greenly to put you upon
watch-and-watch
for a month, in order to bring you down to the old
level of manners.
Signal answered, already, Sir Gervaise. By the way,
sir, I 'll thank you to request Captain Greenly to give me
another quarter-master. It 's nimble work for us, when
there is anything serious to do.
You shall have him, Bunting, returned the
vice-admiral
,
a shade passing over his face for the moment.
I had missed poor Jack Glass, and from seeing a spot
of blood on the poop, guessed his fate. I fancied, indeed, I
heard a shot strike something behind me.
It struck the poor fellow's head, sir, and made a noise
as if a butcher were felling an ox.
Wellwelllet us try to forget it, until something can
be done for his son, who is one of the side boys. Ah!
there 's Blewet keeping away in earnest. How the deuce he
is to speak us, however, is more than I can tell.
Sir Gervaise now sent a message to his captain to say
that he desired his presence. Greenly soon appeared, and
was made acquainted with the intention of the Druid, as
well as with the purport of the last signals. By this time,
the rent main-top-sail was mended, and the captain suggested
it should be set again, close-reefed, as before, and that the
mainsail should be taken in. This would lessen the
Plantagenet's
way, which ship was sensibly drawing ahead of her
consorts. Sir Gervaise assenting, the change was made,
and the effects were soon apparent, not only in the
movement
of the ship, but in her greater ease and steadiness of
motion.
It was not long before the Druid was within a hundred
fathoms of the flag-ship, on her weather-quarter, shoving
the bring before her in a way to denote a fearful momentum.
It was evidently the intention of Captain Blewet to cross the
Plantagenet's stern, and to luff up under her lee-quarter; the
safest point at which he could approach, in so heavy a swell,
provided it were done with discretion. Captain Blewet had
a reputation for handling his frigate like a boat, and the
occasion
was one which would be likely to awaken all his
desire to sustain the character he had already earned. Still
no one could imagine how he was to come near enough to
make a communication of any length. The stentorian lungs
of the second lieutenant, however, might effect it; and, as
the news of the expected hail passed through the ship, many
who had remained below, in apathy, while the enemy was
close under their lee, came on deck, curious to witness what
was about to pass.
Hey! Atwood? exclaimed Sir Gervaise, for the little
excitement had brought the secretary up from the
commander-in-chief's
cabin;what is Blewet at? The fellow
cannot mean to set a studding-sail!
He is running out a boom, nevertheless, Sir Gervaise,
or my thirty years' experience of nautical things have been
thrown away.
He is truly rigging out his weather
fore-topmast-studding-sail-boom
,
sir! added Greenly, in a tone of wonder.
It
is
out, rejoined the vice-admiral, as one would give
emphasis to the report of a calamity. Hey!what? Isn't
that a man they 're running up to the end of it, Bunting?
Level your glass, and let us know at once.
A glass is not necessary to make out that much, Sir
Gervaise. It is a man, beyond a doubt, and there he hangs
at the boom-end, as if sentenced by a general court-martial.
Sir Gervaise now suppressed every expression of surprise,
and his reserve was imitated, quite as a matter of course, by
the twenty officers, who, by this time, had assembled on the
poop. The Druid, keeping away, approached rapidly, and
had soon crossed the flag-ship's wake. Here she came by
the wind, and favoured by the momentum with which she
had come down, and the addition of the mainsail, drew
heavily but steadily up on her lee-quarter. Both vessels
being close-hauled, it was not difficult steering; and by
watching the helms closely, it would have been possible,
perhaps, notwithstanding the heavy sea, to have brought the
two hulls within ten yards of each other, and no harm should
come of it. This was nearer, however, than it was
necessary
to approach; the studding-sail-boom, with the man
suspended on the end of it, projecting twice that distance
beyond the vessel's bows. Still it was nice work; and
while yet some thirty or forty feet from the perpendicular,
the man on the boom-end made a sign for attention, swung
a coil of line he held, and when he saw hands raised to
catch it, he made a cast. A lieutenant caught the rope, and
instantly hauled in the slack. As the object was now
understood
,
a dozen others laid hold of the line, and, at a common
signal, when those on board the Plantagenet hauled in
strongly, the people of the Druid lowered away. By this
simple, but united movement, the man descended obliquely,
leaping out of the bowline in which he had sat, and casting
the whip adrift. Shaking himself to gain his footing, he
raised his cap and bowed to Sir Gervaise, who now saw
Wycherly Wychecombe on his poop.
11 *
CHAPTER IX.
Yet weep not thouthe struggle is not o'er,
O victors of Philippi! many a field
Hath yielded palms to us:one effort more,
By one stern conflict must our fate be sealed.
Mrs. Hemans
.
As
soon as the people of the Plantagenet, who had so far
trespassed on discipline, when they perceived a man
hanging
at the end of the studding-sail-boom, as to appear in the
rigging, on the booms, and on the guns, to watch the result,
saw the stranger safely landed on the poop, they lifted their
hats and caps, and, as one voice, greeted him with three
cheers. The officers smiled at this outbreak of feeling, and
the violation of usage was forgotten; the rigid discipline of
a man-of-war even, giving way occasionally to the sudden
impulses of natural feeling.
As the Druid approached the flag-ship, Captain Blewet
had appeared in her weather mizzen-rigging, conning his
vessel in person; and the order to luff, or keep off, had been
given by his own voice, or by a gesture of his own hand.
As soon as he saw Wycherly's feet on the poop of the
Plantagenet
,
and his active form freed from the double-bowline,
in which it had been seated, the captain made a wide sweep
of the arm, to denote his desire to edge away; the helm of
the frigate was borne up hard, and, as the two-decker surged
ahead on the bosom of a sea, the Druid's bows were knocked
off to leeward, leaving a space of about a hundred feet,
or more, between the two ships, as it might be, in an instant.
The same causes continuing to operate, the Plantagenet
drove still farther ahead, while the frigate soon came to the
wind again, a cable's-length to leeward, and abreast of the
space between the admiral and his second, astern. Here,
Captain Blewet seemed disposed to wait for further orders.
Sir Gervaise Oakes was not accustomed to betray any
surprise he might feel at little events that occurred on duty.
He returned the bow of Wycherly, coolly, and then,
without
question or play of feature, turned his eyes on the
further
movements of the Druid. Satisfied that all was right
with the frigate, he directed the messenger to follow him, and
went below himself, leaving Wycherly to obey as fast as
the many inquiries he had to answer as he descended the
ladders would allow. Atwood, an interested observer of what
had passed, noted that Captain Greenly, of all present, was
the only person who seemed indifferent to the nature of the
communication the stranger might bring, though perhaps
the only one entitled by rank to put an interrogatory.
You have come aboard of us in a novel and
extraordinary
mode, Sir Wycherly Wychecombe! observed the
vice-admiral, a little severely, as soon as he found himself
in his own cabin, alone with the lieutenant.
It was the plan of Captain Blewet, sir, and was really
the only one that seemed likely to succeed, for a boat could
scarcely live. I trust the success of the experiment, and
the nature of the communications I may bring, will be
thought sufficient excuses for the want of ceremony.
It is the first time, since the days of the Conqueror, I
fancy, that an English vice-admiral's ship has been boarded
so cavalierly; but, as you say, the circumstances may
justify
the innovation. What is your errand, sir?
This letter, I presume, Sir Gervaise, will explain itself.
I have little to say in addition, except to report that the
Druid has sprung her foremast in carrying sail to close with
you, and that we have not lost a moment since Admiral
Bluewater ordered us to part company with himself.
You sailed on board the Csar, then? asked Sir
Gervaise
,
a great deal mollified by the zeal for service in a
youth, situated ashore, as he knew Wycherly to be. You
left her, with this letter?
I did, Sir Gervaise, at Admiral Bluewater's command.
Did you go aboard the Druid boom-fashion, or was that
peculiar style reserved for the commander-in-chief?
I left the Csar in a boat, Sir Gervaise; and though we
were much nearer in with the coast, where the wind has not
the rake it has here, and the strength of the gale had not
then come, we were nearly swamped.
If a true Virginian, you would not have drowned,
Wychecombe, answered the vice-admiral, in better humour.
You Americans swim like cork. Excuse me, while I read
what Admiral Bluewater has to say.
Sir Gervaise had received Wycherly in the great cabin,
standing at the table which was lashed in its centre. He
would have been puzzled himself, perhaps, to have given
the real reason why he motioned to the young man to take
a chair, while he went into what he called his
drawingroom
;
or the beautiful little apartment between the two
state-rooms, aft, which was fitted with an elegance that
might have been admired in a more permanent dwelling,
and whither he always withdrew when disposed to reflection.
It was probably connected, however, with a latent
apprehension
of the rear-admiral's political bias, for, when by
himself, he paused fully a minute before he opened the
letter
.
Condemning this hesitation as unmanly, he broke the
seal, however, and read the contents of a letter, which was
couched in the following terms:
My dear Oakes:Since we parted, my mind has
undergone
some violent misgivings as to the course duty
requires
of me, in this great crisis. One handone heart
one voice even, may decide the fate of England! In such
circumstances, all should listen to the voice of conscience,
and endeavour to foresee the consequences of their own acts.
Confidential agents are in the west of England, and one of
them I have seen. By his communications I find more
depends
on myself than I could have imagined, and more on
the movements of M. de Vervillin. Do not be too sanguine
take time for your own decisions, and grant
me
time; for
I feel like a wretch whose fate must soon be sealed. On no
account engage, because you think this division near enough
to sustain you, but at least keep off until you hear from me
more positively, or we can meet. I find it equally hard to
strike a blow against my rightful prince, or to desert my
friend. For God's sake act prudently, and depend on
seeing
me in the course of the next twenty-four hours. I shall
keep well to the eastward, in the hope of falling in with you,
as I feel satisfied de Vervillin has nothing to do very far
west. I may send some verbal message by the bearer, for
my thoughts come sluggishly, and with great reluctance.
Ever
yours
,
Richard Bluewater
.
Sir Gervaise Oakes read this letter twice with great
deliberation
;
then he crushed it in his hand, as one would
strangle a deadly serpent. Not satisfied with this
manifestation
of distaste, he tore the letter into pieces so small as to
render it impossible to imagine its contents, opened a
cabin-window
,
and threw the fragments into the ocean. When
he fancied that every sign of his friend's weakness had thus
been destroyed, he began to pace the cabin in his usual
manner
.
Wycherly heard his step, and wondered at the delay;
but his duty compelled him to pass an uncomfortable
half-hour
in silence, ere the door opened, and Sir Gervaise
appeared
.
The latter had suppressed the signs of distress,
though the lieutenant could perceive he was unusually
anxious
.
Did the rear-admiral send any message, Sir
Wycherly
?
inquired Sir Gervaise; in his letter he would seem
to refer me to some verbal explanations from yourself.
I am ashamed to say, sir, none that I can render very
intelligible. Admiral Bluewater, certainly, did make a few
communications that I was to repeat, but when we had
parted
,
by some extraordinary dullness of my own I fear, I find
it is out of my power to give them any very great
distinctness
or connection.
Perhaps the fault is less your own, sir, than his.
Bluewater
is addicted to fits of absence of mind, and then he has
no reason to complain that others do not understand him,
as he does not always understand himself.
Sir Gervaise said this with a little glee, for he was
greatly
delighted at finding his friend had not committed himself
to his messenger. The latter, however, was less disposed to
excuse himself by such a process, inasmuch as he felt
certain
that the rear-admiral's feelings were in the matter he
communicated, let the manner have been what it might.
I do not think we can attribute anything to Admiral
Bluewater's absence of mind, on this occasion, sir,
answered
Wycherly, with generous frankness. His feelings
appeared to be strongly enlisted in what he said. It might
have been owing to the strength of these feelings that he was
a little obscure, but it could not have been owing to
indifference
.
I shall best understand the matter, then, by hearing
what he did say, sir.
Wycherly paused, and endeavoured to recall what had
passed, in a way to make it intelligible.
I was frequently told to caution you not to engage the
French, sir, until the other division had closed, and was
ready to assist. But, really, whether this was owing to
some secret information that the rear-admiral had obtained,
or to a natural desire to have a share in the battle, is more
than I can say.
Each may have had its influence. Was any allusion
made to secret intelligence, that you name it?
I never felt more cause to be ashamed of my own
dullness
,
than at this present moment, Sir Gervaise Oakes,
exclaimed Wycherly, who almost writhed under the
awkwardness
of his situation; for he really began to suspect
that his own personal grounds of unhappiness had induced
him to forget some material part of his message;recent
events ashore, had perhaps disqualified me for this duty.
It is natural it should be so, my young friend; and as
I am acquainted with them all, you can rest satisfied with
my indulgence.
All! noSir Gervaise, you know not halfbut, I forget
myself, sir, and beg your pardon.
I have no wish to pry into your secrets, Sir Wycherly
Wychecombe, and we will drop the subject. You may say,
however, if the rear-admiral was in good spiritsas an
English
seaman is apt to be, with the prospect of a great battle
before him.
I thought not, Sir Gervaise. Admiral Bluewater to me
seemed sad, if I may presume to mention italmost to
tears, I thought, sir, one or twice.
Poor Dick! mentally ejaculated the vice-admiral; he
never could have made up his mind to desert
me
without
great anguish of soul. Was there anything said, speaking
aloud, about the fleet of M. de Vervillin?
Certainly a good deal, sir; and yet am I ashamed to
say, I scarce know what! Admiral Bluewater appeared to
think the Comte de Vervillin had no intention to strike a
blow at any of our colonies, and with this he seemed to
connect the idea that there would be less necessity for our
engaging him. At all events, I cannot be mistaken in his
wish that you would keep off, sir, until he could close.
Ay, and you see how instinctively I have answered to
his wishes! said Sir Gervaise, smiling a little bitterly.
Nevertheless, had the rear of the fleet been up this
morning
,
Sir Wycherly, it might have been a glorious day for
England!
It
has
been a glorious day, as it is, sir. We, in the
Druid, saw it all; and there was not one among us that did
not exult in the name of Englishman!
What, even to the Virginian, Wychecombe! rejoined
Sir Gervaise, greatly gratified with the natural
commendation
conveyed in the manner and words of the other, and
looking in a smiling, friendly manner, at the young man.
I was afraid the hits you got in Devonshire might have
induced you to separate your nationality from that of old
England.
Even to the Virginian, Sir Gervaise. You have been
in the colonies, sir, and must know we do not merit all that
we sometimes receive, on this side of the Atlantic. The
king has no subjects more loyal than those of America.
I am fully aware of it, my noble lad, and have told the
king as much, with my own mouth. But think no more of
this. If your old uncle did give you an occasional specimen
of true John Bullism, he has left you an honourable title and
a valuable estate. I shall see that Greenly finds a berth for
you, and you will consent to mess with me, I hope. I trust
some time to see you at Bowldero. At present we will go
no deck; and if anything that Admiral Bluewater has said
should
recur to your mind more distinctly, you will not
forget to let me know it.
Wycherly now bowed and left the cabin, while Sir
Gervaise
sat down and wrote a note to Greenly to request that
he would look a little after the comfort of the young man.
The latter then went on deck, in person. Although he
endeavoured
to shake off the painful doubts that beset him,
and to appear as cheerful as became an officer who had just
performed a brilliant exploit, the vice-admiral found it
difficult
to conceal the shock he had received from Bluewater's
communication. Certain as he felt of striking a decisive
blow at the enemy, could he be reinforced with the five
ships of the rear division, he would cheerfully forego the
triumph of such additional success, to be certain his friend
did not intend to carry his disaffection to overt acts. He
found it hard to believe that a man like Bluewater could
really contemplate carrying off with him the ships he
commanded
;
yet he knew the authority his friend wielded over
his captains, and the possibility of such a step would
painfully
obtrude itself on his mind, at moments. When a
man can persuade himself into all the nonsense connected
with the
jus divinum
, thought Sir Gervaise, it is doing
no great violence to common sense to persuade himself
into all its usually admitted consequences. Then, again,
would interpose his recollections of Bluewater's integrity
and simplicity of character, to reassure him, and give him
more cheering hopes for the result. Finding himself thus
vacillating between hope and dread, the commander-in-chief
determined to drive the matter temporarily from his mind,
by bestowing his attention on the part of the fleet he had
with him. Just as this wise resolution was formed, both
Greenly and Wycherly appeared on the poop.
I am glad to see you with a hungry look, Greenly,
cried Sir Gervaise, cheerfully; here has Galleygo just
been to report his breakfast, and, as I know your cabin has
not been put in order since the people left the guns, I hope
for the pleasure of your company. Sir Wycherly, my
gallant
young Virginian, here, will take the third chair, I trust,
and then our party will be complete.
The two gentlemen assenting, the vice-admiral was about
to lead the way below, when suddenly arresting his
footsteps
,
on the poop-ladder, he said
Did you not tell me, Wychecombe, that the Druid had
sprung her foremast?
Badly, I believe, Sir Gervaise, in the hounds. Captain
Blewet carried on his ship fearfully, all night.
Ay, he's a fearful fellow with spars, that Tom Blewet.
I never felt certain of finding all the sticks in their places,
on turning out of a morning, when he was with you as a
lieutenant, Greenly. How many jib-booms and top-gallant
yards did he cost us, in that cruise off the Cape of Good
Hope? By George, it must have been a dozen, at least!
Not quite as bad as that, Sir Gervaise, though he did
expend two jib-booms and three top-gallant yards, for me.
Captain Blewet has a fast ship, and he wishes people to
know it.
And he has sprung his foremast, and he shall see
I
know it! Harkee, Bunting, make the Druid's number to lie
by the prize; and when that's answered, tell him to take
charge of the Frenchman, and to wait for further orders.
I'll send him to Plymouth to get a new foremast, and to see
the stranger in. By the way, does anybody know the name
of the Frenchman  hey! Greenly?
I cannot tell you, Sir Gervaise, though some of our
gentlemen think it is the ship that was the admiral's second
ahead, in our brush off Cape Finisterre. I am not of the
same opinion, however; for that vessel had a billet-head,
and this has a woman figure-head, that looks a little like a
Minerva. The French have a
la Minerve
, I think.
Not now, Greenly, if this be she, for she is
ours
.
Here Sir Gervaise laughed heartily at his own humour, and
all near him joined in, as a matter of course. But la
Minerve
has been a frigate time out of mind. The Goddess
of Wisdom has never been fool enough to get into a line of
battle when she has had it in her power to prevent it.
We
thought the figure-head of the prize a Venus, as
we passed her in the Druid, Wycherly modestly observed.
There is a way of knowing, and it shall be tried. When
you've done with the Druid, Bunting, make the prize's
signal
to repeat her name by telegraph. You know how to
make a prize's number, I suppose, when she has none.
I confess I do not, Sir Gervaise, answered Bunting,
who had shown by his manner that he was at a loss.
Having
no number in our books, one would be at a stand how to
get at her, sir.
How would
you
do it, young man? asked Sir Gervaise,
who all this time was hanging on to the man-rope of the
poop-ladder. Let us see how well you've been taught,
sir.
I believe it may be done in different modes, Sir
Gervaise
,
Wycherly answered, without any appearance of
triumph at his superior readiness, but the simplest I know
is to hoist the French flag under the English, by way of
saying for whom the signal is intended.
Vol. II.  12
Do it, Bunting, continued Sir Gervaise, nodding his
head as he descended the ladder, and I warrant you, Daly
will answer. What sort of work he will make with the
Frenchman's flags, is another matter. I doubt, too, if he
had the wit to carry one of our books with him, in which
case he will be at a loss to read our signal. Try him,
however
,
Bunting; an Irishman always has
something
to say,
though it be a bull.
This order given, Sir Gervaise descended to his cabin.
In half an hour the party was seated at table, as quietly as
if nothing unusual had occurred that day.
The worst of these little brushes which lead to nothing,
is that they leave as strong a smell of gunpowder in your
cabin, Greenly, as if a whole fleet had been destroyed,
observed the vice-admiral good-humouredly, as he began to
help his guests. I hope the odour we have here will not
disturb your appetites, gentlemen.
You do this day's success injustice, Sir Gervaise, in
calling it only a brush, answered the captain, who, to say
the truth, had fallen to as heartily upon the delicacies of
Galleygo, as if he had not eaten in twenty-four hours. At
any rate, it has brushed the spars out of two of king Lewis's
ships, and one of them into our hands; ay, and in a certain
sense into our pockets.
Quite true, Greenly  quite true; but what would it
have been if
The sudden manner in which the commander-in-chief
ceased speaking induced his companions to think that he
had met with some accident in eating or drinking; both
looked earnestly at him, as if to offer assistance. He
was
pale in the face, but he smiled, and otherwise appeared at
his ease.
It is over, gentlemen, said Sir Gervaise, gently
we'll think no more of it.
I sincerely hope you 've not been hit, sir? said
Greenly
.
I've known men hit, who did not discover that they
were hurt until some sudden weakness has betrayed it.
I believe the French have let me off this time, my good
friendyes, I think Magrath will be plugging no shot-holes
in my hull for this affair. Sir Wycherly, those eggs are
from your own estate, Galleygo having laid the manor
under
contribution for all sorts of good things. Try them,
Greenly, as coming from our friend's property.
Sir Wycherly is a lucky fellow in
having
an estate,
said the captain. Few officers of his rank can boast of
such an advantage; though, now and then, an old one is
better off.
That is true enough  hey! Greenly? The army
fetches up most of the fortunes; for your rich fellows like
good county quarters and county balls. I was a younger
brother when they sent
me
to sea, but I became a baronet,
and a pretty warm one too, while yet a reefer. Poor
Josselin
died when I was only sixteen, and at seventeen they
made me an officer.
Ay, and we like you all the better, Sir Gervaise, for not
giving us up when the money came. Now Lord Morganic
was a captain when
he
succeeded, and we think much less
of that.
Morganic remains in service, to teach us how to stay
top-masts and paint figure-heads; observed Sir Gervaise, a
little drily. And yet the fellow handled his ship well
to-day
;
making much better weather of it than I feared he
would be able to do.
I hear we are likely to get another duke in the navy,
sir; it's not often we catch one of that high rank.
Sir Gervaise cared much less for things of this sort than
Bluewater, but he naturally cast a glance at the speaker, as
this was said, as much as to ask whom he meant.
They tell me, sir, that Lord Montresor, the elder brother
of the boy in the Csar, is in a bad way, and Lord Geoffrey
stands next to the succession. I think there is too much
stuff in
him
to quit us now he is almost fit to get his
commission
.
True, Bluewater has that boy of high hopes and
promise
with him, too; answered Sir Gervaise in a musing
manner, unconscious of what he said. God send he may
not forget
that
, among other things!
I don't think rank makes any difference with Admiral
Bluewater, or Captain Stowel. The nobles are worked up
in their ship, as well as the humblest reefer of them all.
Here is Bunting, sir, to tell us something.
Sir Gervaise started from a fit of abstraction, and,
turning
,
he saw his signal officer ready to report.
The Druid has answered properly, Sir Gervaise, and
has already hauled up so close that I think she will luff
through the line, though it may be astern of the Carnatic.
And the prize, Bunting? Have you signalled the prize,
as I told you to do?
Yes, sir; and she has answered so properly that I make
no question the prize-officer took a book with him. The
telegraphic signal was answered like the other.
Well, what does he say? Have you found out the name
of the Frenchman?
That's the difficulty, sir;
we
are understood, but Mr.
Daly has shown something aboard the prize that the
quarter-master
swears is a paddy.
A paddy!What, he hasn't had himself run up at a
yard-arm, or stun'sail-boom end, has he  hey?
Wychecombe
?
Daly's an Irishman, and has only to show
himself
to show a paddy.
But this is a sort of an image of some kind or other,
Sir Gervaise, and yet it isn't Mr. Daly. I rather think he
hasn't the flags necessary for our words, and has rigged out
a sort of a woman, to let us know his ship's name; for she
has
a woman figure-head, you know, sir.
The devil he has! Well, that will form an era in
signals
.
Galleygo, look out at the cabin-window and let me
know if you can see the prize from themwell, sir, what's
the news?
I sees her, Sir Jarvy, answered the steward, and I
sees her where no French ship as sails in company with
British vessels has a right to be. If she's a fathom, your
honour, she's fifty to windward of our line! Quite out of
her place, as a body might say, and onreasonable.
That's owing to our having felled the forests of her
masts, Mr. Galleygo; every spar that is left helping to put
her where she is. That prize must be a weatherly ship,
though, hey! Greenly? She and her consort were well to
windward of their own line, or we could never have got 'em
as we did. These Frenchmen
do
turn off a weatherly
vessel
now and then,that we must all admit.
Yes, Sir Jarvy, put in Galleygo, who never let the
conversation flag when he was invited to take a part in it;
yes, Sir Jarvy, and when they 've turned 'em off the stocks
they turns 'em over to us, commonly, to sail 'em. Building
a craft is one piece of knowledge, and sailing her
well
is
another.
Enough of your philosophy, sirrah; look and ascertain
if there is anything unusual to be seen hanging in the
rigging
of the prize. Unless you show more readiness, I 'll
send one of the Bowlderos to help you.
These Bowlderos were the servants that Sir Gervaise
brought with him from his house, having been born on his
estate, and educated as domestics in his own, or his father's
family; and though long accustomed to a man-of-war, as
their ambition never rose above their ordinary service, the
steward held them exceedingly cheap. A severer
punishment
could not be offered him, than to threaten to direct one
of these common menials to do any duty that, in the least,
pertained to the profession. The present menace had the
desired effect, Galleygo losing no time in critically
examining
the prize's rigging.
I calls nothing extr'ornary in a Frenchman's rigging,
Sir Jarvy, answered the steward, as soon as he felt sure
of his fact; their dock-men have idees of their own, as to
such things. Now there is sum'mat hanging at the lee
fore-yard-arm of that chap, that looks as if it might be a
top-gallant-stun'sail made up to be sent aloft and set, but
which stopped when it got as high as it is, on finding out that
there 's no hamper over-head to spread it to.
That 's it, sir, put in Bunting. Mr. Daly has run
his woman up to the fore-yard-arm, like a pirate.
Woman! repeated Galleygo  do you call that 'ere
thing-um-mee a woman, Mr. Buntin'? I calls it a bundle
of flags, made up to set, if there was anything to set 'em
to.
It 's nothing but an Irish woman, Master Galleygo, as
you 'll see for yourself, if you 'll level this glass at it.
I 'll do that office myself, cried Sir Gervaise. Have
you any curiosity, gentlemen, to read Mr. Daly's signal?
Galleygo, open that weather window, and clear away the
books and writing-desk, that we may have a look.
The orders were immediately obeyed, and the
vice-admiral
12 *
was soon seated examining the odd figure that was
certainly hanging at the lee fore-yard-arm of the prize; a
perfect nondescript as regarded all nautical experience.
Hang me, if I can make anything of it, Greenly, said
Sir Gervaise, after a long look. Do
you
take this seat,
and try your hand at an observation. It resembles a sort
of a woman, sure enough.
Yes, sir, observed Bunting, with the earnestness of a
man who felt his reputation involved in the issue, I was
certain that Mr. Daly has run up the figure to let us know
the name of the prize, and that for want of a telegraph-book
to signal the letters; and so I made sure of what I was
about, before I took the liberty to come below and report.
And pray what do you make of it, Bunting? The
figure-head might tell us better, but that seems to be
imperfect
.
The figure-head had lost all its bust, and one arm, by
a shot, said Greenly, turning the glass to the object named;
and I can tell Mr. Daly that a part of the gammoning of
his bowsprit is gone, too! That ship requires looking to,
Sir Gervaise; she 'll have no foremast to-morrow morning,
if this wind stand! Another shot has raked the lower side
of her fore-top, and carried away half the frame. Yes, and
there 's been a fellow at work, too
Never mind the shot  never mind the shot, Greenly,
interrupted the vice-admiral. A poor devil like him,
couldn't have six of us at him, at once, and expect to go
`shot free.' Tell us something of the woman.
Well, Sir Gervaise, no doubt Daly has hoisted her as a
symbol. Ay, no doubt the ship is the Minerva, after all, for
there 's something on the head like a helmet.
It never can be the Minerva, said the vice-admiral,
positively, for
she
, I feel certain, is a frigate. Hand me
the little book with a red cover, Bunting; that near your
hand; it has a list of the enemy's navy. Here it is
`
la Minerve
, 32,
le capitaine de frgate, Mondon
. Built in
1733, old and dull.' That settles the Minerva, for this list
is the last sent us by the admiralty.
Then it must be the Pallas, rejoined Greenly, for
she wears a helmet, too, and I am certain there is not only
a cap to resemble a helmet, but a Guernsey frock on the
body to represent armour. Both Minerva and Pallas, if I
remember right, wore armour.
This is coming nearer to the point,hey! Greenly,
the vice-admiral innocently chimed in; let us look and
see if the Pallas is a two-decker or not. By George, there 's
no such name on the list. That's odd, now, that the French
should have one of these goddesses and not the other!
They never has anything right, Sir Jarvy, Galleygo
thrust in, by way of commentary on the vice-admiral's and
the captain's classical lore; and it 's surprising to me that
they should have any goddess at all, seeing that they has
so little respect for religion, in general.
Wycherly fidgeted, but respect for his superiors kept
him silent. As for Bunting, 't was all the same to him, his
father having been a purser in the navy, and he himself
educated altogether on board ship, and this, too, a century
since.
It might not be amiss, Sir Gervaise, observed the
captain
,
to work this rule backwards, and just look over the
list until we find a two-decked ship that
ought
to have a
woman figure-head, which will greatly simplify the matter.
I 've known difficult problems solved in that mode.
The idea struck Sir Gervaise as a good one, and he set
about the execution of the project in good earnest. Just as
he came to
l'Hecate
64, an exclamation from Greenly
caught his attention, and he inquired its cause.
Look for yourself, Sir Gervaise; unless my eyes are
good for nothing, Daly is running a kedge up alongside of
his woman.
What, a kedge?Ay, that is intended for an anchor,
and it means Hope. Everybody knows that Hope carries
an anchor,hey! Wychecombe? Upon my word, Daly
shows ingenuity. Look for the Hope, in that list, Bunting,
you will find the English names printed first, in the end
of the book.
`The Hope, or
l'Esperance
,' read the signal-officer;
`36,
lee capitang dee frigate dee Courtraii
.'
A single-decked ship, after all! This affair is as bad
as the dd
nullus
, ashore, there. I 'll not be beaten in
learning, however, by any Frenchman who ever floated.
Go below, Locker, and desire Doctor Magrath to step up
here, if he is not occupied with the wounded. He knows
more Latin than any man in the ship.
Yes, Sir Jarvy, but this is French, you knows, your
honour, and isn't as Latin, at all. I expects she 'll turn out
to have some name as no modest person wishes to use, and
we shall have to halter it.
Ay, he 's catted his anchor, sure enough; if the figure
be not Hope, it must be Faith, or Charity.
No fear of them, Sir Jarvy; the French has no faith,
nor no charity, no, nor no bowels, as any poor fellow knows
as has ever been wrecked on their coast, as once happened
to me, when a b'y. I looks upon 'em as no better than so
many heatheners, and perhaps that 's the name of the ship.
I 've seed heatheners, a hundred times, Sir Jarvy, in that
sort of toggery.
What, man, did you ever see a heathen with an anchor?
one that will weigh three hundred, if it will weigh a
pound?
Perhaps not, your honour, with a downright hanchor,
but with sum'mat like a killog. But, that 's no hanchor,
a'ter all, but only a kedge, catted hanchor-fashion, sir.
Here comes Magrath, to help us out of the difficulty;
and we 'll propound the matter to him.
The vice-admiral now explained the whole affair to the
surgeon, frankly admitting that the classics of the cabin
were at fault, and throwing himself on the gun-room for
assistance. Magrath was not a little amused, as he listened,
for this was one of his triumphs, and he chuckled not a
little at the dilemma of his superiors.
Well, Sir Jairvis, he answered, ye might do warse
than call a council o' war on the matter; but if it 's the
name ye 'll be wanting, I can help ye to that, without the
aids of symbols, and signs, and hyeroglyphics of any sort.
As we crossed the vessel's wake, a couple of hours since, I
read it on her stern, in letters of gold. It 's
la Victoire
, or
the Victory; a most unfortunate cognomen for an unlucky
ship. She 's a French victory, however, ye 'll remember,
gentlemen!
That must be a mistake, Magrath; for Daly has shown
an anchor, yonder; and Victory carries no anchor.
It 's hard to say, veece-admiral, one man's victory being
another man's defeat. As for Mr. Daly's image, it 's just
an
Irish
goddess; and allowances must be made for the
country.
Sir Gervaise laughed, invited the gentlemen to help
demolish
the breakfast, and sent orders on deck to hoist the
answering flag. At a later day, Daly, when called on for
an explanation, asserted that the armour and helmet
belonged
to Victory, as a matter of course; though he admitted
that he had at first forgotten the anchor; but, when I
did
run it up, they read it aboard the ould Planter, as if it had
been just so much primmer.
CHAPTER X.
There 's beauty in the deep:
The wave is bluer than the sky;
And, though the light shines bright on high,
More softly do the sea-gems glow,
That sparkle in the depths below;
The rainbow's tints are only made
When on the waters they are laid.
And sun and moon most sweetly shine
Upon the ocean's level brine.
There 's beauty in the deep.
Brainard
.
As Daly was the recognised jester of the fleet, his
extraordinary
attempt to announce his vessel's name was
received
as a characteristic joke, and it served to laugh at until
something better offered. Under the actual circumstances
of the two squadrons, however, it was soon temporarily
forgotten
in graver things, for few believed the collision that
had already taken place was to satisfy a man of the known
temperament of the commander-in-chief. As the junction
of the rear division was the only thing wanting to bring on
a general engagement, as soon as the weather should
moderate
a little, every ship had careful look-outs aloft, sweeping
the horizon constantly with glasses, more particularly
towards
the east and north-east. The gale broke about noon,
though the wind still continued fresh from the same
quarter
as before. The sea began to go down, however, and at
eight bells material changes had occurred in the situations
of both fleets. Some of these it may be necessary to
mention
.
The ship of the French admiral, le Foudroyant, and le
Scipion, had been received, as it might be, in the arms of
their own fleet, in the manner already mentioned; and from
this moment, the movement of the whole force was, in a
measure, regulated by that of these two crippled vessels.
The former ship, by means of her lower sails, might have
continued to keep her station in the line, so long as the gale
lasted; but the latter unavoidably fell off, compelling her
consorts to keep near, or to abandon her to her fate. M.
de Vervillin preferred the latter course. The consequences
were, that, by the time the sun was in the zenith, his line, a
good deal extended, still, and far from regular, was quite
three leagues to leeward of that of the English. Nor was
this all: at that important turn in the day, Sir Gervaise
Oakes was enabled to make sail on all his ships, setting the
fore and mizzen-top-sails close-reefed; while la Victoire, a
fast vessel, was enabled to keep in company by carrying
whole courses. The French could not imitate this,
inasmuch
as one of their crippled vessels had nothing standing
but a foremast. Sir Gervaise had ascertained, before the
distance became too great for such observations, that the
enemy was getting ready to send up new top-masts, and
the other necessary spars on board the admiral, as well as
jury lower-masts in le Scipion; though the sea would not yet
permit any very positive demonstrations to be made towards
such an improvement. He laid his own plans for the
approaching
night accordingly; determining not to worry his
people, or notify the enemy of his intentions, by attempting
any similar improvement in the immediate condition of his
prize.
About noon, each ship's number was made in succession,
and the question was put if she had sustained any material
injury in the late conflict. The answers were satisfactory
in general, though one or two of the vessels made such
replies
as induced the commander-in-chief to resort to a still
more direct mode of ascertaining the real condition of his
fleet. In order to effect this important object, Sir Gervaise
waited two hours longer, for the double purpose of letting
all the messes get through with their dinners, and to permit
the wind to abate and the sea to fall, as both were now fast
doing. At the expiration of that time, however, he
appeared
on the poop, summoning Bunting to his customary duty.
At 2 P. M. it blew a whole top-sail breeze, as it is called;
but the sea being still high, and the ships close-hauled, the
vice-admiral did not see fit to order any more sail.
Perhaps
he was also influenced by a desire not to increase his
distance from the enemy, it being a part of his plan to keep
M. de Vervillin in plain sight so long as the day continued,
in order that he might have a tolerable idea of the position
of his fleet, during the hours of darkness. His present
intention
was to cause his vessels to pass before him in
review
,
as a general orders his battalions to march past a
station
occupied by himself and staff, with a view to judge by
his own eye of their steadiness and appearance.
Vice-Admiral
Oakes was the only officer in the British navy who
ever resorted to this practice; but he did many things of
which other men never dreamed, and, among the rest, he
did not hesitate to attack double his force, when an occasion
offered, as has just been seen. The officers of the fleet
called these characteristic reviews Sir Jarvy's field-days,
finding a malicious pleasure in comparing anything out of
the common nautical track, to some usage of the soldiers.
Bunting got his orders, notwithstanding the jokes of the
fleet; and the necessary signals were made and the answers
given. Captain Greenly then received his verbal
instructions
,
when the commander-in-chief went below, to prepare
himself for the approaching scene. When Sir Gervaise
re-appeared
on the poop, he was in full uniform, wearing the
star of the Bath, as was usual with him on all solemn
official
occasions. Atwood and Bunting were at his side, while
the Bowlderos, in their rich shore-liveries, formed a group
at hand. Captain Greenly and his first lieutenant joined
the party as soon as their duty with the ship was over. On
the opposite side of the poop, the whole of the marines off
guard were drawn up in triple lines, with their officers at
their head. The ship herself had hauled up her main-sail,
hauled down all her stay-sails, and lay with her
main-top-sail
braced sharp aback, with orders to the quarter-master
to keep her little off the wind; the object being to leave a
little way through the water, in order to prolong the
expected
interviews. With these preparations the
commander-in-chief
awaited the successive approach of his ships, the
sun, for the first time in twenty-four hours, making his
appearance in a flood of brilliant summer-light, as if
purposely
to grace the ceremony.
The first ship that drew near the Plantagenet was the
Carnatic, as a matter of course, she being the next in the
line. This vessel, remarkable, as the commander-in-chief
had observed, for never being out of the way, was not long
in closing, though as she luffed up on the admiral's
weather-quarter
,
to pass to windward, she let go all her top-sail
bowlines, so as to deaden her way, making a sort of
half-board
.
This simple evolution, as she righted her helm,
brought her about fifty yards to windward of the
Plantagenet
,
past which ship she surged slowly but steadily, the
weather now permitting a conversation to be held at that
distance, and by means of trumpets, with little or no effort
of the voice.
Most of the officers of the Carnatic were on her poop, as
she came sweeping up heavily, casting her shadow on the
Plantagenet's decks. Captain Parker himself was standing
near the ridge-ropes, his head uncovered, and the grey hairs
floating in the breeze. The countenance of this
simple-minded
veteran was a little anxious, for, had he feared the
enemy a tenth part as much as he stood in awe of his
commanding
officer, he would have been totally unfit for his
station. Now he glanced upward at his sails, to see that all
was right; then, as he drew nearer, fathom by fathom as it
might be, he anxiously endeavoured to read the expression
of the vice-admiral's face.
How do you do, Captain Parker? commenced Sir
Gervaise
,
with true trumpet formality, making the customary
salutation.
How is Sir Gervaise Oakes, to-day? I hope untouched
in the late affair with the enemy?
Quite well, I thank you, sir. Has the Carnatic received
any serious injury in the battle?
None to mention, Sir Gervaise. A rough scrape of the
foremast; but not enough to alarm us, now the weather has
moderated; a little rigging cut, and a couple of raps in the
hull.
Have your people suffered, sir?
Two killed and seven wounded, Sir Gervaise. Good
lads, most of 'em; but enough like 'em remain.
I understand, then, Captain Parker, that you report the
Carnatic fit for any service?
As much so as my poor abilities enable me to make her,
Sir Gervaise Oakes, answered the other, a little alarmed
at the formality and precision of the question. Meet her
with the helmmeet her with the helm.
All this passed while the Carnatic was making her
half-board
,
and, the helm being righted, she now slowly and
majestically fell off with her broadside to the admiral,
gathering way as her canvass began to draw again. At
this instant, when the yard-arms of the two ships were about
a hundred feet asunder, and just as the Carnatic drew up
fairly abeam, Sir Gervaise Oakes raised his hat, stepped
quickly to the side of the poop, waved his hand for silence,
and spoke with a distinctness that rendered his words
audible
to all in both vessels.
Captain Parker, he said, I wish, publicly, to thank
you for your noble conduct this day. I have always said
a surer support could never follow a commander-in-chief
into battle; you have more than proved my opinion to be
true. I wish, publicly, to thank you, sir.
Sir Gervaise  I cannot express  God bless you, Sir
Gervaise!
I have but one fault to find with you, sir, and that is
easily pardoned.
I 'm sure I hope so, sir.
You handled your ship so rapidly and so surely, that
we
had hardly time to get out of the way of your guns!
Old Parker could not now have answered had his life
depended
on it; but he bowed, and dashed a hand across his
eyes. There was but a moment to say any more.
If His Majesty's sword be not laid on
your
shoulder,
Vol. II.  13
for this day's work, sir, it shall be no fault of mine, added
Sir Gervaise, waving his hat in adieu.
While this dialogue lasted, so profound was the stillness
in the two ships, that the wash of the water under the bows
of the Carnatic, was the only sound to interfere with Sir
Gervaise's clarion voice; but the instant he ceased to speak,
the crews of both vessels rose as one man, and cheered.
The officers joined heartily, and to complete the
compliment
,
the commander-in-chief ordered his own marines to
present arms to the passing vessel. Then it was that, every
sail drawing, again the Carnatic took a sudden start, and
shot nearly her length ahead, on the summit of a sea. In
half a minute more, she was ahead of the Plantagenet's
flying-jib-boom-end, steering a little free, so as not to throw
the admiral to leeward.
The Carnatic was scarcely out of the way, before the
Achilles was ready to take her place. This ship, having
more room, had easily luffed to windward of the
Plantagenet
,
simply letting go her bowlines, as her bows doubled on
the admiral's stern, in order to check her way.
How do you do to-day, Sir Gervaise? called out Lord
Morganic, without waiting for the commander-in-chief's
hailallow me to congratulate you, sir, on the exploits of
this glorious day!
I thank you, my lord, and wish to say I am satisfied
with the behaviour of your ship. You 've
all
done well,
and I desire to thank you
all
. Is the Achilles injured?
Nothing to speak of, sir. A little rigging gone, and
here and there a stick.
Have you lost any men, my lord? I desire
particularly
to know the condition of each ship.
Some eight or ten poor fellows, I believe, Sir Gervaise;
but we are ready to engage this instant.
It is well, my lord; steady your bowlines, and make
room for the Thunderer.
Morganic gave the order, but as his ship drew ahead he
called out in a pertinacious way,I hope, Sir Gervaise,
you don't mean to give that other lame duck up. I 've got
my first lieutenant on board one of 'em, and confess to a
desire to put the second on board another.
Ay  ay  Morganic,
we
knock down the birds, and
you
bag em. I 'll give you more sport in the same way,
before I 've done with ye.
This little concession, even Sir Gervaise Oakes, a man
not accustomed to trifle in matters of duty, saw fit to make
to the other's rank; and then the Achilles withdrew from
before the flag-ship, as the curtain is drawn from before the
scene.
I do believe, Greenleaf, observed Lord Morganic to
his surgeon, one of his indulged favourites; that Sir Jarvy
is a little jealous of us, because Daly got into the prize before
he could send one of his own boats aboard of her. 'T will
tell well in the gazette, too, will it not?`The French ship
was taken possession of, and brought off, by the Achilles,
Captain the Earl of Morganic!' I hope the old fellow will
have the decency to give us our due. I rather think it
was
our last broadside that brought the colours down?
A suitable answer was returned, but as the ship is
drawing
ahead, we cannot follow her to relate it. The vessel
that approached the third, was the Thunderer, Captain
Foley. This was one of the ships that had received the fire
of the three leading French vessels, after they had brought
the wind abeam, and being the leading vessel of the English
rear, she had suffered more than any other of the British
squadron. The fact was apparent, as she approached, by
the manner in which her rigging was knotted, and the
attention
that had been paid to her spars. Even as she closed,
the men were on the yard bending a new main-course, the
old one having been hit on the bolt-rope, and torn nearly
from the spar. There were also several plugs on her
lee-side
to mark the spots where the French guns had told.
The usual greetings passed between the vice-admiral and
his captain, and the former put his questions.
We have not been quite exchanging salutes, Sir
Gervaise
,
answered Captain Foley; but the ship is ready for
service again. Should the wind moderate a little, I think
everything would stand to carry sail
hard
.
I 'm glad to hear it, sir
rejoiced
to hear it, sir. I
feared more for you, than for any other vessel. I hope
you 've not suffered materially in your crew?
Nine killed, Sir Gervaise; and the surgeon tells me
sixteen
wounded.
That proves you 've not been in port, Foley! Well, I
dare say, could the truth be known, it would be found that
M. de Vervillin's vessels bear your marks, in revenge.
AdieuadieuGod bless you.
The Thunderer glided ahead, making room for the
Blenheim
,
Captain Sterling. This was one of your serviceable
ships, without any show or style about her; but a vessel
that was always ready to give and take. Her commander
was a regular sea-dog, a little addicted to hard and
outlandish
oaths, a great consumer of tobacco and brandy; but
who had the discrimination never to swear in the presence
of the commander-in-chief, although he had been known to
do so in a church; or to drink more than he could well
carry, when he was in presence of an enemy or a gale of
wind. He was too firm a man, and too good a seaman, to
use the bottle as a refuge; it was the companion of his ease
and pleasure, and to confess the truth, he then treated it
with an affectionate benevolence, that rendered it exceedingly
difficult for others not to entertain some of his own partiality
for it. In a word, Captain Sterling was a sailor of the old
school; for there was an old school in manners, habits,
opinions, philosophy, morals, and reason, a century since,
precisely as there
is
to-day, and probably
will
be, a century
hence.
The Blenheim made a good report, not having sustained
any serious injury whatever; nor had she a man hurt. The
captain reported his ship as fit for service as she was the
hour she lifted her anchor.
So much the better, Sterlingso much the better. You
shall take the edge off the next affair, by way of giving you
another chance. I rely on the Blenheim, and on her
captain
.
I thank you, sir, returned Sterling, as his ship moved
on; by the way, Sir Gervaise, would it not be fair-play
to rummage the prize's lockers before she gets into the hands
of the custom-house? Out here on the high seas, there can
be no smuggling in
that;
there must be good claret aboard
her.
There would be `plunder of a prize,' Sterling, said the
vice-admiral, laughing, for he knew that the question was
put more as a joke than a serious proposition; and that
is death, without benefit of clergy. Move on; here is
Goodfellow
close upon your heels.
The last ship in the English line was the Warspite,
Captain
Goodfellow, an officer remarkable in the service at that
day, for a religious turn, as it was called. As is usually
the case with men of this stamp, Captain Goodfellow was
quiet, thoughtful, and attentive to his duty. There was less
of the real tar in him, perhaps, than in some of his
companions
;
but his ship was in good order, always did her
duty, and was remarkably attentive to signals; a
circumstance
that rendered her commander a marked favourite
with the vice-admiral. After the usual questions were put
and answered, Sir Gervaise informed Goodfellow that he
intended to change the order of sailing so as to bring him
near the van.
We will give old Parker a breathing spell, Goodfellow,
added the commander-in-chief, and you will be my second
astern. I must go ahead of you all, or you 'll be running
down on the Frenchman without orders; pretending you
can't see the signals, in the smoke.
The Warspite drove ahead, and the Plantagenet was now
left to receive the prize and the Druid; the Chloe, Driver,
and Active, not being included in the signal. Daly had been
gradually eating the other ships out of the wind, as has been
mentioned already, and when the order was given to pass
within hail, he grumbled not a little at the necessity of losing
so much of his vantage-ground. Nevertheless, it would not
do to joke with the commander-in-chief in a matter of this
sort, and he was fain to haul up his courses, and wait for
the moment when he might close. By the time the
Warspite
was out of the way, his ship had drifted down so near
the admiral, that he had nothing to do but to haul aboard
his tacks again, and pass as near as was at all desirable.
When quite near, he hauled up his mainsail, by order of the
vice-admiral.
Are you much in want of anything, Mr. Daly?
demanded
Sir Gervaise, as soon as the lieutenant appeared
forward to meet his hail. The sea is going down so fast,
that we might now send you some boats.
Many thanks, Sir Gervaise; I want to get rid of a
hundred
or two Frenchmen, and to have a hundred Englishmen
13 *
in their places. We are but twenty-one of the king's
subjects
here, all told.
Captain Blewet is ordered to keep company with you,
sir; and as soon as it is dark, I intend to send you into
Plymouth under the frigate's convoy. Is she a nice ship,
hey! Daley?
Why, Sir Gervaise, she 's like a piece of broken
crockery
,
just now, and one can't tell all her merits. She's not
a bad goer, and weatherly, I think, all will call her. But
she 's thundering French, inside.
We 'll make her English in due time, sir. How are the
leaks? do the pumps work freely?
Deuce the l'ake has she, Sir Gervaise, and the pumps
suck like a nine months' babby. And if they didn't, we 're
scarce the boys to find out the contr
a
ry, being but nineteen
working hands.
Very well, Daly; you can haul aboard your main-tack,
now; remember, you 're to go into Plymouth, as soon as it
is dark. If you see anything of Admiral Bluewater, tell
him I rely on his support, and only wait for his appearance
to finish Monsieur de Vervillin's job.
I 'll do all that, with hearty good will, sir. Pray, Sir
Gervaise, added Daly, grinning, on the poop of the prize,
whither he had got by this time, having walked aft as his
ship went ahead, how do you like French signals? For
want of a better, we were driven to the classics!
Ay, you 'd be bothered to explain all your own flags, I
fancy. The name of the ship is the Victory, I am told;
why did you put her in armour, and whip a kedge up against
the poor woman?
It 's according to the books, Sir Gervaise. Every word
of it out of Cicero, and Cord
a
iry, and Cornelius Nepos, and
them sort of fellows. Oh! I went to school, sir, before I
went to sea, as you say yourself, sometimes, Sir Gervaise;
and literature is the same in Ireland, as it is all over the
world. Victory needs armour, sir, in order to be
victorious
,
and the anchor is to show that she doesn't belong to
`the cut and run' family. I am as sure that all was right,
as I ever was of my moods and tenses.
Very well, Daly, answered Sir Gervaise, laughing
My lords shall know your merits in that way, and it may
get you named a professor  keep your luff, or you 'll be
down on our sprit-sail-yard;  remember and follow the
Druid.
Here the gentlemen waved their hands in adieu as usual,
and la Victoire, clipped as she was of her wings, drew
slowly past. The Druid succeeded, and Sir Gervaise
simply
gave Blewet his orders to see the prize into port, and to
look after his own fore-mast. This ended the field day;
the frigate luffing up to windward of the line again, leaving
the Plantagenet in its rear. A few minutes later, the latter
ship filled and stood after her consorts.
The vice-admiral having now ascertained, in the most
direct manner, the actual condition of his fleet, had
data
on
which to form his plans for the future. But for the letter
from Bluewater, he would have been perfectly happy; the
success of the day having infused a spirit into the
different
vessels, that, of itself, was a pledge of more important
results. Still he determined to act as if that letter had
never been written, finding it impossible to believe that one
who had so long been true, could really fail him in the hour
of need. I know his heart better than he knows it
himself
,
he caught himself mentally exclaiming, and before
either of us is a day older, this will I prove to him, to his
confusion and my triumph. He had several short and
broken conversations with Wycherly in the course of the
afternoon, with a view to ascertain, if possible, the real
frame of mind in which his friend had written, but without
success, the young man frankly admitting that, owing to a
confusion of thought that he modestly attributed to himself,
but which Sir Gervaise well knew ought in justice to be
imputed
to Bluewater, he had not been able to bring away with
him any very clear notions of the rear-admiral's intentions.
In the meanwhile, the elements were beginning to exhibit
another of their changeful humours. A gale in summer is
seldom of long duration, and twenty-four hours would seem
to be the period which nature had assigned to this. The
weather had moderated materially by the time the review
had taken place, and five hours later, not only had the sea
subsided to a very reasonable swell, but the wind had
hauled
several points; coming out a fresh top-gallant breeze at
north-west. The French fleet wore soon after, standing
about north-east-by-north, or on an easy bowline. They
had been active in repairing damages, and the admiral was
all a-tanto again, with everything set that the other ships
carried. The plight of le Scipion was not so easily
remedied
,
though even she had two jury-masts rigged, assistance
having been sent from the other vessels as soon as boats
could safely pass. As the sun hung in the western sky,
wanting about an hour of disappearing from one of the long
summer days of that high latitude, this ship set a
mizzen-top-sail
in the place of a main, and a fore-top-gallant-sail in
lieu of a mizzen-top-sail. Thus equipped, she was enabled
to keep company with her consorts, all of which were
under
easy canvass, waiting for the night to cover their
movements
.
Sir Gervaise Oakes had made the signal for his fleet to
tack in succession, from the rear to the van, about an hour
before le Scipion had obtained this additional sail. The
order was executed with great readiness, and, as the ships
had been looking up as high as west-south-west before,
when they got round, and headed north-north-east, their
line of sailing was still quite a league to windward of that
of the enemy. As each vessel filled on the larboard tack,
she shortened sail to allow the ships astern to keep away,
and close to her station. It is scarcely necessary to say,
that this change again brought the Plantagenet to the head
of the line, with the Warspite, however, instead of the
Carnatic
,
for her second astern; the latter vessel being quite in
the rear.
It was a glorious afternoon, and there was every promise
of as fine a night. Still, as there were but about six hours
of positive darkness at that season of the year, and the
moon would rise at midnight, the vice-admiral knew he had
no time to lose, if he would effect anything under the cover
of obscurity. Reefs were no longer used, though all the
ships were under short canvass, in order to accommodate
their movements to those of the prize. The latter, however,
was now in tow of the Druid, and, as this frigate carried
her top-gallant-sails, aided by her own courses, la Victoire
was enabled not only to keep up with the fleet, then under
whole top-sails, but to maintain her weatherly position. Such
was the state of things just as the sun dipped, the enemy
being on the lee bow, distant one and a half leagues, when
the Plantagenet showed a signal for the whole fleet to heave
to, with the main-top-sails to the masts. This command
was scarcely executed, when the officers on deck were
surprised
to hear a boatswain's mate piping away the crew of the
vice-admiral's barge, or that of the boat which was
appropriated
to the particular service of the commander-in-chief.
Did I hear aright, Sir Gervaise? inquired Greenly,
with curiosity and interest; is it your wish to have your
barge manned, sir?
You heard perfectly right, Greenly; and, if disposed
for a row this fine evening, I shall ask the favour of your
company. Sir Wycherly Wychecombe, as you are an idler
here, I have a flag-officer's right to press you into my service.
By the way, Greenly, I have made out and signed an order
to this gentleman to report himself to you, as attached to
my family, as the soldiers call it; as soon as Atwood has
copied it, it will be handed to him, when I beg you will
consider
him as my first aid.
To this no one could object, and Wycherly made a bow
of acknowledgment. At that instant the barge was seen
swinging off over the ship's waist, and, at the next, the yard
tackles were heard overhauling themselves. The splash of
the boat in the water followed. The crew was in her, with
oars on end, and poised boat-hooks, in another minute. The
guard presented, the boatswain piped over, the drum rolled,
and Wycherly jumped to the gangway and was out of sight
quick as thought. Greenly and Sir Gervaise followed, when
the boat shoved off.
Although the seas had greatly subsided, and their combs
were no longer dangerous, the Atlantic was far from being
as quiet as a lake in a summer eventide. At the very first
dash of the oars the barge rose on a long, heavy swell that
buoyed her up like a bubble, and as the water glided from
under her again, it seemed as if she was about to sink into
some cavern of the ocean. Few things give more vivid
impressions
of helplessness than boats thus tossed by the
waters
when not in their raging humours; for one is apt to
expect better treatment than thus to be made the plaything
of the element. All, however, who have ever floated on
even the most quiet ocean, must have experienced more or
less of this helpless dependence, the stoutest boat, impelled
by the lustiest crews, appearing half the time like a
feather
floating in capricious currents of the air.
The occupants of the barge, however, were too familiar
with their situation to think much of these matters; and, as
soon as Sir Gervaise had assented to Wycherly's offer to
take the tiller, he glanced upward, with a critical eye, in
order to scan the Plantagenet's appearance.
That fellow, Morganic, has got a better excuse for his
xebec-rig than I had supposed, Greenly, he said, after a
minute of observation. Your fore-top-mast is at least
six inches too far forward, and I beg you will have it stayed
aft to-morrow morning, if the weather permit. None of
your Mediterranean craft for me, in the narrow seas.
Very well, Sir Gervaise; the spar shall be righted in
the morning watch, quietly returned the captain.
Now, there's Goodfellow, half-parson as he is; the
man contrives to keep his sticks more upright than any
captain
in the fleet. You never see a spar half an inch out of
its place, on board the Warspite.
That is because her captain trims everything by his own
life, sir, rejoined Greenly, smiling. Were we half as
good as he is, in other matters, we might be better than we
are in seamanship.
I do not think religion hurts a sailor, Greenlyno, not
in the least. That is to say, when he don't wedge his masts
too tight, but leaves play enough for all weathers. There
is no cant in Goodfellow.
Not the least of it, sir, and that it is which makes him
so great a favourite. The chaplain of the Warspite is of
some use; but one might as well have a bowsprit rigged out
of a cabin-window, as have our chap.
Why, we never bury a man, Greenly, without putting
him into the water as a Christian should be, returned Sir
Gervaise, with the simplicity of a true believer of the decency
school. I hate to see a seaman tossed into the ocean like
a bag of old clothes.
We get along with that part of the duty pretty well; but
before
a man is dead, the parson is of opinion that he belongs
altogether to the doctor.
I 'd bet a hundred guineas, Magrath has had some
influence
over him, in this mattergive the Blenheim a wider
berth, Sir Wycherly, I wish to see how she looks aloft
he 's a dd fellow, that Magrath,no one swore in Sir
Gervaise's boat but himself, when the vice-admiral's flag was
flying in her bows;and he's just the sort of man to put
such a notion into the chaplain's head.
Why, there, I believe you 're more than half right, Sir
Gervaise; I overheard a conversation between them one
dark night, when they were propping the mizzen-mast under
the break of the poop, and the surgeon
did
maintain a theory
very like that you mention, sir.
Ah!he did, did he? It 's just like the Scotch rogue,
who wanted to persuade me that your poor uncle, Sir
Wycherly
,
ought not to have been blooded, in as clear a case
of apoplexy as ever was met with.
Well, I didn't think he could have carried his impudence
as far as that, observed Greenly, whose medical
knowledge
was about on a par with that of Sir Gervaise. I
didn't think even a doctor would dare to hold such a
doctrine
!
As for the chaplain, to him he laid down the
principle
that religion and medicine never worked well together.
He said religion was an `alterative,' and would neutralize a
salt as quick as fire.
He 's a great vagabond, that Magrath, when he gets hold
of a young hand, sir; and I wish with all my heart the
Pretender had him, with two or three pounds of his favourite
medicines with him  I think, between the two, England
might reap some advantage, Greenly.Now, to my notion,
Wychecombe, the Blenheim would make better weather, if
her masts were shortened at least two feet.
Perhaps she might, Sir Gervaise; but would she be as
certain a ship, in coming into action in light winds and at
critical moments?
Umph! It 's time for us old fellows to look about us,
Greenly, when the boys begin to reason on a line of battle!
Don't blush, Wychecombe; don't blush. Your remark was
sensible, and shows reflection. No country can ever have
a powerful marine, or, one likely to produce much influence
in her wars, that does not pay rigid attention to the tactics
of fleets. Your frigate actions and sailing of single ships,
are well enough as drill; but the great practice must be in
squadron. Ten heavy ships, in good
fleet
discipline, and
kept at sea, will do more than a hundred single cruisers, in
establishing and maintaining discipline; and it is only by
using vessels
together
, that we find out what both ships and
men can do. Now, we owe the success of this day, to our
practice of sailing in close order, and in knowing how to
keep our stations; else would six ships never have been able
to carry away the palm of victory from twelvepalm!
Ay, that 's the very word, Greenly, I was trying to think
of this morning. Daly's dd paddy should have had a
palm-branch in its hand, as an emblem of Victory!
CHAPTER XI.
He that has sailed upon the dark-blue sea,
Has viewed at times, I ween, a full fair sight;
When the fresh breeze is fair as breeze may be,
The white sail set, the gallant frigate tight;
Mast, spires and strand, retiring to the sight,
The glorious main expanding o'er the bow,
The convoy spread like wild swans in their flight,
The dullest sailer waring bravely now,
So gaily curl the waves before each dashing prow.
Byron
.
As
Sir Gervaise Oakes' active mind was liable to such
sudden mutations of thought as that described in the close
of the last chapter, Greenly neither smiled, nor dwelt on the
subject at all; he simply pointed out to his superior the fact,
that they were now abreast of the Thunderer, and desired
to know whether it was his pleasure to proceed any further.
To the Carnatic, Greenly, if Sir Wycherly will have
the goodness to shape his course thither. I have a word to
say to my friend Parker, before we sleep to-night. Give us
room, however, to look at Morganic's fancies, for I never
pass his ship without learning something new. Lord
Morganic's
vessel is a good school for us old fellows to attend
hey! Greenly?
The Achilles is certainly a model vessel in some
respects
,
Sir Gervaise, though I flatter myself the
Plantagenets
have no great occasion to imitate her, in order to gain
a character.
You
imitate Morganic in order to know how to keep a
ship in order!Poh! let Morganic come to school to
you
.
Yet the fellow is not bashful in battle neither; keeps his
station
well, and makes himself both heard and felt. Ah!
there he is, flourishing his hat on the poop, and wondering
what the deuce Sir Jarvy's after, now! Sheer in,
Wychecombe
,
and let us hear what he has to say.
Good evening, Sir Gervaise, called out the earl, as
usual taking the
initiative
in the discourse; I was in hopes
when I saw your flag in the boat, that you were going to do
me the favour to open a bottle of claret, and to taste some
fruit, I have still standing on the table.
I thank you, my lord, but business before pleasure. We
have not been idle to-day, though to-morrow shall be still
more busy. How does the Achilles steer, now her foremast
is in its place?
Yaws like a fellow with his grog aboard, Sir Gervaise,
on my honour! We shall never do anything with her, until
you consent to let us stay her spars, in our own fashion.
Do you intend to send me Daly back, or am I to play first
lieutenant myself, admiral?
Daly 's shipped for the cruise, and you must do as well
as you can without him. If you find yourself without a
second astern, in the course of the night, do not fancy she
has gone to the bottom. Keep good look-outs, and pay
attention
to signals.
As Sir Gervaise waved his hand, the young noble did not
venture to reply, much less to ask a question, though there
was not a little speculation on the poop of the Achilles,
concerning
the meaning of his words. The boat moved on,
and five minutes later Sir Gervaise was on the quarter-deck
of the Carnatic.
Parker received the commander-in-chief, hat in hand, with
a solicitude and anxiety that were constitutional, perhaps,
and which no consciousness of deserving could entirely
appease
.
Vol. II.  14
Habit, however, had its share in it, since,
accustomed
to defer to rank from boyhood, and the architect of
his own little fortune, he had ever attached more
importance
to the commendation of his superior, than was usual
with those who had other props to lean on than their own
services. As soon as the honours of the quarter-deck had
been duly paidfor these Sir Gervaise never neglected
himself
,
nor allowed others to neglectthe vice-admiral
intimated
to Captain Parker a desire to see him in his cabin,
requesting Greenly and Wycherly to accompany them
below.
Upon my word, Parker, commenced Sir Gervaise,
looking
around him at the air of singular domestic comfort that
the after-cabin of the ship presented, you have a knack of
taking a house to sea with you, that no other captain of the
fleet possesses! No finery, no Morganics, but a plain,
wholesome, domestic look, that might make a man believe
he was in his father's house. I would give a thousand
pounds if my vagabonds could give the cabin of the
Plantagenet
such a Bowldero-look, now!
Less than a hundred, sir, have done the little you see
here. Mrs. Parker makes it a point to look to those matters,
herself, and in that lies the whole secret, perhaps. A good
wife is a great blessing, Sir Gervaise, though you have
never been able to persuade yourself into the notion, I
believe
.
I hardly think, Parker, the wife can do it all. Now
there's Stowel, Bluewater's captain, he is married as well
as yourselfnay, by George, I 've heard the old fellow say
he had as much wife as any man in his majesty's service
but
his
cabin looks like a cobbler's barn, and his state-room
like a soldier's bunk! When we were lieutenants together
in the Eurydice, Parker, your state-room had just the same
air of comfort about it that this cabin has at this instant.
Nonoit 's in the grain, man, or it never would show
itself, in all times and places.
You forget, Sir Gervaise, that when I had the honour
to be your messmate in the Eurydice, I was a married man.
I beg your pardon, my old friend; so you were, indeed!
Why, that was a confounded long time ago, hey! Parker!
It was, truly, sir; but I was poor, and could not afford
the extravagancies of a single life.
I
married for the sake
of economy, Admiral Oakes.
And love answered Sir Gervaise, laughing. I 'll
warrant you, Greenly, that he persuaded Mrs. Parker into
that notion, whether true or not. I 'll warrant you, he
didn't tell
her
he married for so sneaking a thing as
economy
!
I should like to see your state-room now, Parker.
Nothing easier, Sir Gervaise, answered the captain,
rising and opening the door. Here it is, sir, though little
worthy of the attention of the owner of Bowldero.
A notable place, truly!and with a housewife-look
about it that must certainly remind you of Mrs. Parker
unless, indeed, that picture at the foot of your cot puts other
notions into your head! What young hussy have you got
there, my old Eurydice?Hey!Parker?
That is a picture of my faithful wife, Sir Gervaise; a
proper companion, I hope, of my cruise?
Hey! What, that young thing your wife, Parker!
How the dl came she to have you?
Ah, Sir Gervaise, she is a young thing no longer, but
is well turned towards sixty. The picture was taken when
she was bride, and is all the dearer to me, now that I know
the original has shared my fortunes so long. I never look
at it, without remembering, with gratitude, how much she
thinks of me in our cruises, and how often she prays for our
success.
You
are not forgotten, either, sir, in her prayers.
I! exclaimed the vice-admiral, quite touched at the
earnest simplicity of the other. D'ye hear that, Greenly?
I 'll engage, now, this lady is a good womana really
excellent
creaturejust such another as my poor sainted
mother was, and a blessing to all around her! Give me
your hand, Parker; and when you write next to your wife,
tell her from me, God bless her; and say all you think a
man ought to say on such an occasion. And now to
business
.
Let us seat ourselves in this snug domestic-looking
cabin of yours, and talk our matters over.
The two captains and Wycherly followed the vice-admiral
into the after-cabin, where the latter seated himself on a
small sofa, while the others took chairs, in respectful
attitudes
near him, no familiarity or jocularity on the part of a
naval superior, ever lessening the distance between him and
those who
hold subordinate commissions
a fact that
legislators
would do well to remember, when graduating rank in
a service. As soon as all were placed, Sir Gervaise opened
his mind.
I have a delicate piece of duty, Captain Parker, he
commenced, which I wish intrusted to yourself. You
must know that we handled the ship which escaped us this
morning by running down into her own line, pretty roughly,
in every respect; besides cutting two of her masts out of her.
This ship, as you may have seen, has got up jury-masts,
already; but they are spars that can only be intended to
carry her into port. Monsieur de Vervillin is not the man I
take him to be, if he intends to leave the quarrel between
us where it is. Still he cannot keep that crippled ship in
his fleet, any more than we can keep our prize, and I make
no doubt he will send her off to Cherbourg as soon as it is
dark; most probably accompanied by one of his corvettes;
or perhaps by a frigate.
Yes, Sir Gervaise, returned Parker, thoughtfully, as
soon as his superior ceased to speak; what you predict, is
quite likely to happen.
It
must
happen, Parker, the wind blowing directly for
his haven. Now, you may easily imagine what I want of
the Carnatic.
I suppose I understand you, sir;and yet, if I might
presume to express a wish
Speak out, old boyyou 're talking to a friend. I
have chosen you to serve you, both as one I like, and as the
oldest captain in the fleet. Whoever catches that ship will
hear more of it.
Very true, sir; but are we not likely to have more
work, here? and would it be altogether prudent to send so
fine a ship as the Carnatic away, when the enemy will count
ten to six, even if she remain?
All this has been thought of; and I suppose your own
feeling has been anticipated. You think it will be more
honourable to your vessel, to keep her place in the line, than
to take a ship already half beaten.
That 's it, indeed, Sir Gervaise. I do confess some
such thoughts were crossing my mind.
Then see how easy it is to rowse them out of it. I
cannot
fight the French, in this moderate weather, without a
reinforcement. When the rear joins, we shall be just ten to
ten, without you, and with you, should be eleven to ten.
Now, I confess, I don't wish the least odds, and shall send
away somebody; especially when I feel certain a noble
two-decked
ship will be the reward. If a frigate accompany the
crippled fellow, you 'll have your hands full, and a very fair
fight; and should you get either, it will be a handsome
thing. What say you
now
, Parker?
I begin to think better of the plan, Sir Gervaise, and
am grateful for the selection. I wish, however, I knew your
own precise wishesI 've always found it safe to follow
them, sir.
Here they are, then. Get four or five sets of the
sharpest
eyes you have, and send them aloft to keep a steady look
on your chap, while there is light enough to be certain of
him. In a little while, they 'll be able to recognise him in
the dark; and by keeping your night-glasses well levelled,
he can scarcely slip off, without your missing him. The
moment he is gone, ware short round, and make the best of
your way for Cape la Hogue, or Alderney; you will go
three feet to his two, and, my life on it, by daylight you 'll
have him to windward of you, and then you 'll be certain of
him. Wait for no signals from me, but be off, as soon as
it is dark. When your work is done, make the best of
your way to the nearest English port, and clap a
Scotchman
on your shoulder to keep the king's sword from chafing
it. They thought me fit for knighthood at three-and-twenty,
and the deuce is in it, Parker, if you are not worthy of it,
at three-and-sixty!
Ah! Sir Gervaise, everything you undertook succeeded!
You never yet failed in any expedition.
That has come from attempting much. My
plans
have
often failed; but as something good has generally followed
from them, I have the credit of designing to do, exactly what
I 've done.
Then followed a long, detailed discourse, on the subject
before them, in which Greenly joined; the latter making
several useful suggestions to the veteran commander of the
Carnatic. After passing quite an hour in the cabin of
Parker, Sir Gervaise took his leave and re-entered his barge.
14 *
It was now so dark that small objects could not be
distinguished
a hundred yards, and the piles of ships, as the boat
glided past them, resembled black hillocks, with clouds
floating
among their tree-like and waving spars. No captain
presumed to hail the commander-in-chief, as he rowed down
the line, again, with the exception of the peer of the realm.
He indeed had always something to say; and, as he had
been conjecturing what could induce the vice-admiral to pay
so long a visit to the Carnatic, he could not refrain from
uttering as much aloud, when he heard the measured stroke
of the oars from the returning barge.
We shall all be jealous of this compliment to Captain
Parker, Sir Gervaise, he called out, unless your favours
are occasionally extended to some of us less worthy ones.
AyayMorganic, you 'll be remembered in proper
time. In the meanwhile, keep your people's eyes open, so
as not to lose sight of the French. We shall have
something
to say to them in the morning.
Spare us a night-action, if possible, Sir Gervaise! I do
detest fighting when sleepy; and I like to see my enemy,
too. As much as you please in the day-time; but a quiet
night, I do beseech you, sir.
I 'll warrant you, now, if the opera, or Ranelagh, or a
drum, or a masquerade, were inviting you, Morganic, you 'd
think but little of your pillow! answered Sir Gervaise,
drily; whatever you do yourself, my lord, don't let the
Achilles get asleep on duty; I may have need of her
to-morrow
.
Give way, Wychecombe, give way, and let us
get home again.
In fifteen minutes from that instant, Sir Gervaise was
once more on the poop of the Plantagenet, and the barge in
its place on deck. Greenly was attending to the duties of
his ship, and Bunting stood in readiness to circulate such
orders as it might suit the commander-in-chief to give.
It was now nine o'clock, and it was not easy to
distinguish
objects on the ocean, even as large as a ship, at the
distance of half a league. By the aid of the glasses,
however
,
a vigilant look-out was kept on the French vessels,
which, by this time, were quite two leagues distant,
drawing
more ahead. It was necessary to fill away, in order to
close with them, and a night-signal was made to that effect.
The whole British line braced forward their main-yards, as
it might be, by a common impulse, and had there been one
there of sufficiently acute senses, he might have heard all
six of the main-top-sails flapping at the same instant. As
a matter of course the vessels started ahead, and, the order
being to follow the vice-admiral in a close line ahead, when
the Plantagenet edged off, so as to bring the wind abeam,
each vessel did the same, in succession, or as soon as in the
commander-in-chief's wake, as if guided by instinct. About
ten minutes later, the Carnatic, to the surprise of those who
witnessed the manuvre in the Achilles, wore short round,
and set studding-sails on her starboard side, steering large.
The darkest portion of the horizon being that which lay to
the eastward, or, in the direction of the continent, in twenty
minutes the pyramid of her shadowy outline was swallowed
in the gloom. All this time, la Victoire, with the Druid
leading
and towing, kept upon a bowline; and an hour later,
when Sir Gervaise found himself abeam of the French line
again, and half a league to windward of it, no traces were
to be seen of the three ships last mentioned.
So far, all goes well, gentlemen, observed the
vice-admiral
to the group around him on the poop; and we will
now try to count the enemy, to make certain
he
, too, has no
stragglers out to pick up waifs. Greenly, try that glass;
it is set for the night, and your eyes are the best we have.
Be particular in looking for the fellow under jury-masts.
I make out but ten ships in the line, Sir Gervaise,
answered
the captain, after a long examination; of course
the crippled ship must have gone to leeward. Of
her
,
certainly
,
I can find no traces.
You will oblige me, Sir Wycherly, by seeing what
you
can make out, in the same way.
After a still longer examination than that of the captain,
Wycherly made the same report, adding that he thought he
also missed the frigate that had been nearest le Foudroyant,
repeating her signals throughout the day. This
circumstance
gratified Sir Gervaise, as he was pleased to find his
prognostics came true, and he was not sorry to be rid of one
of the enemy's light cruisers; a species of vessel that often
proved embarrassing, after a decided affair, even to the
conqueror
.
I think, Sir Gervaise, Wycherly modestly added, that
the French have boarded their tacks, and are pressing up
to windward to near us. Did it not appear so to you,
Captain
Greenly?
Not at all. If they carry courses, the sails have been
set within the last five minutesha! Sir Gervaise, that is
an indication of a busy night!
As he spoke, Greenly pointed to the place where the
French admiral was known to be, where at that instant
appeared
a double row of lights; proving that the batteries
had their lanterns lit, and showing a disposition to engage.
In less than a minute the whole French line was to be traced
along the sea, by the double rows of illumination, the light
resembling that which is seen through the window of a
room that has a bright fire, rather than one in which lamps
or candles are actually visible. As this was just the species
of engagement in which the English had much to risk, and
little to gain, Sir Gervaise immediately gave orders to brace
forward the yards, to board fore-and-main tacks, and to set
top-gallant-sails. As a matter of course, the ships astern
made sail in the same manner, and hauled up on taut
bowlines
,
following the admiral.
This is not our play, coolly remarked Sir Gervaise;
a crippled ship would drop directly into their arms, and as
for any success at long-shot, in a two-to-one fight, it is not
to be looked for. NonoMonsieur de Vervillin, show us
your teeth if you will, and a pretty sight it is, but you do
not draw a shot from me. I hope the order to show no
lights is duly attended to.
I do not think there is a light visible from any ship in the
fleet, Sir Gervaise, answered Bunting, though we are so
near there can be no great difficulty in telling where we
are.
All but the Carnatic and the prize, Bunting. The more
fuss they make with us, the less will they think of them.
It is probable the French admiral had been deceived by
the near approach of his enemy, for whose prowess he had
a profound respect. He had made his preparations in
expectation
of an attack, but he did not open his fire, although
heavy shot would certainly have told with effect.
Indisposed
to the uncertainty of a night-action, he declined
bringing
it on, and the lights disappeared from his ports an hour
later; at that time the English ships, by carrying sail
harder
than was usual in so stiff a breeze, found themselves out
of gun-shot, on the weather-bow of their enemies. Then,
and not till then, did Sir Gervaise reduce his canvass,
having
,
by means of his glasses, first ascertained that the French
had again hauled up their courses, and were moving along
at a very easy rate of sailing.
It was now near midnight, and Sir Gervaise prepared to
go below. Previously to quitting the deck, however, he
gave very explicit orders to Greenly, who transmitted them
to the first lieutenant, that officer or the captain intending
to be on the look-out through the night; the movements of
the whole squadron being so dependent on those of the
flag-ship
.
The vice-admiral then retired, and went coolly to bed.
He was not a man to lose his rest, because an enemy was
just out of gun-shot. Accustomed to be manuvring in
front of hostile fleets, the situation had lost its novelty, and
he had so much confidence in the practice of his captains,
that he well knew nothing could occur so long as his orders
were obeyed; to doubt the latter would have been heresy
in his eyes. In professional nonchalance, no man exceeded
our vice-admiral. Blow high, or blow low, it never
disturbed
the economy of his cabin-life, beyond what
unavoidably
was connected with the comfort of the ship; nor did
any prospect of battle cause a meal to vary a minute in
time, or a particle in form, until the bulk-heads were
actually
knocked down, and the batteries were cleared for
action
.
Although excitable in trifles, and sometimes a little
irritable, Sir Gervaise, in the way of his profession, was a
great man on great occasions. His temperament was
sanguine
,
and his spirit both decided and bold; and, in
common
with all such men who see the truth at all, when he
did see it, he saw it so clearly, as to throw all the doubts
that beset minds of a less masculine order into the shade.
On the present occasion, he was sure nothing could well
occur to disturb his rest; and he took it with the composure
of one on
terra-firma
, and in the security of peace. Unlike
those who are unaccustomed to scenes of excitement, he
quietly undressed himself, and his head was no sooner on
its pillow, than he fell into a profound sleep.
It would have been a curious subject of observation to an
inexperienced person, to note the manner in which the two
fleets manuvred throughout that night. After several
hours of ineffectual efforts to bring their enemies fairly
within
reach of their guns, after the moon had risen, the French
gave the matter up for a time, shortening sail while most of
their superior officers caught a little rest.
The sun was just rising, as Galleygo laid his hand on
the shoulder of the vice-admiral, agreeably to orders given
the previous night. The touch sufficed; Sir Gervaise being
wide awake in an instant. Well, he said, rising to a sitting
attitude, and putting the question which first occurs to a
seaman, how 's the weather?
A good top-gallant breeze, Sir Jarvy, and just what 's
this ship's play. If you'd only let her out, and on them
Johnny Crapauds, she 'd be down among 'em, in half an
hour, like a hawk upon a chicken. I ought to report to
your honour, that the last chicken will be dished for
breakfast
unless we gives an order to the gun-room steward to
turn us over some of his birds, as pay for what the pigs eat;
which were real capons.
Why, you pirate, you would not have me commit a
robbery, on the high seas, would ye?
What robbery would it be to order the gun-room to
sell
us some poultry. Lord! Sir Jarvy, I'm as far from
wishing
to take a thing without an order, as the gunner's
yeoman
;
but, let Mr. Atwood put it in black and white.
Tush! interrupted the master. How did the French
bear from us, when you were last on deck?
Why, there they is, Sir Jarvy, answered Galleygo,
drawing the curtain from before the state-room window, and
allowing the vice-admiral to see the rear of the French line
for himself, by turning half round; and just where we
wants 'em. Their leading ship a little abaft our lee-beam,
distant one league. That 's what I calls satisfactory, now.
Ay, that
is
a good position, Master Galleygo. Was the
prize in sight, or were you too chicken-headed to look.
I chicken-headed! Well, Sir Jarvy, of all characters
and descriptions of
me
, that your honour has seen fit to put
abroad, this is the most unjustest; chickens being a food I
never thinks on, off soundings. Pig-headed you might in
reason call me, Sir Jarvy; for I
do
looks arter the pigs,
which is the only real stand-by in a ship; but I never
dreams of a chicken, except for
your
happetite. When they
was eight on 'em
Was the prize in sight? demanded Sir Gervaise, a
little
sharply.
No, Sir Jarvy; she had disappeared, and the Druid
with her. But this isn't all, sir; for they does say, some'at
has befallen the Carnatic, she having gone out of our line,
like a binnacle-lamp at eight bells.
Ay,
she
is not visible, either.
Not so much as a hen-coop, Sir Jarvy! We all
wonders
what has become of Captain Parker; no sign of him
or of his ship is to be found on the briny ocean. The
young gentlemen of the watch laugh, and say she must have
gone up in a water-spout, but they laughs so much at
misfortins
,
generally, that I never minds 'em.
Have you had a good look-out at the ocean, this
morning
,
Master Galleygo, asked Sir Gervaise, drawing his
head out of a basin of water, for, by this time, he was
half-dressed
,
and making his preparations for the razor. You
used to have an eye for a chase, when we were in a frigate,
and ought to be able to tell me if Bluewater is in sight.
Admiral Blue!Well, Sir Jarvy, it
is
remarkable, but
I had just rubbed his division out of my log, and forgotten
all about it. There
was
a handful of craft, or so, off here
to the nor 'ard, at daylight, but I never thought it was
Admiral
Blue, it being more nat'ral to suppose him in his place,
as usual, in the rear of our own line. Let me see, Sir Jarvy,
how many ships has we absent under Admiral Blue?
Why, the five two-deckers of his own division, to be
sure, besides the Ranger and the Gnat. Seven sail in all.
Yes, that 's just it! Well, your honour, there
was
five
sail to be seen, out here to the nor'ard, as I told you, and,
sure enough, it may have been Admiral Blue, with all his
craft.
By this time, Sir Gervaise had his face covered with
lather, but he forgot the circumstance in a moment. As
the wind was at the north-west, and the Plantagenet was on
the larboard tack, looking in the direction of the Bill of
Portland, though much too far to the southward to allow the
land to be seen, his own larboard quarter-gallery window
commanded a good view of the whole horizon to windward.
Crossing over from the starboard state-room, which he
occupied
ex-officio
, he opened the window in question, and
took a look for himself. There, sure enough, was visible a
squadron of five ships, in close order, edging leisurely down
on the two lines, under their top-sails, and just near enough
to allow it to be ascertained that their courses were not set.
This sight produced a sudden change in all the
vice-admiral's
movements. The business of the toilet was resumed
in haste, and the beard was mowed with a slashing hand,
that might have been hazardous in the motion of a ship, but
for the long experience of a sailor. This important part of
the operation was scarcely through, when Locker announced
the presence of Captain Greenly in the main cabin.
What now, Greenly?  What now? called out the
vice-admiral, puffing as he withdrew his head, again, from
the basinWhat now, Greenly? Any news from
Bluewater
?
I am happy to tell you, Sir Gervaise, he has been in sight
more than an hour, and is closing with us, though shyly
and slowly. I would not let you be called, as all was right,
and I knew sleep was necessary to a clear head.
You have done quite right, Greenly; God willing, I
intend
this to be a busy day! The French must see our rear
division?
Beyond a doubt, sir, but they show no signs of making
off. M. de Vervillin will fight, I feel certain; though the
experience of yesterday may render him a little shy as to
the mode.
And his crippled ship?Old Parker's friendI take it
she
is not visible.
You were quite right in your conjecture, Sir Gervaise;
the crippled ship is off, as is one of the frigates, no doubt to
see her in. Blewet, too, has gone well to windward of the
French, though he can fetch into no anchorage short of
Portsmouth, if this breeze stand.
Any haven will do. Our little success will animate the
king's party, and give it more
eclat
, perhaps, than it really
merits. Let there be no delay with the breakfast this
morning
,
Greenly; it will be a busy day.
Ayaysir answered the captain in the sailor's
usual manner;
that
has been seen to already, as I have
expected as much. Admiral Bluewater keeps his ships in
most beautiful order, sir! I do not think the Csar, which
leads, is two cable's-length from the Dublin, the sternmost
vessel. He is driving four-in-hand, with a tight rein, too,
depend on it, sir.
At this instant, Sir Gervaise came out of his state-room,
his coat in his hand, and with a countenance that was
thoughtful. He finished dressing with an abstracted air,
and would not have known the last garment was on, had
not Galleygo given a violent pull on its skirts, in order to
smooth the cloth about the shoulders.
It is odd, that Bluewater should come down nearly
before
the wind, in a line ahead, and not in a line abreast!
Sir Gervaise rejoined, as his steward did this office for him.
Let Admiral Blue alone, for doing what's right, put in
Galleygo, in his usual confident and self-possessed manner.
By keeping his ships astern of hisself, he can tell where
to find 'em, and we understands from experience, if
Admiral
Blue knows where to find a ship, he knows how to use
her.
Instead of rebuking this interference, which went a little
further than common, Greenly was surprised to see the
vice-admiral
look his steward intently in the face, as if the man
had expressed some shrewd and comprehensive truth. Then
turning to his captain, Sir Gervaise intimated an intention
of going on deck to survey the state of things with his own
eyes.
Vol. II.  15
CHAPTER XII.
Thou
shouldst have died, O high-soul'd chief!
In those bright days of glory fled,
When triumph so prevailed o'er grief,
We scarce would mourn the dead.
Mrs. Hemans
.
The
eventful day opened with most of the glories of a
summer's morning. The wind alone prevented it from being
one of the finest sun-risings of July. That continued fresh,
at north-west, and, consequently, cool for the season. The
seas of the south-west gale had entirely subsided, and were
already succeeded by the regular but comparatively trifling
swell of the new breeze. For large ships, it might be called
smooth water; though the Driver and Active showed by
their pitching and unsteadiness, and even the two-deckers,
by their waving masts, that the unquiet ocean was yet in
motion. The wind seemed likely to stand, and was what
seamen would be apt to call a good six-knot breeze.
To leeward, still distant about a league, lay the French
vessels, drawn up in beautiful array, and in an order so
close and a line so regular, as to induce the belief that M.
de Vervillin had made his dispositions to receive the expected
attack, in his present position. All his main-top-sails lay
flat aback; the top-gallant-sails were flying loose, but with
buntlings and clew-lines hauled up; the jibs were fluttering
to leeward of their booms, and the courses were hanging in
festoons beneath their yards. This was gallant
fighting-canvass
,
and it excited the admiration of even his enemies.
To increase this feeling, just as Sir Gervaise's foot reached
the poop, the whole French line displayed their ensigns, and
le Foudroyant
fired a gun to windward.
Hey! Greenly? exclaimed the English
commander-in-chief
;
this is a manly defiance, and coming from M. de
Vervillin, it means something! He wishes to take the day
for it; though, as I think half that time will answer, we will
wash up the cups before we go at it. Make the signals,
Bunting, for the ships to heave-to, and then to get their
breakfasts, as fast as possible. Steady breeze  steady
breeze, Greenly, and all we want!
Five minutes later, while Sir Gervaise was running his
eye over the signal-book, the Plantagenet's calls were piping
the people to their morning meal, at least an hour earlier
than common; the people repaired to their messes, with a
sort of stern joy; every man in the ship understanding the
reason of a summons so unusual. The calls of the vessels
astern were heard soon after, and one of the officers who
was watching the enemy with a glass, reported that he
thought the French were breakfasting, also. Orders being
given to the officers to employ the next half hour in the
same manner, nearly everybody was soon engaged in eating;
few thinking that the meal might probably be their last. Sir
Gervaise felt a concern, which he succeeded in concealing,
however, at the circumstance that the ships to windward
made no more sail; though he refrained from signalling the
rear-admiral to that effect, from tenderness to his friend, and
a vague apprehension of what might be the consequences.
While the crews were eating, he stood gazing, thoughtfully,
at the noble spectacle the enemy offered, to leeward,
occasionally
turning wistful glances at the division that was
constantly
drawing nearer to windward. At length Greenly,
himself, reported that the Plantagenet had turned the
hands-to, again. At this intelligence, Sir Gervaise started,
as from a reverie, smiled, and spoke. We will here remark,
that now, as on the previous day, all the natural excitability
of manner had disappeared from the commander-in-chief,
and he was quiet, and exceedingly gentle in his deportment.
This, all who knew him, understood to denote a serious
determination
to engage.
I have desired Galleygo to set my little table, half an
hour hence, in the after-cabin, Greenly, and you will share
the meal with me. Sir Wycherly will be of our party, and
I hope it will not be the last time we may meet at the same
board. It is necessary everything should be in fighting-order
to-day!
So I understand it, Sir Gervaise. We are ready to
begin, as soon as the order shall be received.
Wait one moment until Bunting comes up from his
breakfast. Ah! here he is, and we are quite ready for him,
having bent-on the signal in his absence. Show the order,
Bunting; for the day advances.
The little flags were fluttering at the
main-top-gallant-mast-head
of the Plantagenet in less than one minute, and in
another it was repeated by the Chloe, Driver, and Active,
all of which were lying-to, a quarter of a mile to windward,
charged in particular with this, among other duties. So
well was this signal known, that not a book in the fleet was
consulted, but all the ships answered, the instant the flags
could be seen and understood. Then the shrill whistles
were heard along the line, calling All hands to clear
ship for action, ahoy!
No sooner was this order given in the Plantagenet, than
the ship became a scene of active but orderly exertion. The
top-men were on the yards, stoppering, swinging the yards
in chains, and lashing, in order to prevent shot from doing
more injury than was unavoidable; bulwarks were knocked
down; mess-chests, bags, and all other domestic appliances,
disappeared
below
,
[3]
[3]
In the action of the Nile, many of the French ships, under the
impression
that the enemy
must
engage on the
outside
, put their lumber,
bags, &c., into the ports, and between the guns, in the larboard or
inshore
batteries; and when the British anchored
inshore
of them, these
batteries could not be used!
and the decks were cleared of every
thing which could be removed, and which would not be
necessary
in an engagement. Fully a quarter of an hour was
thus occupied, for there was no haste, and as it was no
moment
of mere parade, it was necessary that the work should
be effectually done. The officers forbade haste, and nothing
important was reported as effected, that some one in
authority
did not examine with his own eyes, to see that no
proper
care had been neglected. Then Mr. Bury, the first
lieutenant
,
went on the main-yard, in person, to look at the
manner in which it had been slung, while he sent the
boatswain
up forward, on the same errand. These were
unusual
precautions, but the word had passed through the ship
that Sir Jarvy was in earnest; and whenever it was
known that Sir Jarvy was in such a humour, every one
understood that the day's work was to be hard, if not long.
Our breakfast is ready, Sir Jarvy, reported Galleygo,
and as the decks is all clear, the b'ys can make a clean
run of it from the coppers. I only wants to know when to
serve it, your honour.
Serve it now, my good fellow. Tell the Bowlderos to
be nimble, and expect us below. Come, Greenlycome,
Wychecombewe are the last to eatlet us not be the last
at our stations.
Ship 's clear, sir, reported Bury to his captain, as the
three reached the quarter-deck, on their way to the cabin.
Very well, Bury; when the fleet is signalled to go to
quarters, we will obey with the rest.
As this was said, Greenly looked at the vice-admiral to
catch his wishes. But Sir Gervaise had no intention of
fatiguing his people unnecessarily. He had left his private
orders with Bunting, and he passed down without an answer
or a glance. The arrangements in the after-cabin were as
snug and as comfortable as if the breakfast-table had been
set in a private house, and the trio took their seats and
commenced
operations with hearty good will. The vice-admiral
ordered the doors thrown open, and as the port-lids were up,
from the place where he sat he could command glimpses,
both to leeward and to windward, that included a view of
the enemy, as well as one of his own expected
reinforcements
.
The Bowlderos were in full livery, and more active
and attentive than usual even. Their station in battlefor
no man on board a vessel of war is an
idler
in a combat
was on the poop, as musketeers, near the person of their
master, whose colours they wore, under the ensign of their
prince, like vassals of an ancient baron. Notwithstanding
the crisis of the morning, however, these men performed
their customary functions with the precision and method of
English menials, omitting no luxury or usage of the table.
On a sofa behind the table, was spread the full dress-coat
of a vice-admiral, then a neat but plain uniform, without
either lace or epaulettes, but decorated with a rich star in
brilliants, the emblem of the order of the Bath. This coat
Sir Gervaise always wore in battle, unless the weather
rendered
a storm-uniform, as he used to term a plainer
attire, necessary.
The breakfast passed off pleasantly, the gentlemen eating
as if no momentous events were near. Just at its close,
however, Sir Gervaise leaned forward, and looking through
15 *
one of the weather-ports of the main cabin, an expression
of pleasure illuminated his countenance, as he said
Ah! there go Bluewater's signals, at last!  a certain
proof that he is about to put himself in communication with
us.
I have been a good deal surprised, sir, observed
Greenly
,
a little drily, though with great respect of manner, that
you have not ordered the rear-admiral to make more sail.
He is jogging along like a heavy wagon, and yet I hardly
think he can mistake these five ships for Frenchmen!
He is never in a hurry, and no doubt wishes to let
his
crews breakfast, before he closes. I 'll warrant ye, now,
gentlemen, that his ships are at this moment all as clear as
a church five minutes after the blessing has been
pronounced
.
It will not be one of our Virginian churches, then, Sir
Gervaise, observed Wycherly, smiling;
they
serve for an
exchange, to give and receive news in, after the service is
over.
Ay, that 's the old rule  first pray, and then gossip.
Well, Bunting, what does the rear-admiral say?
Upon my word, Sir Gervaise, I can make nothing of
the signal, though it is easy enough to make out the flags,
answered the puzzled signal-officer. Will you have the
goodness to look at the book yourself, sir. The number is
one hundred and forty.
One hundred and forty! Why, that must have
something
to do with anchoring!  ay, here it is. `Anchor, I
cannot, having lost my cables.' Who the devil asked him
to anchor?
That 's just it, sir. The signal-officer on board the
Csar must have made some mistake in his flags; for,
though the distance is considerable, our glasses are good
enough to read them.
Perhaps Admiral Bluewater has set the private,
personal
,
telegraph at work, sir, quietly observed Greenly.
The commander-in-chief actually changed colour at this
suggestion. His face, at first, flushed to crimson; then it
became pale, like the countenance of one who suffered under
acute bodily pain. Wycherly observed this, and respectfully
inquired if Sir Gervaise were ill.
I thank you, young sir, answered the vice-admiral,
smiling painfully; it is over. I believe I shall have to go
into dock, and let Magrath look at some of my old hurts,
which
are
sometimes troublesome. Mr. Bunting, do me the
favour to go on deck, and ascertain, by a careful
examination
,
if a short red pennant be not set some ten or twelve
feet above the uppermost flag. Now, Greenly, we will take
the other cup of tea, for there is plenty of leisure.
Two or three brooding minutes followed. Then Bunting
returned to say the pennant
was
there, a fact he had quite
overlooked in his former observations, confounding the
narrow
flag in question with the regular pennant of the king.
This short red pennant denoted that the communication was
verbal, according to a method invented by Bluewater
himself
,
and by means of which, using the ordinary numbers,
he was enabled to communicate with his friend, without any
of the captains, or, indeed, without Sir Gervaise's own
signal-officer's
knowing what was said. In a word, without
having recourse to any new flags, but, by simply giving
new numbers to the old ones, and referring to a prepared
dictionary, it was possible to hold a conversation in
sentences
,
that should be a secret to all but themselves. Sir
Gervaise took down the number of the signal that was
flying
,
and then he directed Bunting to show the answering
flag, with a similar pennant over it, and to continue this
operation so long as the rear-admiral might make his
signals
.
The numbers were to be sent below as fast as
received
.
As soon as Bunting disappeared, the vice-admiral
unlocked a secretary, the key of which was never out of his
own possession, took from it a small dictionary, and laid it by
his plate. All this time the breakfast proceeded, signals of
this nature frequently occurring between the two admirals.
In the course of the next ten minutes, a quarter-master
brought below a succession of numbers written on small
pieces of paper; after which Bunting appeared himself to
say that the Csar had stopped signalling.
Sir Gervaise now looked out each word by its proper
number, and wrote it down with his pencil as he proceeded,
until the whole readGod sakemake no signal.
Engage
not. No sooner was the communication understood,
than the paper was torn into minute fragments, the book
replaced, and the vice-admiral, turning with a calm
determined
countenance to Greenly, ordered him to beat to
quarters
as soon as Bunting could show a signal to the fleet to
the same effect. On this hint, all but the vice-admiral went
on deck, and the Bowlderos instantly set about removing the
table and all the other appliances. Finding himself
annoyed
by the movements of the servants, Sir Gervaise walked
out into the great cabin, which, regardless of its present
condition, he began to pace as was his wont when lost
in thought. The bulk-heads being down, and the furniture
removed, this was in truth walking in sight of the crew.
All who happened to be on the main-deck could see what
passed, though no one presumed to enter a spot that was
tabooed to vulgar feet, even when thus exposed. The
aspect
and manner of Sir Jarvy, however, were not
overlooked
,
and the men prognosticated a serious time.
Such was the state of things, when the drums beat to
quarters, throughout the whole line. At the first tap, the
great cabin sunk to the level of an ordinary battery; the
seamen of two guns, with the proper officers, entering
within
the sacred limits, and coolly setting about clearing their
pieces, and making the other preparations necessary for an
action. All this time Sir Gervaise continued pacing what
would have been the centre of his own cabin had the
bulk-heads
stood, the grim-looking sailors avoiding him with
great dexterity, and invariably touching their hats as they
were compelled to glide near his person, though everything
went on as if he were not present. Sir Gervaise might have
remained lost in thought much longer than he did, had not
the report of a gun recalled him to a consciousness of the
scene that was enacting around him.
What 's that? suddenly demanded the vice-admiral
Is Bluewater signalling again?
No, Sir Gervaise, answered the fourth lieutenant,
looking out of a lee port; it is the French admiral giving
us another weather-gun; as much as to ask why we don't
go down. This is the second compliment of the same sort
that he has paid us already to-day!
These words were not all spoken before the vice-admiral
was on the quarter-deck; in half a minute more, he was on
the poop. Here he found Greenly, Wychecombe and
Bunting
,
all looking with interest at the beautiful line of the
enemy.
Monsieur de Vervillin is impatient to wipe off the
disgrace
of yesterday, observed the first, as is apparent by
the invitations he gives us to come down. I presume
Admiral
Bluewater will wake up at this last hint.
By Heaven, he has hauled his wind, and is standing to
the northward and eastward! exclaimed Sir Gervaise,
surprise
overcoming all his discretion. Although an
extraordinary
movement, at such a time, it is wonderful in what
beautiful order Bluewater keeps his ships!
All that was said was true enough. The rear-admiral's
division having suddenly hauled up, in a close line ahead,
each ship followed her leader as mechanically as if they
moved by a common impulse. As no one in the least
doubted
the rear-admiral's loyalty, and his courage was of proof,
it was the general opinion that this unusual manuvre had
some connection with the unintelligible signals, and the
young officers laughingly inquired among themselves what
Sir Jarvy was likely to do next?
It would seem, however, that Monsieur de Vervillin
suspected
a repetition of some of the scenes of the preceding
day; for, no sooner did he perceive that the English rear
was hugging the wind, than five of his leading ships filled,
and drew ahead, as if to meet that division, manuvring to
double on the head of his line; while the remaining five,
with the Foudroyant, still lay with their top-sails to the
mast, waiting for their enemy to come down. Sir Gervaise
could not stand this long. He determined, if possible, to
bring Bluewater to terms, and he ordered the Plantagenet to
fill. Followed by his own division, he wore immediately,
and went off under easy sail, quartering, towards Monsieur
de Vervillin's rear, to avoid being raked.
The quarter of an hour that succeeded was one of intense
interest, and of material changes; though not a shot was
fired. As soon as the Comte de Vervillin perceived that
the English were disposed to come nearer, he signalled his
own division to bear up, and to run off dead before the wind,
under their top-sails, commencing astern; which reversed
his order of sailing, and brought le Foudroyant in the rear,
or nearest to the enemy. This was no sooner done, than
he settled all his top-sails on the caps. There could be no
mistaking this manuvre. It was a direct invitation to Sir
Gervaise to come down, fairly alongside; the bearing up at
once removing all risk of being raked in so doing. The
English commander-in-chief was not a man to neglect such
a palpable challenge; but, making a few signals to direct
the mode of attack he contemplated, he set foresail and
main-top-gallant
sail, and brought the wind directly over his own
taffrail. The vessels astern followed like clock-work, and
then no one doubted that the mode of attack was settled for
that day.
As the French, with Monsieur de Vervillin, were still half
a mile to the southward and eastward of the approaching
division of their enemy, the Comte collected all his frigates
and corvettes on his starboard hand, leaving a clear
approach
to Sir Gervaise on his larboard beam. This hint
was understood, too, and the Plantagenet steered a course
that would bring her up on that side of le Foudroyant, and
at the distance of about one hundred yards from the
muzzles
of her guns. This threatened to be close work, and
unusual work in fleets, at that day; but it was the game our
commander-in-chief was fond of playing, and it was one,
also, that promised soonest to bring matters to a result.
These preliminaries arranged, there was yet leisure for
the respective commanders to look about them. The French
were still fully a mile ahead of their enemies, and as both
fleets were going in the same direction, the approach of the
English was so slow as to leave some twenty minutes of
that solemn breathing time, which reigns in a disciplined
ship, previous to the commencement of the combat. The
feelings of the two commanders-in-chief, at this pregnant
instant
,
were singularly in contradiction to each other. The
Comte de Vervillin saw that the rear division of his force,
under the Contre-Amiral le Vicomte des Prez, was in the
very position he desired it to be, having obtained the
advantage
of the wind by the English division's coming down,
and by keeping its own luff. Between the two French
officers
there was a perfect understanding as to the course each
was to take, and both now felt sanguine hopes of being
able to obliterate the disgrace of the previous day, and that,
too, by means very similar to those by which it had been
incurred. On the other hand, Sir Gervaise was beset with
doubts as to the course Bluewater might pursue. He could
not, however, come to the conclusion that he would abandon
him to the joint efforts of the two hostile divisions; and so
long as the French rear-admiral was occupied by the
English
force to windward, it left to himself a clear field and no
favour in the action with Monsieur de Vervillin. He knew
Bluewater's generous nature too well, not to feel certain his
own compliance with the request not to signal his inferior
would touch his heart, and give him a double chance with
all his better feelings. Nevertheless, Sir Gervaise Oakes did
not lead into this action without many and painful
misgivings
.
He had lived too long in the world not to know that
political prejudice was the most demoralizing of all our
weaknesses, veiling our private vices under the plausible
concealment of the public weal, and rendering even the
well-disposed
insensible to the wrongs they commit to individuals,
by means of the deceptive flattery of serving the
community
.
As doubt was more painful than the certainty of his
worst forebodings, however, and it was not in his nature to
refuse a combat so fairly offered, he was resolved to close
with the Comte at every hazard, trusting the issue to God,
and his own efforts.
The Plantagenet presented an eloquent picture of order
and preparation, as she drew near the French line, on this
memorable occasion. Her people were all at quarters, and,
as Greenly walked through her batteries, he found every
gun on the starboard side loose, levelled, and ready to be
fired; while the opposite merely required a turn or two of
the tackles to be cast loose, the priming to be applied, and
the loggerhead to follow, in order to be discharged, also.
A death-like stillness reigned from the poop to the cockpit,
the older seamen occasionally glancing through their ports
in order to ascertain the relative positions of the two fleets,
that they might be ready for the collision. As the English
got within musket-shot, the French ran their topsails to the
mast-heads, and their ships gathered fresher way through
the water. Still the former moved with the greatest velocity,
carrying the most sail, and impelled by the greater
momentum
.
When near enough, however, Sir Gervaise gave
the order to reduce the canvass of his own ship.
That will do, Greenly, he said, in a mild, quiet tone.
Let run the top-gallant-halyards, and haul up the foresail.
The way you have, will bring you fairly alongside.
The captain gave the necessary orders, and the master
shortened sail accordingly. Still the Plantagenet shot ahead,
and, in three or four minutes more, her bows doubled so
far on le Foudroyant's quarter, as to permit a gun to bear.
This was the signal for both sides, each ship opening as it
might be in the same breath. The flash, the roar, and the
eddying smoke followed in quick succession, and in a period
of time that seemed nearly instantaneous. The crash of
shot, and the shrieks of wounded mingled with the infernal
din, for nature extorts painful concessions of human
weaknesses
,
at such moments, even from the bravest and firmest.
Bunting was in the act of reporting to Sir Gervaise that no
signal could yet be seen from the Csar, in the midst of this
uproar, when a small round-shot discharged from the
Frenchman's
poop, passed through his body, literally driving the
heart before it, leaving him dead at his commander's feet.
I shall depend on you, Sir Wycherly, for the discharge
of poor Bunting's duty, the remainder of the cruise,
observed
Sir Gervaise, with a smile in which courtesy and
regret struggled singularly for the mastery.
Quarter-masters
,
lay Mr. Bunting's body a little out of the way, and
cover it with those signals. They are a suitable pall for so
brave a man!
Just as this occurred, the Warspite came clear of the
Plantagenet, on her outside, according to orders, and she
opened with her forward guns, taking the second ship in
the French line for her target. In two minutes more these
vessels also were furiously engaged in the hot strife. In
this manner, ship after ship passed on the outside of the
Plantagenet, and sheered into her berth ahead of her who
had just been her own leader, until the Achilles, Lord
Morganic
,
the last of the five, lay fairly side by side with le
Conquereur, the vessel now at the head of the French line.
That the reader may understand the incidents more readily,
we will give the opposing lines in the precise form in which
they lay, viz.
Plantagenet le Foudroyant
Warspite le Tmraire
Blenheim le Dugay Trouin
Thunderer l' Ajax
Achilles le Conquereur.
The constantly recurring discharges of four hundred
pieces of heavy ordnance, within a space so small, had the
effect to repel the regular currents of air, and, almost
immediately
,
to lessen a breeze of six or seven knots, to one
that would not propel a ship more than two or three. This
was the first observable phenomenon connected with the
action
,
but, as it had been expected, Sir Gervaise had used the
precaution to lay his ships as near as possible in the
positions
in which he intended them to fight the battle. The
next great physical consequence, one equally expected and
natural, but which wrought a great change in the aspect of
the battle, was the cloud of smoke in which the ten ships
were suddenly enveloped. At the first broadsides between
the two admirals, volumes of light, fleecy vapour rolled
over the sea, meeting midway, and rising thence in curling
wreaths, left nothing but the masts and sails of the
adversary
visible in the hostile ship. This, of itself, would
have soon hidden the combatants in the bosom of a nearly
impenetrable cloud; but as the vessels drove onward they
entered deeper beneath the sulphurous canopy, until it
spread on each side of them, shutting out the view of ocean,
skies, and horizon. The burning of the priming below
contributed
to increase the smoke, until, not only was
respiration
often difficult, but those who fought only a few yards
apart frequently could not recognise each other's faces.
In the midst of this scene of obscurity, and a din that might
well have alarmed the caverns of the ocean, the earnest and
well-drilled seamen toiled at their ponderous guns, and
remedied
with ready hands the injuries received in the rigging,
each man as intent on his own particular duty as if he
wrought in the occupations of an ordinary gale.
Sir Wycherly, observed the vice-admiral, when the
cannonading had continued some twenty minutes, there is
little for a flag-officer to do in such a cloud of smoke. I
Vol. II.  16
would give much to know the exact positions of the
divisions
of our two rear-admirals?
There is but one mode of ascertaining that, Sir
Gervaise
if
it be your pleasure, I will attempt it. By going
on the main-top-gallant-yard, one might get a clear view,
perhaps.
Sir Gervaise smiled his approbation, and presently he saw
the young man ascending the main-rigging, though half
concealed in smoke. Just at this instant, Greenly ascended
to the poop, from making a tour of observation below.
Without
waiting for a question, the captain made his report.
We are doing pretty well, now, Sir Gervaise, though
the first broadside of the Comte treated us roughly. I think
his fire slackens, and Bury says, he is certain that his
fore-top-mast
is already gone. At all events, our lads are in
good spirits, and as yet all the sticks keep their places.
I'm glad of this, Greenly; particularly of the latter,
just at this moment. I see you are looking at those signals
they cover the body of poor Bunting.
And this train of blood to the ladder, sirI hope our
young baronet is not hurt?
No, it is one of the Bowlderos, who has lost a leg. I
shall have to see that he wants for nothing hereafter.
There was a pause, and then both the gentlemen smiled,
as they heard the crashing work made by a shot just
beneath
them, which, by the sounds and the direction, they
knew had passed through Greenly's crockery. Still neither
spoke. After a few more minutes of silent observation, Sir
Gervaise remarked that he thought the flashes of the French
guns more distant than they had been at first, though, at
that instant, not a trace of their enemy was to be discovered,
except in the roar of the guns, and in these very flashes, and
their effect on the Plantagenet.
If so, sir, the Comte begins to find his berth too hot for
him; here is the wind still directly over
our
taffrail, such
as it is.
Nonowe steer as we beganI keep my eye on that
compass below, and am certain we hold a straight course.
Go forward, Greenly, and see that a sharp look-out is kept
ahead. It is time some of our own ships should be crippled;
we must be careful not to run into them. Should such a
thing happen, sheer hard to starboard, and pass
inside
.
AyaySir Gervaise; your wishes shall be attended
to.
As this was said, Greenly disappeared, and, at the next
instant, Wycherly stood in his place.
Well, sirI am glad to see you back safe. If Greenly
were here, now,
he
would inquire about his
masts
, but
I
wish
to know the position of the
ships
.
I am the bearer of bad news, sir. Nothing at all could
be seen from the top; but in the cross-trees, I got a good
look through the smoke, and am sorry to say the French
rear-admiral is coming down fast on our larboard-quarter,
with all his force. We shall have him abeam in five
minutes.
And Bluewater? demanded Sir Gervaise, quick as
lightning.
I could see nothing of Admiral Bluewater's ships; but
knowing the importance of this intelligence, I came down
immediately, and by the back-stay.
You have done well, sir. Send a midshipman forward
for Captain Greenly; then pass below yourself, and let
the lieutenants in the batteries hear the news. They must
divide their people, and by all means give a prompt and
well-directed
first
broadside.
Wycherly waited for no more. He ran below with the
activity of his years. The message found Greenly between
the knight-heads, but he hurried aft to the poop to ascertain
its object. It took Sir Gervaise but a moment to explain it
all to the captain.
In the name of Heaven, what can the other division be
about, exclaimed Greenly, that it lets the French
rear-admiral
come upon us, in a moment like this!
Of that, sir, it is unnecessary to speak
now
, answered
the commander-in-chief, solemnly. Our present business
is to get ready for this new enemy. Go into the batteries
again, and, as you prize victory, be careful not to throw
away the first discl arge, in the smoke.
As time pressed, Greenly swallowed his discontent, and
departed. The five minutes that succeeded were bitter
minutes to Sir Gervaise Oakes. Beside himself there were
but five men on the poop; viz., the quarter-master who
tended the signals, and three of the Bowlderos. All of these
were using muskets as usual, though the vice-admiral never
permitted marines to be stationed at a point which he wished
to be as clear of smoke, and as much removed from bustle
as possible. He began to pace this comparatively vacant
little deck with a quick step, casting wistful glances towards
the larboard-quarter; but though the smoke occasionally
cleared a little in that direction, the firing having much
slackened
from exhaustion in the men, as well as from injuries
given and received, he was unable to detect any signs of a
ship. Such was the state of things when Wycherly returned
and reported that his orders were delivered, and part of the
people were already in the larboard-batteries.
CHAPTER XIII.
And oh, the little warlike world within!
The well-reeved guns, the netted canopy,
The hoarse command, the busy humming din,
When at a word, the tops are manned on high:
Hark to the boatswain's call, the cheering cry!
While through the seaman's hand the tackle glides,
Or school-boy midshipman, that, standing by,
Strains his shrill pipe, as good or ill betides,
And well the docile crew that skilful urchin guides.
Byron
.
Are
you quite sure, Sir Wycherly Wychecombe, that
there is not some mistake about the approach of the rear
division
of the French? inquired the vice-admiral,
endeavouring
to catch some glimpse of the water, through the smoke
on the larboard hand. May not some crippled ship of our
own have sheered from the line, and been left by us,
unknowingly
,
on that side?
No, Sir Gervaise, there is
no
mistake; there
can
be
none, unless I may have been deceived a little in the
distance
.
I saw nothing but the sails and spars, not of a
single
vessel, but of
three
ships; and one of them wore the
flag of a French rear-admiral at the mizzen. As a proof
that I was not mistaken, sir, there it is this minute!
The smoke on the off side of the Plantagenet, as a matter
of course, was much less dense than that on the side engaged,
and the wind beginning to blow in eddies, as ever happens
in a heavy cannonade, there were moments in which it cast
aside the shroud of battle. At that instant an opening
occurred through which a single mast, and a single sail
were visible, in the precise spot where Wycherly had stated
the enemy might be looked for. It was a mizzen-top-sail,
beyond a question, and above it was fluttering the little
square flag of the rear-admiral. Sir Gervaise decided on
the character of the vessel, and on his own course, in an
instant. Stepping to the edge of the poop, with his natural
voice, without the aid of a trumpet of any sort, he called out
in tones that rose above the roar of the contest, the ominous
but familiar nautical words of stand by! Perhaps a call
from powerful lungs (and the vice-admiral's voice, when he
chose to use it, was like the blast of a clarion) is clearer and
more impressive, when unaided by instruments, than when
it comes disguised and unnatural through a tube. At any
rate, these words were heard even on the lower deck, by
those who stood near the hatches. Taking them up, they
were repeated by a dozen voices, with such expressions as
Look out, lads; Sir Jarvy's awake! Sight your guns!
Wait till she 's square! and other similar admonitions
that it is usual for the sea-officer to give, as he is about to
commence the strife. At this critical moment, Sir Gervaise
again looked up, and caught another glimpse of the little flag,
as it passed into a vast wreath of smoke; he saw that the
ship was fairly abeam, and, as if doubling all his powers,
he shouted the word fire! Greenly was standing on the
lower-deck ladder, with his head just even with the
coamings
of the hatch, as this order reached him, and he
repeated
it in a voice scarcely less startling. The cloud on
the larboard side was driven in all directions, like dust
scattered
by wind. The ship seemed on fire, and the missiles
of forty-one guns flew on their deadly errand, as it might be
at a single flash. The old Plantagenet trembled to her keel,
16 *
and even bowed a little at the recoils, but, like one suddenly
relieved from a burthen, righted and went on her way none
the less active. That timely broadside saved the English
commander-in-chief's ship from an early defeat. It took the
crew of le Pluton, her new adversary, by surprise; for they
had not been able to distinguish the precise position of their
enemy; and, besides doing vast injury to both hull and
people
,
drew her fire at an unpropitious moment. So
uncertain
and hasty, indeed, was the discharge the French ship
gave in return, that no small portion of the contents of her
guns passed ahead of the Plantagenet, and went into the
larboard
quarter of le Tmraire, the French admiral's
second
ahead.
That was a timely salute, said Sir Gervaise, smiling,
as soon as the fire of his new enemy had been received
without
material injury. The first blow is always half the
battle. We may now work on with some hopes of success.
Ah! here comes Greenly again, God be praised! unhurt.
The meeting of these two experienced seamen was
cordial
,
but not without great seriousness. Both felt that the
situation of not only the ship, but of the whole fleet, was
extremely critical, the odds being much too great, and the
position of the enemy too favourable, not to render the
result
,
to say the very least, exceedingly doubtful. Some
advantage had certainly been obtained, thus far; but there
was little hope of preserving it long. The circumstances
called for very decided and particularly bold measures.
My mind is made up, Greenly, observed the
vice-admiral
.
We must go aboard of one of these ships, and
make it a hand-to-hand affair. We will take the French
commander-in-chief; he is evidently a good deal cut up by
the manner in which his fire slackens, and if we can carry
him, or even force him out of the line, it will give us a
better
chance with the rest. As for Bluewater, God only
knows what has become of him! He is not here, at any
rate, and we must help ourselves.
You have only to order, Sir Gervaise, to be obeyed. I
will lead the boarders, myself.
It must be a general thing, Greenly; I rather think we
shall all of us have to go aboard of le Foudroyant. Go,
give the necessary orders, and when everything is ready,
round in a little on the larboard braces, clap your helm
a-port, and give the ship a rank sheer to starboard. This
will bring matters to a crisis at once. By letting the
fore-sail
fall, and setting the spanker, you might shove the ship
ahead a little faster.
Greenly instantly left the poop on this new and important
duty. He sent his orders into the batteries, bidding the
people remain at their guns, however, to the last moment;
and particularly instructing the captain of marines, as to
the manner in which he was to cover, and then follow the
boarding-party. This done, he gave orders to brace
forward
the yards, as directed by Sir Gervaise.
The reader will not overlook the material circumstance
that all we have related occurred amid the din of battle.
Guns were exploding at each instant, the cloud of smoke
was both thickening and extending, fire was flashing in the
semi-obscurity of its volumes, shot were rending the wood
and cutting the rigging, and the piercing shrieks of agony,
only so much the more appalling by being extorted from
the stern and resolute, blended their thrilling
accompaniments
.
Men seemed to be converted into demons, and yet
there was a lofty and stubborn resolution to conquer
mingled
with all, that ennobled the strife and rendered it heroic.
The broadsides that were delivered in succession down the
line, as ship after ship of the rear division reached her
station
,
however, proclaimed that Monsieur des Prez had
imitated
Sir Gervaise's mode of closing, the only one by means
of which the leading vessel could escape destruction, and
that the English were completely doubled on. At this
moment
,
the sail-trimmers of the Plantagenet handled their
braces. The first pull was the last. No sooner were the
ropes started, than the fore-top-mast went over the bows,
dragging after it the main with all its hamper, the mizzen
snapping like a pipe-stem, at the cap. By this cruel
accident
,
the result of many injuries to shrouds, back-stays and
spars, the situation of the Plantagenet became worse than
ever; for, not only was the wreck to be partially cleared, at
least, to fight many of the larboard guns, but the command
of the ship was, in a great measure, lost, in the centre of
one of the most infernal
mles
that ever accompanied a
combat at sea.
At no time does the trained seaman ever appear so great,
as when he meets sudden misfortunes with the steadiness
and quiet which it is a material part of the
morale
of
discipline
to inculcate. Greenly was full of ardour for the
assault
,
and was thinking of the best mode of running foul
of his adversary, when this calamity occurred; but the masts
were hardly down, when he changed all his thoughts to a
new current, and called out to the sail-trimmers to lay
over, and clear the wreck.
Sir Gervaise, too, met with a sudden and violent check
to the current of his feelings. He had collected his
Bowlderos
,
and was giving his instructions as to the manner in
which they were to follow, and keep near his person, in the
expected hand-to-hand encounter, when the heavy rushing
of the air, and the swoop of the mass from above, announced
what had occurred. Turning to the men, he calmly
ordered
them to aid in getting rid of the incumbrances, and was
in the very act of directing Wycherly to join in the same
duty, when the latter exclaimed
See, Sir Gervaise, here comes another of the
Frenchmen
close upon our quarter. By heavens,
they
must mean
to board!
The vice-admiral instinctively grasped his sword-hilt
tighter, and turned in the direction mentioned by his
companion
.
There, indeed, came a fresh ship, shoving the
cloud aside, and, by the clearer atmosphere that seemed to
accompany her, apparently bringing down a current of air
stronger than common. When first seen, the jib-boom and
bowsprit were both enveloped in smoke, but his bellying
fore-top-sail
,
and the canvass hanging in festoons, loomed grandly
in the vapour, the black yards seeming to embrace the
wreaths, merely to cast them aside. The proximity, too,
was fearful, her yard-arms promising to clear those of the
Plantagenet only by a few feet, as her dark bows brushed
along the admiral's side.
This will be fearful work, indeed! exclaimed Sir
Gervaise
.
A fresh broadside from a ship so near, will sweep
all from the spars. Go, Wychecombe, tell Greenly to call
inHold!'T is an English ship! No Frenchman's
bowsprit
stands like that! Almighty God be praised! 'T is the
Csarthere is the old Roman's figure-head just shoving
out of the smoke!
This was said with a yell, rather than a cry, of delight,
and in a voice so loud that the words were heard below, and
flew through the ship like the hissing of an ascending rocket.
To confirm the glorious tidings, the flash and roar of guns
on the off-side of the stranger announced the welcome
tidings
that le Pluton had an enemy of her own to contend
with, thus enabling the Plantagenet's people to throw all their
strength on the starboard guns, and pursue their other
necessary
work without further molestation from the French
rear-admiral. The gratitude of Sir Gervaise, as the
rescuing
ship thrust herself in between him and his most
formidable
assailant was too deep for language. He placed his
hat mechanically before his face, and thanked God, with a
fervour of spirit that never before had attended his
thanksgivings
.
This brief act of devotion over, he found the bows
of the Csar, which ship was advancing very slowly, in
order not to pass too far ahead, just abreast of the spot
where he stood, and so near that objects were pretty plainly
visible. Between her knight-heads stood Bluewater,
conning
the ship, by means of a line of officers, his hat in his
hand, waving in encouragement to his own people, while
Geoffrey Cleveland held the trumpet at his elbow. At that
moment three noble cheers were given by the crews of the
two friendly vessels, and mingled with the increasing roar
of the Csar's artillery. Then the smoke rose in a cloud
over the forecastle of the latter ship, and persons could no
longer be distinguished.
Nevertheless, like all that thus approached, the relieving
ship passed slowly ahead, until nearly her whole length
protected
the undefended side of her consort, delivering her fire
with fearful rapidity. The Plantagenets seemed to imbibe
new life from this arrival, and their starboard guns spoke out
again, as if manned by giants. It was five minutes,
perhaps
,
after this seasonable arrival, before the guns of the
other ships of the English rear announced their presence on
the outside of Monsieur des Prez's force; thus bringing the
whole of the two fleets into four lines, all steering dead
before
the wind, and, as it were, interwoven with each other.
By that time, the poops of the Plantagenet and Csar
became
visible from one to the other, the smoke now driving
principally off from the vessels. There again were our two
admirals each anxiously watching to get a glimpse of his
friend. The instant the place was clear, Sir Gervaise
applied
the trumpet to his mouth, and called out
God bless youDick! may God for ever bless you
your
ship can do itclap your helm hard a-starboard, and
sheer into M. des Prez; you 'll have him in five minutes.
Bluewater smiled, waved his hand, gave an order, and
laid aside his trumpet. Two minutes later, the Csar
sheered into the smoke on her larboard beam, and the crash
of the meeting vessels was heard. By this time, the wreck
of the Plantagenet was cut adrift, and she, too, made a rank
sheer, though in a direction opposite to that of the Csar's.
As she went through the smoke, her guns ceased, and when
she emerged into the pure air, it was found that le
Foudroyant
had set courses and top-gallant-sails, and was
drawing
so fast ahead, as to render pursuit, under the little sail
that could be set, unprofitable. Signals were out of the
question, but this movement of the two admirals converted
the whole battle scene into one of inexplicable confusion.
Ship after ship changed her position, and ceased her fire
from uncertainty what that position was, until a general
silence succeeded the roar of the cannonade. It was
indispensable
to pause and let the smoke blow away.
It did not require many minutes to raise the curtain on
the two fleets. As soon as the firing stopped, the wind
increased
,
and the smoke was driven off to leeward in a vast
straggling cloud, that seemed to scatter and disperse in the
air spontaneously. Then a sight of the havoc and
destruction
that had been done in this short conflict was first
obtained.
The two squadrons were intermingled, and it required
some little time for Sir Gervaise to get a clear idea of the
state of his own ships. Generally, it might be said that
the vessels were scattering, the French sheering towards
their own coast, while the English were principally coming
by the wind on the larboard tack, or heading in towards
England. The Csar and le Pluton were still foul of each
other, though a rear-admiral's flag was flying at the mizzen
of the first, while that which had so lately fluttered at the
royal-mast-head of the other, had disappeared. The Achilles,
Lord Morganic, was still among the French, more to leeward
than any other English ship, without a single spar standing.
Her ensigns were flying, notwithstanding, and the Thunderer
and Dublin, both in tolerable order, were edging away rapidly
to cover their crippled consort; though the nearest French
vessels seemed more bent on getting out of the
mle
, and
into their own line again, than on securing any advantage
already obtained. Le Tmraire was in the same
predicament
as the Achilles as to spars, though much more injured
in her hull, besides having thrice as many casualties. Her
flag was down; this ship having fairly struck to the
Warspite
,
whose boats were already alongside of her. Le
Foudroyant
,
with quite one-third of her crew killed and wounded,
was running off to leeward, with signals flying for her
consorts
to rally round her; but, within less than ten minutes
after she became visible, her main and mizzen-masts both
went. The Blenheim had lost all her top-masts, like the
Plantagenet, and neither the Elizabeth nor the York had a
mizzen-mast standing, although engaged but a very short
time. Several lower yards were shot away, or so much
injured
as to compel the ships to shorten sail; this accident
having occurred in both fleets. As for the damage done to
the standing and running rigging, and to the sails, it is only
necessary to say that shrouds, back and head-stays, braces,
bowlines and lifts, were dangling in all directions, while the
canvass that was open exhibited all sorts of rents, from that
which had been torn like cloth in the shopman's hands, to
the little eyelet holes of the canister and grape. It appeared,
by the subsequent reports of the two parties, that, in this
short but severe conflict, the slain and wounded of the
English amounted to seven hundred and sixty-three,
including
officers; and that of the French, to one thousand four
hundred and twelve. The disparity in this respect would
probably have been greater against the latter, had it not
been for the manner in which M. des Prez succeeded in
doubling on his enemies.
Little need be said in explanation of the parts of this battle
that have not been distinctly related. M. des Prez had
manuvred
in the manner he did, at the commencement of the
affair, in the hope of drawing Sir Gervaise down upon the
division of the Comte de Vervillin; and, no sooner did he
see the first fairly enveloped in smoke, than he wore short
round, and joined in the affair, as has been mentioned. At
this sight, Bluewater's loyalty to the Stuarts could resist no
longer. Throwing out a general signal to engage, he squared
away, set everything that would draw on the Csar, and
arrived in time to save his friend. The other ships
followed
,
engaging on the outside, for want of room to imitate
their leader.
Two more of the French ships, at least, in addition to
le Tmraire
and
le Pluton
, might have been added to
the list of prizes, had the actual condition of their fleet been
known. But, at such moments, a combatant sees and feels
his own injuries, while he has to conjecture many of those
of his adversaries; and the English were too much occupied
in making the provisions necessary to save their remaining
spars, to risk much in order to swell an advantage that was
already so considerable. Some distant firing passed
between
the Thunderer and Dublin, and l'Ajax, le Dugay
Trouin, and l'Hector, before the two former succeeded in
getting Lord Morganic out of his difficulties; but it led to no
material result; merely inflicting new injuries on certain
spars that were sufficiently damaged before, and killing and
wounding some fifteen or twenty men quite uselessly. As
soon as the vice-admiral saw what was likely to be the
effects of this episode, he called off Captain O'Neil of the
Dublin, by signal, he being an officer of a hot temper, as
the soldier said of himself at Waterloo. The compliance
with this order may be said to have terminated the battle.
The reader will remember that the wind, at the
commencement
of the engagement, was at north-west. It was
nearly killed, as seamen express it, by the cannonade;
then it revived a little, as the concussions of the guns
gradually
diminished. But the combined effect of the advance of
the day, and the rushing of new currents of air to fill the
vacuums produced by the burning of so much powder, was
a sudden shift of wind; a breeze coming out strong, and as
it might be, in an instant, from the eastward. This
unexpected
alteration in the direction and power of the wind, cost
the Thunderer her foremast, and did other damage to
different
ships; but, by dint of great activity and careful
handling, all the English vessels got their heads round to
the northward, while the French filled the other way, and
went off free, steering nearly south-east, making the best of
their way for Brest. The latter suffered still more than
their enemies, by the change just mentioned; and when they
reached port, as did all but one the following day, no less
than three were towed in without a spar standing, bowsprits
excepted.
The exception was
le Caton
, which ship M. de Vervillin
set fire to and blew up, on account of her damages, in the
course of the afternoon. Thus of twelve noble two-decked
ships with which this officer sailed from Cherbourg only
two days before, he reached Brest with but seven.
Nor were the English entirely without their
embarrassments
.
Although the Warspite had compelled le Tmraire to
strike, she was kept afloat herself with a good deal of
difficulty
,
and that, too, not without considerable assistance
from the other vessels. The leaks, however, were
eventually
stopped, and then the ship was given up to the care of
her own crew. Other vessels suffered of course, but no
English ship was in as much jeopardy as this.
The first hour after the action ceased, was one of great
exertion and anxiety to our admiral. He called the Chloe
alongside by signal, and, attended by Wycherly and his
own quarter-masters, Galleygo, who went without orders,
and the Bowlderos who were unhurt, he shifted his flag to
that frigate. Then he immediately commenced passing from
vessel to vessel, in order to ascertain the actual condition of
his command. The Achilles detained him some time, and
he was near her, or to leeward, when the wind shifted; which
was bringing him to windward in the present state of things.
Of this advantage he availed himself, by urging the
different
ships off as fast as possible; and long before the sun
was in the meridian, all the English vessels were making
the best of their way towards the land, with the intention of
fetching into Plymouth if possible; if not, into the nearest
and best anchorage to leeward. The progress of the fleet
was relatively slow, as a matter of course, though it got
along at the rate of some five knots, by making a free wind
of it.
The master of the Chloe had just taken the sun, in order
Vol. II.  17
to ascertain his latitude, when the vice-admiral commanded
Denham to set top-gallant-sails, and go within hail of the
Csar. That ship had got clear of
le Pluton
half an hour
after the action ceased, and she was now leading the fleet,
with her three topsails on the caps. Aloft she had suffered
comparatively little; but Sir Gervaise knew that there must
have been a serious loss of men in carrying, hand to hand,
a vessel like that of M. des Prez. He was anxious to see
his friend, and to hear the manner in which his success had
been obtained, and, we might add, to remonstrate with
Bluewater
on a course that had led the latter to the verge of a
most dangerous abyss.
The Chloe was half an hour running through the fleet,
which was a good deal extended, and was sailing without
any regard to a line. Sir Gervaise had many questions to
ask, too, of the different commanders in passing. At last
the frigate overtook
le Tmraire
, which vessel was
following
the Csar under easy canvass. As the Chloe came up
abeam, Sir Gervaise appeared in the gangway of the
frigate
,
and, hat in hand, he asked with an accent that was
intelligible, though it might not have absolutely stood the
test of criticism,
Le Vice-Admiral Oakes demande comment se porte-il,
le contre-amiral, le Vicomte des Prez?
A little elderly man, dressed with extreme care, with a
powdered head, but of a firm step and perfectly collected
expression of countenance, appeared on the verge of le
Tmraire's
poop, trumpet in hand, to reply.
Le Vicomte des Prez remercie bien Monsieur le
Chevalier
Oake, et dsire vivement de savoir comment se porte
Monsieur le Vice-Amiral?
Mutual waves of the trumpets served as replies to the
questions, and then, after taking a moment to muster his
French, Sir Gervaise continued
J'espre voir Monsieur le Contre-Amiral  diner,
cinq heures, prcis
.
The vicomte smiled at this characteristic manifestation of
good-will and courtesy; and after pausing an instant to
choose an expression to soften his refusal, and to express
his own sense of the motive of the invitation, he called out
Veuillez bien recevoir nos excuses pour aujourd'hui,
Mons. le Chevalier. Nous n'avons pas encore digr le
repas
si noble reu  vos mains comme djeuner
.
The Chloe passing ahead, bows terminated the interview.
Sir Gervaise's French was at fault, for what between the
rapid, neat, pronunciation of the Frenchman, the trumpet,
and the turn of the expression, he did not comprehend the
meaning of the
contre-amiral
.
What does he say, Wychecombe? he asked eagerly
of the young man. Will he come, or not?
Upon my word, Sir Gervaise, French is a sealed
language
to me. Never having been a prisoner, no
opportunity
has offered for acquiring the language. As I
understood
,
you intended to ask him to dinner; I rather think,
from his countenance, he meant to say he was not in spirits
for the entertainment.
Pooh! we would have put him in spirits, and Bluewater
could have talked to him in his own tongue, by the fathom.
We will close with the Csar to leeward, Denham; never
mind rank on an occasion like this. It 's time to let the
top-gallant-halyards
run; you 'll have to settle your top-sails
too, or we shall shoot past her. Bluewater may take it as
a salute to his gallantry in carrying so fine a ship in so
handsome a manner.
Several minutes now passed in silence, during which the
frigate was less and less rapidly closing with the larger
vessel
,
drawing ahead towards the last, as it might be, foot by
foot. Sir Gervaise got upon one of the quarter-deck guns,
and steadying himself against the hammock-cloths, he was
in readiness to exchange the greetings he was accustomed
to give and to receive from his friend, in the same heartfelt
manner as if nothing had occurred to disturb the harmony
of their feelings. The single glance of the eye, the waving
of the hat, and the noble manner in which Bluewater
interposed
between him and his most dangerous enemy, was still
present to his mind, and disposed him even more than
common
to the kindest feelings of his nature. Stowel was already
on the poop of the Csar, and, as the Chloe came slowly
on, he raised his hat in deference to the commander-in-chief.
It was a point of delicacy with Sir Gervaise never to
interfere
with any subordinate flag-officer's vessel any more than
duty rigidly required; consequently his communications
with the captain of the Csar had usually been of a
general
nature, verbal orders and criticisms being studiously
avoided. This circumstance rendered the
commander-in-chief
even a greater favourite than common with Stowel,
who had all his own way in his own ship, in consequence of
the rear-admiral's indifference to such matters.
How do you do, Stowel? called out Sir Gervaise,
cordially
.
I am delighted to see you on your legs, and hope
the old Roman is not much the worse for this day's
treatment
.
I thank you, Sir Gervaise, we are both afloat yet, though
we have passed through warm times. The ship is damaged,
sir, as you may suppose; and, although it stands so bravely,
and looks so upright, that foremast of ours is as good as a
condemned spar. One thirty-two through the heart of it,
about ten feet from the deck, an eighteen in the hounds, and
a double-header sticking in one of the hoops! A spar
cannot
be counted for much that has as many holes in it as
those, sir!
Deal tenderly with it, my old friend, and spare the
canvass
;
those chaps at Plymouth will set all to rights, again,
in a week. Hoops can be had for asking, and as for holes
in the heart, many a poor fellow has had them, and lived
through it all. You are a case in point; Mrs. Stowel not
having spared you in that way, I 'll answer for it.
Mrs. Stowel commands ashore, Sir Gervaise, and I
command afloat; and, in that way, we keep a quiet ship
and a quiet house, I thank you, sir; and I endeavour to
think of her at sea, as little as possible.
Ay, that 's the way with you doting husbands;always
ashamed of your own lively sensibilities. But what has
become of Bluewater?Does he know that we are
alongside
?
Stowel looked round, cast his eyes up at the sails, and
played with the hilt of his sword. The rapid eye of the
commander-in-chief detected this embarrassment, and quick
as thought he demanded what had happened.
Why, Sir Gervaise, you know how it is with some
admirals
,
who like to be in everything. I told our respected
and beloved friend, that he had nothing to do with boarding;
that if either of us was to go,
I
was the proper man, but
that we ought both to stick by the ship. He answered
something
about lost honour and duty, and you know, sir, what
legs he has, when he wishes to use them! One might as
well think of stopping a deserter by a halloo; away he went,
with the first party, sword in hand, a sight I never saw
before, and never wish to see again! Thus you see how it
was, sir.
The commander-in-chief compressed his lips, until his
features, and indeed his whole form was a picture of desperate
resolution, though his face was as pale as death, and the
muscles of his mouth twitched, in spite of all his physical
self-command.
I understand you, sir, he said, in a voice that seemed
to issue from his chest; you wish to say that Admiral
Bluewater is killed.
No, thank God! Sir Gervaise, not
quite
as bad as that,
though sadly hurt; yes, indeed, very sadly hurt!
Sir Gervaise Oakes groaned, and for a few minutes he
leaned his head on the hammock-cloths, veiling his face
from the sight of men. Then he raised his person erect, and
said steadily
Run your top-sails to the mast-head, Captain Stowel,
and round your ship to. I will come on board of you.
An order was given to Denham to take room, when the
Chloe came to the wind on one tack and the Csar on the
other. This was contrary to rule, as it increased the
distance
between the ships; but the vice-admiral was impatient
to be in his barge. In ten minutes he was mounting the
Csar's side, and in two more he was in Bluewater's
main-cabin
.
Geoffrey Cleveland was seated by the table, with
his face buried in his arms. Touching his shoulder, the boy
raised his head, and showed a face covered with tears.
How is he, boy? demanded Sir Gervaise, hoarsely.
Do the surgeons give any hopes?
The midshipman shook his head, and then, as if the
question
renewed his grief, he again buried his face in his arms.
At this moment, the surgeon of the ship came from the
rear-admiral's
state-room, and following the commander-in-chief
into the after-cabin, they had a long conference together.
Minute after minute passed, and the Csar and Chloe still
lay with their main-top-sails aback. At the end of half an
17 *
hour, Denham wore round and laid the head of his frigate
in the proper direction. Ship after ship came up, and went
on to the northward, fast as her crippled state would allow,
and yet no sign of movement was seen in the Csar. Two
sail had appeared in the south-eastern board, and they, too,
approached and passed without bringing the vice-admiral
even on deck. These ships proved to be the Carnatic and
her prize, le Scipion, which latter ship had been intercepted
and easily captured by the former. The steering of M. de
Vervillin to the south-west had left a clear passage to the
two ships, which were coming down with a free wind at a
handsome rate of sailing. This news was sent into the
Csar's cabin, but it brought no person and no answer out
of it. At length, when everything had gone ahead, the
barge returned to the Chloe. It merely took a note,
however
,
which was no sooner read by Wycherly, than he
summoned
the Bowlderos and Galleygo, had all the
vice-admiral's
luggage passed into the boat, struck his flag, and
took his leave of Denham. As soon as the boat was clear
of the frigate, the latter made all sail after the fleet, to
resume her ordinary duties of a look-out and a
repeating-ship
.
As soon as Wycherly reached the Csar, that ship hoisted
in the vice-admiral's barge. A report was made to Sir
Gervaise
of what had been done, and then an order came on
deck that occasioned all in the fleet to stare with surprise.
The red flag of Sir Gervaise Oakes was run up at the
fore-royal-mast-head
of the Csar, while the white flag of the
rear-admiral was still flying at her mizzen. Such a thing
had never before been known to happen, if it has ever
happened
since; and to the time when she was subsequently
lost, the Csar was known as the double flag-ship.
CHAPTER XIV.
He spoke; when behold the fair Geraldine's form
On the canvass enchantingly glowed;
His touches, they flew like the leaves in a storm;
And the pure pearly white, and the carnation warm,
Contending in harmony flowed.
Alston
.
We
shall now ask permission of the reader to advance
the time just eight-and-forty hours; a liberty with the unities
which, he will do us the justice to say, we have not often
taken. We must also transfer the scene to that already
described at Wychecombe, including the Head, the station,
the roads, and the inland and seaward views. Summer
weather had returned, too, the pennants of the ships at
anchor
scarce streaming from their masts far enough to form
curved lines. Most of the English fleet was among these
vessels, though the squadron had undergone some changes.
The Druid had got into Portsmouth with
la Victoire;
the
Driver and Active had made the best of their way to the
nearest ports, with despatches for the admiralty; and the
Achilles, in tow of the Dublin, with the Chloe to take care
of both, had gone to leeward, with square yards, in the
hope of making Falmouth. The rest of the force was
present
,
the crippled ships having been towed into the roads that
morning. The picture among the shipping was one of
extreme
activity and liveliness. Jury-masts were going up in
the Warspite; lower and top-sail-yards were down to be
fished, or new ones were rigging to be sent aloft in their
places; the Plantagenet was all a-tanto, again, in readiness
for another action, with rigging secured and masts fished,
while none but an instructed eye could have detected, at a
short distance, that the Csar, Carnatic, Dover, York,
Elizabeth
,
and one or two more, had been in action at all. The
landing was crowded with boats as before, and gun-room
servants and midshipmen's boys were foraging as usual;
some with honest intent to find delicacies for the wounded,
but more with the roguish design of contributing to the
comforts
of the unhurt, by making appeals to the sympathies of
the women of the neighbourhood, in behalf of the hurt.
The principal transformation that had been brought about
by this state of things, however, was apparent at the station.
This spot had the appearance of a place to which the
headquarters
of an army had been transferred, in the vicissitudes
of the field; warlike sailors, if not soldiers, flocking to it, as
the centre of interest and intelligence. Still there was a
singularity observable in the manner in which these heroes
of the deck paid their court; the cottage being seemingly
tabooed, or at most, approached by very few, while the grass
at the foot of the flag-staff was already beginning to show
proofs of the pressure of many feet. This particular spot,
indeed, was the centre of attraction; there officers of all
ranks and ages were constantly arriving, and thence they
were as often departing; all bearing countenances sobered
by anxiety and apprehension. Notwithstanding the
constant
mutations, there had been no instant since the rising
of the sun, when some ten or twelve, at least, including
captains, lieutenants, masters and idlers, had not been
collected
around the bench at the foot of the signal-staff, and
frequently the number reached even to twenty.
A little retired from the crowd, and near the verge of the
cliff, a large tent had been pitched. A marine paced in its
front, as a sentinel. Another stood near the gate of the little
door-yard of the cottage, and all persons who approached
either, with the exception of a few of the privileged, were
referred to the sergeant who commanded the guard. The
arms of the latter were stacked on the grass, at hand, and
the men off post were loitering near. These were the usual
military signs of the presence of officers of rank, and may,
in sooth, be taken as clues to the actual state of things, on
and around the Head.
Admiral Bluewater lay in the cottage, while Sir Gervaise
Oakes occupied the tent. The former had been transferred
to the place where he was about to breathe his last, at his
own urgent request, while his friend had refused to be
separated
from him, so long as life remained. The two flags
were still flying at the mast-heads of the Csar, a sort of
melancholy memorial of the tie that had so long bound their
gallant owners in the strong sympathies of an enduring
personal
and professional friendship.
Persons of the education of Mrs. Dutton and her daughter,
had not dwelt so long on that beautiful headland, without
leaving on the spot some lasting impressions of their tastes.
Of the cottage, we have already spoken. The little garden,
too, then bright with flowers, had a grace and refinement
about it that we would hardly have expected to meet in such
a place; and even the paths that led athwart the verdant
common
which spread over so much of the upland, had been
directed with an eye to the picturesque and agreeable. One
of these paths, too, led to a rustic summer-housea sort of
small, rude pavilion, constructed, like the fences, of
fragments
of wrecks, and placed on a shelf of the cliff, at a
dizzy elevation, but in perfect security. So far from there
being any danger in entering this summer-house, indeed,
Wycherly, during his six months' residence near the Head,
had made a path that descended still lower, to a point that
was utterly concealed from all eyes above, and had actually
planted a seat on another shelf, with so much security, that
both Mildred and her mother often visited it in company.
During the young man's recent absence, the poor girl,
indeed
,
had passed much of her time there, weeping and
suffering
in solitude. To this seat, Dutton never ventured;
the descent, though well protected with ropes, requiring
greater steadiness of foot and head than intemperance had
left him. Once or twice, Wycherly had induced Mildred
to pass an hour with him alone in this romantic place, and
some of his sweetest recollections of this just-minded and
intelligent
girl, were connected with the frank communications
that had there occurred between them. On this bench he
was seated at the time of the opening of the present chapter.
The movement on the Head, and about the cottage, was so
great, as to deprive him of every chance of seeing Mildred
alone, and he had hoped that, led by some secret sympathy,
she, too, might seek this perfectly retired seat, to obtain a
moment of unobserved solitude, if not from some still dearer
motive. He had not waited long, ere he heard a heavy
foot over his head, and a man entered the summer-house.
He was yet debating whether to abandon all hopes of
seeing Mildred, when his acute ear caught her light and
well-known footstep, as she reached the summer-house,
also.
Father, I have come as you desired, said the poor girl,
in those tremulous tones which Wycherly too well
understood
,
not to imagine the condition of Dutton. Admiral
Bluewater dozes, and mother has permitted me to steal
away.
Ay, Admiral Bluewater is a great man, though but little
better than a dead one! answered Dutton, as harshly in
manner as the language was coarse. You and your
mother are all attention to
him;
did
I
lie in his place,
which of you would be found hanging over my bed, with
pale cheeks and tearful eyes?
Both
of us, father!
Do
not
do
not think so ill of
your wife and daughter, as to suppose it possible that either
of them could forget her duty.
Yes,
duty
might do something, perhaps; what has duty
to do with this useless rear-admiral? I
hate
the scoundrel
he was one of the court that cashiered me; and one, too,
that I am told, was the most obstinate in refusing to help
me into this pitiful berth of a master.
Mildred was silent. She could not vindicate her friend
without criminating her father. As for Wycherly, he would
have given a year's income to be at sea, and yet he shrunk
from wounding the poor daughter's feelings by letting her
know he overheard the dialogue. This indecision made
him the unwilling auditor of a conversation that he ought
not to have heardan occurrence which, had there been
time for reflection, he would have taken means to prevent.
Sit you down here, Mildred, resumed Dutton, sternly,
and listen to what I have to say. It is time that there
should no longer be any trifling between us. You have the
fortunes of your mother and myself in your hands; and, as
one of the parties so deeply concerned, I am determined
mine
shall be settled at once.
I do not understand you, father, said Mildred, with a
tremour in her voice that almost induced the young man to
show himself, though, we owe it to truth to say, that a lively
curiosity
now
mingled with his other sensations. How can
I have the keeping of dear mother's fortunes and yours?
Dear
mother, truly!
Dear
enough has she proved to
me; but I intend the daughter shall pay for it. Hark you,
Mildred; I 'll have no more of this triflingbut I ask you,
in a father's name, if any man has offered you his hand?
Speak plainly, and conceal nothingI
will
be answered.
I wish to conceal nothing, father, that ought to be told;
but when a young woman declines the honour that another
does her in this way,
ought
she to reveal the secret, even to
her father?
She
ought;
and, in your case, she
shall
. No more
hesitation; name
one
of the offers you have had.
Mildred, after a brief pause, in a low, tremulous voice,
pronounced the name of Mr. Rotherham.
I suspected as much, growled Dutton; there was a
time when even
he
might have answered, but we can do
better than that now. Still he may be kept as a reserve;
the thousand pounds Mr. Thomas says shall be paid, and
that and the living will make a comfortable port after a
stormy life. Well, who next, Mildred? Has Mr. Thomas
Wychecombe ever come to the point?
He has asked me to become his wife, within the last
twenty-four hours, father; if that is what you mean.
No affectations, Milly; I can't bear them. You know
well enough what I mean. What was your answer?
I do not love him in the least, father, and, of course, I
told him I could not marry him.
That don't follow
of course
, by any means, girl! The
marrying is done by the priest, and the love is a very
different
thing. I hope you consider Mrs. Dutton as my
wife?
What a question! murmured Mildred.
Well, and do you suppose she
loves
me;
can
love me,
now I am a disgraced, impoverished man?
Father!
Comecomeenough of this. Mr. Thomas
Wychecombe
may not be legitimateI rather think he is not, by
the proofs Sir Reginald has produced within the last day or
two; and I understand his own mother is dissatisfied with
him, and
that
will knock his claim flat aback.
Notwithstanding
,
Mildred, Tom Wychecombe has a good six hundred a
year already, and Sir Reginald himself admits that he must
take all the personal property the late baronet could leave.
You forget, father, said Mildred, conscious of the
inefficacy
of any other appeal, that Mr. Thomas has promised
to pay the legacies that Sir Wycherly
intended
to leave.
Don't place any expectations on that, Mildred. I dare
say he would settle ten of the twenty thousand on you
to-morrow
,
if you would consent to have him. But, now, as
to this new baronet, for it seems he is to have both title and
estatehas
he
ever offered?
There was a long pause, during which Wycherly thought
he heard the hard but suppressed breathing of Mildred. To
remain quiet any longer, he felt was as impossible as,
indeed
,
his conscience told him was dishonourable, and he
sprang along the path to ascend to the summer-house. At
the first sound of his footstep, a faint cry escaped Mildred;
but when Wycherly entered the pavilion, he found her face
buried in her hands, and Dutton tottering forward, equally
in surprise and alarm. As the circumstances would not
admit of evasion, the young man threw aside all reserve,
and spoke plainly.
I have been an unwilling listener to a
part
of your
discourse
with Mildred, Mr. Dutton, he said, and can
answer
your last question for myself. I
have
offered my hand
to your daughter, sir; an offer that I now renew, and the
acceptance of which would make me the happiest man in
England. If your influence could aid mefor she has
refused
my hand.
Refused! exclaimed Dutton, in a surprise that
over-came
the calculated amenity of manner he had assumed the
instant Wycherly appeared  Refused Sir Wycherly
Wychecombe! but it was before your rights had been as
well established as they are now. Mildred, answer to this
how
could
younay, how
dare
you refuse such an offer
as this?
Human nature could not well endure more. Mildred
suffered
her hands to fall helplessly into her lap, and exposed
a face that was lovely as that of an angel's, though pale
nearly to the hue of death. Feeling extorted the answer
she made, though the words had hardly escaped her, ere
she repented having uttered them, and had again buried her
face in her hands
Fathershe said
could
I
dare
I to encourage Sir
Wycherly Wychecombe to unite himself to a family like
ours!
Conscience smote Dutton with a force that nearly sobered
him, and what explanation might have followed it is hard
to say; Wycherly, in an under-tone, however, requested to
be left alone with the daughter. Dutton had sense enough
to understand he was
de trop
, and shame enough to wish to
escape. In half a minute, he had hobbled up to the
summit
of the cliff and disappeared.
Mildred!
Dearest
Mildredsaid Wycherly,
tenderly
,
gently endeavouring to draw her attention to himself,
we are alone now; surelysurelyyou will not refuse
to
look
at
me!
Is he gone? asked Mildred, dropping her hands, and
looking wildly around. Thank God! It is over, for this
time, at least! Now, let us go to the house; Admiral
Bluewater
may miss me.
No, Mildred, not yet. You surely can spare meme,
who have suffered so much of late on your accountnay,
by your
means
you can, in mercy, spare me a few short
minutes. Was
this
the reasonthe
only
reason, dearest
girl, why you so pertinaciously refused my hand?
Was it not sufficient, Wycherly? answered Mildred,
afraid the chartered air might hear her secret.
Remember
who
you are, and
what
I am! Could I suffer you to
become the husband of one to whom such cruel, cruel
propositions had been made by her own father!
I shall not affect to conceal my horror of such
principles
,
Mildred, but your virtues shine all the brighter by
having
flourished in their company. Answer me but one
question
frankly, and every other difficult can be gotten over.
Do you love me well enough to be my wife, were you an
orphan?
Mildred's countenance was full of anguish, but this
question
changed its expression entirely. The moment was
extraordinary
as were the feelings it engendered, and, almost
unconsciously to herself, she raised the hand that held her
own to her lips, in a sort of reverence. In the next instant
she was encircled in the young man's arms, and pressed
with fervour to his heart.
Let us gosaid Mildred, extricating herself from an
Vol. II.  18
embrace that was too involuntarily bestowed, and too
heart-felt
to alarm her delicacy. I feel certain Admiral
Bluewater
will miss me!
No, Mildred, we cannot part thus. Give me, at least,
the poor consolation of knowing, that if
this
difficulty did
not existthat if you were an orphan for instanceyou
would be mine.
Oh! Wycherly, how gladlyhow gladly!But, say
no morenay
This time the embrace was longer, more fervent even than
before, and Wycherly was too much of a sailor to let the
sweet girl escape from his arms without imprinting on her
lips a kiss. He had no sooner relinquished his hold of the
slight person of Mildred, ere it vanished. With this
characteristic
leave-taking, we change the scene to the tent of Sir
Gervaise Oakes.
You have seen Admiral Bluewater? demanded the
commander-in-chief
,
as soon as the form of Magrath darkened
the entrance, and speaking with the sudden earnestness of
a man determined to know the worst. If so, tell me at
once what hopes there are for him?
Of all the human passions, Sir Jairvis, answered
Magrath
,
looking aside, to avoid the keen glance of the other,
hope is generally considered, by all rational men, as the
most treacherous and delusive; I may add, of all
denominations
or divisions of hope, that which decides on life is
the most unsairtain. We all hope to live, I 'm thinking, to
a good old age, and yet how many of us live just long
enough to be disappointed!
Sir Gervaise did not move until the surgeon ceased
speaking
;
then he began to pace the tent in mournful silence. He
understood Magrath's manner so well, that the last faint hope
he had felt from seeking his opinion was gone; he now knew
that his friend must die. It required all his fortitude to
stand up against this blow; for, single, childless, and
accustomed
to each other almost from infancy, these two veteran
sailors had got to regard themselves as merely isolated parts
of the same being. Magrath was affected more than he
chose to express, and he blew his nose several times in a way
that an observer would have found suspicious.
Will you confer on me the favour, Dr. Magrath, said
Sir Gervaise, in a gentle, subdued manner, to ask Captain
Greenly to come hither, as you pass the flag-staff.
Most willingly, Sir Jairvis; and I know he 'll be
anything
but backward in complying.
It was not long ere the captain of the Plantagenet made
his appearance. Like all around him, the recent victory
appeared to bring no exultation.
I suppose Magrath told
you
all, said the vice-admiral,
squeezing the other's hand.
He gives no hopes, Sir Gervaise, I sincerely regret to
say.
I knew as much! I knew as much! And yet he is
easy, Greenly!nay, even seems happy, I
did
feel a little
hope that this absence from suffering might be a favourable
omen.
I am glad to hear that much, sir; for I have been
thinking
that it is my duty to speak to the rear-admiral on the
subject of his brother's marriage. From his own silence on
the subject, it is possiblenay, from
all
the circumstances,
it is
probable
he never knew of it, and there may be
reasons
why he ought to be informed of the affair. As you
say he is so easy, would there be an impropriety in
mentioning
it to him?
Greenly could not possibly have made a suggestion that
was a greater favour to Sir Gervaise. The necessity
of doing, his habits of decision, and having an object
in view, contributed to relieve his mind by diverting his
thoughts to some active duty; and he seized his hat,
bekoned
Greenly to follow, and moved across the hill with a
rapid pace, taking the path to the cottage. It was
necessary
to pass the flag-staff. As this was done, every
countenance
met the vice-admiral's glance, with a look of sincere
sympathy. The bows that were exchanged, had more in
them than the naked courtesies of such salutations; they
were eloquent of feeling on both sides.
Bluewater was awake, and retaining the hand of Mildred
affectionately in his own, when his friend entered.
Relinquishing
his hold, however, he grasped the hand of the
vice-admiral
,
and looked earnestly at him, as if he pitied the
sorrow
that he knew the survivor must feel.
My dear Bluewater, commenced Sir Gervaise, who
acted under a nervous excitement, as well as from
constitutional
decision, here is Greenly with something to tell you
that we both think you ought to know, at a moment like
this.
The rear-admiral regarded his friend intently, as if
inviting
him to proceed.
Why, it 's about your brother Jack. I fancy you
cannot
have known that he was ever married, or I think I
should have heard you speak of it.
Married! repeated Bluewater, with great interest, and
speaking with very little difficulty. I think that must be
an error. Inconsiderate and warm-hearted he was, but
there was only one woman he
could
, nay,
would
have
married
.
She is long since dead, but not as
his
wife; for that
her uncle, a man of great wealth, but of unbending will,
would never have suffered.
He
survived her, though my
poor brother did not.
This was said in a mild voice, for the wounded man spoke
equally without effort, and without pain.
You hear, Greenly? observed Sir Gervaise. And
yet it is not probable that you should be mistaken.
Certainly, I am no, gentlemen. I saw Colonel
Bluewater
married, as did another officer who is at this moment
in this very fleet. Captain Blakely is the person I mean,
and I know that the priest who performed the ceremony is
still living, a beneficed clergyman.
This is wonderful to me! He fervently loved Agnes
Hedworth, but his poverty was an obstacle to the union; and
both died so young, that there was little opportunity of
conciliating
the uncle.
That, sir, is your mistake. Agnes Hedworth was the
bride.
A noise in the room interrupted the dialogue, and the
three gentlemen saw Wycherly and Mildred stooping to pick
up the fragments of a bowl that Mrs. Dutton had let fall.
The latter, apparently in alarm, at the little accident, had
sunk back into a seat, pale and trembling.
My dear Mrs. Dutton, take a glass of water, said Sir
Gervaise, kindly approaching her; your nerves have been
sorely tried of late; else would not such a trifle affect you.
It is not
that!
exclaimed the matron, huskily. It is
not
that!
Oh! the fearful moment has come at last; and,
from my inmost spirit I thank thee, my Lord and my God,
that it has come free from shame and disgrace!
The closing words were uttered on bended knees, and
with uplifted hands.
Mother!dearest, dearest mother, cried Mildred,
falling
on her mother's neck. What mean you? What new
misery has happened to-day?
Mother!
Yes, sweet one, thou art, thou ever
shalt
be
my child! This is the pang I have most dreaded; but what
is an unknown tie of blood, to use, and affection, and to a
mother's care? If I did not bear thee, Mildred, no natural
mother could have loved thee more, or would have died for
thee, as willingly!
Distress has disturbed her, gentlemen, said Mildred,
gently extricating herself from her mother's arms, and
helping
her to rise. A few moments of rest will restore her.
No, darling; it must come nowit
ought
to come now
after what I have just heard, it would be unpardonable not
to tell it,
now
. Did I understand you to say, sir, that you
were present at the marriage of Agnes Hedworth, and that,
too, with the brother of Admiral Bluewater?
Of that fact, there can be no question, madam. I and
others will testify to it. The marriage took place in
London
,
in the summer of 1725, while Blakely and myself were
up from Portsmouth, on leave. Colonel Bluewater asked us
both to be present, under a pledge of secresy.
And in the summer of 1726, Agnes Hedworth died in
my house and my arms, an hour after giving birth to this
dear, this precious childMildred Dutton, as she has ever
since been calledMildred Bluewater, as it would seem her
name should be.
It is unnecessary to dwell on the surprise with which all
present, or the delight with which Bluewater and Wycherly
heard this extraordinary announcement. A cry escaped
Mildred, who threw herself on Mrs. Dutton's neck, entwining
it with her arms, convulsively, as if refusing to permit the
tie that had so long bound them together, to be thus rudely
torn asunder. But half an hour of weeping, and of the
tenderest
consolations, calmed the poor girl a little, and she was
able to listen to the explanations. These were exceedingly
18 *
simple, and so clear, as, in connection with the other
evidence
,
to put the facts out of all doubt.
Miss Hedworth had become known to Mrs. Dutton, while
the latter was an inmate of the house of her patron. A year
or two after the marriage of the lieutenant, and while he was
on a distant station, Agnes Hedworth threw herself on the
protection of his wife, asking a refuge for a woman in the
most critical circumstances. Like all who knew Agnes
Hedworth, Mrs. Dutton both respected and loved her; but
the distance created between them, by birth and station, was
such as to prevent any confidence. The former, for the
few days passed with her humble friend, had acted with the
quiet dignity of a woman conscious of no wrong; and no
questions could be asked that implied doubts. A succession of
fainting fits prevented all communications in the hour of death,
and Mrs. Dutton found herself left with a child on her hands,
and the dead body of her friend. Miss Hedworth had
come to her dwelling unattended and under a false name.
These circumstances induced Mrs. Dutton to apprehend the
worst, and she proceeded to make her arrangements with
great tenderness for the reputation of the deceased. The
body was removed to London, and letters were sent to the
uncle to inform him where it was to be found, with a
reference
should he choose to inquire into the circumstances of
his niece's death. Mrs. Dutton ascertained that the body
was interred in the usual manner, but no inquiry was ever
made, concerning the particulars. The young duchess, Miss
Hedworth's sister, was then travelling in Italy, whence she
did not return for more than a year; and we may add,
though Mrs. Dutton was unable to make the explanation,
that her inquiries after the fate of a beloved sister, were met
by a simple statement that she had died suddenly, on a visit
to a watering-place, whither she had gone with a female
friend for her health. Whether Mr. Hedworth himself had
any suspicions of his niece's condition, is uncertain; but the
probabilities were against it, for she had offended him by
refusing a match equal in all respects to that made by her
elder sister, with the single exception that the latter had
married a man she loved, whereas he exacted of Agnes a
very different sacrifice. Owing to the alienation produced
by this affair, there was little communication between the
uncle and niece; the latter passing her time in retirement,
and professedly with friends that the former neither knew
nor cared to know. In short, such was the mode of life of
the respective parties, that nothing was easier than for the
unhappy young widow to conceal her state from her uncle.
The motive was the fortune of the expected child; this uncle
having it in his power to alienate from it, by will, if he saw
fit, certain family property, that might otherwise descend to
the issue of the two sisters, as his co-heiresses. What might
have happened in the end, or what poor Agnes meditated
doing, can never be known; death closing the secret with
his irremovable seal.
Mrs. Dutton was the mother of a girl but three months'
old, at the time this little stranger was left on her hands. A
few weeks later her own child died; and having waited
several
months in vain for tidings from the Hedworth family,
she had the surviving infant christened by the same name
as that borne by her own daughter, and soon came to love
it, as much, perhaps, as if she had borne it. Three years
passed in this manner, when the time drew near for the
return
of her husband from the East Indies. To be ready to
meet him, she changed her abode to a naval port, and, in
so doing, changed her domestics. This left her accidentally,
but fortunately, as she afterwards thought, completely
mistress
of the secret of Mildred's birth; the one or two others
to whom it was known being in stations to render it
improbable
they should ever communicate anything on the
subject
,
unless it were asked of them. Her original intention,
however, was to communicate the facts, without reserve, to
her husband. But he came back an altered man; brutal
in manners, cold in his affections, and the victim of
drunkenness
.
By this time, the wife was too much attached to
the child to think of exposing it to the wayward caprices of
such a being; and Mildred was educated, and grew in
stature and beauty as the real offspring of her reputed
parents
.
All this Mrs. Dutton related clearly and briefly,
refraining
,
of course, from making any allusion to the conduct of
her husband, and referring all her own benevolence to her
attachment to the child. Bluewater had strength enough to
receive Mildred in his arms, and he kissed her pale cheek,
again and again, blessing her in the most fervent and
solemn
manner.
My feelings were not treacherous or unfaithful, he
said; I loved thee, sweetest, from the first. Sir Gervaise
Oakes has my will, made in thy favour, before we sailed on
this last cruise, and every shilling I leave will be thine. Mr.
Atwood, procure that will, and add a codicil explaining this
recent discovery, and confirming the legacy; let not the last
be touched, for it is spontaneous and comes from the heart.
And, now, answered Mrs. Dutton, enough has
passed
for once. The sick-bed should be more quiet. Give me
my child, again:I cannot yet consent to part with her
for ever.
Mother! mother! exclaimed Mildred, throwing
herself
on Mrs. Dutton's bosom  I am yours, and yours
only.
Not so, I fear, Mildred, if all I suspect be true, and this
is as proper a moment as another to place that matter also
before your honoured uncle. Come forward, Sir
Wycherly
I
have understood you to say, this minute, in my ear,
that you hold the pledge of this wilful girl to become your
wife, should she ever be an orphan. An orphan she is, and
has been since the first hour of her birth.
Nononomurmured Mildred, burying her face
still deeper in her mother's bosom, not while
you
live,
can
I be an orphan. Not nowanother timethis is
unseasonable
cruelnay,
it is not what I said.
Take her away, dearest Mrs. Dutton, said Bluewater,
tears of joy forcing themselves from his eyes. Take her
away, lest too much happiness come upon me at once. My
thoughts should be calmer at such a moment.
Wycherly removed Mildred from her mother's arms, and
gently led her from the room. When in Mrs. Dutton's
apartment
,
he whispered something in the ear of the agitated girl
that caused her to turn on him a look of happiness, though
it came dimmed with tears; then
he
had his turn of holding
her, for another precious instant, to his heart.
My dear Mrs. Duttonnay, my dear
mother
, he said,
Mildred and myself have both need of parents. I am an
orphan like herself, and we can never consent to part with
you. Look forward, I entreat you, to making one of our
family in all things, for never can either Mildred or myself
cease to consider you as anything but a parent entitled to
more than common reverence and affection.
Wycherly had hardly uttered this proper speech, when he
received what he fancied a ten-fold reward. Mildred, in a
burst of natural feeling, without affectation or reserve, but
yielding to her heart only, threw her arms around his neck,
murmured the word thanks several times, and wept freely
on his bosom. When Mrs. Dutton received the sobbing girl
from him, Wycherly kissed the mother's cheek, and he left
the room.
Admiral Bluewater would not consent to seek his repose
until he had a private conference with his friend and
Wycherly
.
The latter was frankness and liberality itself, but
the former would not wait for settlements. These he
trusted
to the young man's honour. His own time was short,
and he should die perfectly happy could he leave his niece
in the care of one like our Virginian. He wished the
marriage
to take place in his presence. On this he even
insisted
,
and, of course, Wycherly made no objections, but went
to state the case to Mrs. Dutton and Mildred.
It is singular, Dick, said Sir Gervaise, wiping his eyes,
as he looked from a window that commanded a view of the
sea, that I have left both our flags flying in the Csar!
I declare, the oddness of the circumstance never struck me
till this minute.
Let them float a little longer together, Gervaise. They
have faced many a gale and many a battle together, and may
endure each other's company a few hours longer.
CHAPTER XV.
Compound of weakness and of strength,
Mighty, yet ignorant of thy power!
Loftier than earth, or air, or sea,
Yet meaner than the lowliest flower!
Margaret Davidson
.
Not
a syllable of explanation, reproach or
self-accusation
had passed between the commander-in-chief and the
rear-admiral, since the latter received his wound. Each
party appeared to blot out the events of the last few days,
leaving the long vista of their past services and friendship,
undisfigured by a single unsightly or unpleasant object. Sir
Gervaise, while he retained an active superintendence of his
fleet, and issued the necessary orders right and left,
hovered
around the bed of Bluewater with the assiduity and
almost
with the tenderness of a woman; still not the slightest
allusion was made to the recent battles, or to anything that
had occurred in the short cruise. The speech recorded at
the close of the last chapter, was the first words he had
uttered
which might, in any manner, carry the mind of either
back to events that both might wish forgotten. The
rear-admiral
felt this forbearance deeply, and now that the
subject
was thus accidentally broached between them, he had
a desire to say something in continuation. Still he waited
until the baronet had left the window and taken a seat by
his bed.
Gervaise, Bluewater then commenced, speaking low
from weakness, but speaking distinctly from feeling, I
cannot
die without asking your forgiveness. There were
several hours when I actually meditated treasonI will not
say to my
king;
on that point my opinions are unchanged
but to
you
.
Why speak of this, Dick? You did not know yourself
when you believed it possible to desert me in the face of the
enemy. How much better I judged of your character, is
seen in the fact that I did not hesitate to engage double my
force, well knowing that you could not fail to come to my
rescue.
Bluewater looked intently at his friend, and a smile of
serious satisfaction passed over his pallid countenance as he
listened to Sir Gervaise's words, which were uttered with
his usual warmth and sincerity of manner.
I believe you know me better than I know myself,
truly, he answered, after a thoughtful pause; yes, better
than I know myself. What a glorious close to our
professional
career would it have been, Oakes, had I followed you
into battle, as was our old practice, and fallen in your wake,
imitating your own high example!
It is better as it is, Dickif anything that has so sad a
termination can be wellyes, it is better as it is; you have
fallen at my
side
, as it were. We will think or talk no
more of this.
We have been friends, and close friends too, for a long
period, Gervaise, returned Bluewater, stretching his arm
from the bed, with the long, thin fingers of the hand
extended
to meet the other's grasp; and, yet, I cannot recall an
act of your's which I can justly lay to heart, as unkind, or
untrue.
God forgive me, if you canI hope not, Dick; most
sincerely do I hope not. It would give me great pain to
believe
it.
You
have no cause for self-reproach. In no one act or
thought can you justly accuse yourself with injuring
me
,
I should die much happier could I say the same of myself,
Oakes!
Thought!Dick?Thought! You never meditated
aught against
me
in your whole life. The love you bear
me
, is the true reason why you lie there, at this blessed
moment.
It is grateful to find that I have been understood. I am
deeply indebted to you, Oakes, for declining to signal me
and my division down, when I foolishly requested that
untimely
forbearance. I was then suffering an anguish of
mind, to which any pain of the body I may now endure, is
an elysium; your self-denial gave time
For the
heart
to prompt you to that which your
feelings
yearned to do from the first, Bluewater, interrupted
Sir Gervaise. And, now, as your commanding officer, I
enjoin silence on this subject,
for ever
.
I will endeavour to obey. It will not be long, Oakes,
that I shall remain under your orders, added the
rear-admiral
,
with a painful smile. There should be no charge
of mutiny against me, in the
last
act of my life. You
ought to forgive the one sin of omission, when you
remember
how much and how completely my will has been
subject
to yours, during the last five-and-thirty years,how
little my mind has matured a professional thought that yours
has not originated!
Speak no more of `forgive,' I charge you, Dick. That
you have shown a girl-like docility in obeying all my orders,
too, is a truth I will aver before God and man; but when it
comes to
mind
, I am far from asserting that mine has had
the mastery. I do believe, could the truth be ascertained,
it would be found that I am, at this blessed moment,
enjoying
a professional reputation, which is more than half due
to you.
It matters little, now, Gervaiseit matters little, now.
We were two light-hearted and gay lads, Oakes, when we
first met as boys, fresh from school, and merry as health
and spirits could make us.
We were, indeed, Dick!yes, we were; thoughtless as
if this sad moment were never to arrive!
There were George Anson, and Peter Warren, little
Charley Saunders, Jack Byng, and a set of us, that did,
indeed, live as if we were never to die! And yet we
carried
our lives, as it might be, in our hands, Oakes!
There is much of that, Dick, in boyhood and youth.
But, he is happiest, after all, who can meet this moment as
you do  calmly, and yet without any dependence on his
own merits.
I had an excellent mother, Oakes! Little do we think,
in youth, how much we owe to the unextinguishable
tenderness
,
and far-seeing lessons of our mothers! Ours both
died while we were young, and yet I do think we were
their debtors for far more than we could ever repay.
Sir Gervaise simply assented, but making no immediate
answer, otherwise, a long pause succeeded, during which
the vice-admiral fancied that his friend was beginning to
doze. He was mistaken.
You will be made Viscount Bowldero, for these last
affairs, Gervaise, the wounded man unexpectedly observed,
showing how much his thoughts were still engrossed with
the interests of his friend. Nor do I see why you should
again refuse a peerage. Those who remain in this world,
may well yield to its usages and opinions, while they do not
interfere with higher obligations.
I!exclaimed Sir Gervaise, gloomily. The thought
of so commemorating what has happened, would be worse
than defeat to me! No  I ask no change of name to
remind
me constantly of my loss!
Bluewater looked grateful, rather than pleased; but he
made no answer. Now, he fell into a light slumber, from
which he did not awake until the time he had himself set for
the marriage of Wycherly and Mildred. With one uncle
dead and still unburied, and another about to quit the world
for ever, a rite that is usually deemed as joyous as it is
solemn, might seem unseasonable; but the dying man had
made it a request that he might have the consolation of
knowing ere he expired, that he left his niece under the legal
protection of one as competent, as he was desirous of
protecting
her. The reader must imagine the arguments that
were used for the occasion, but they were such as disposed
all, in the end, to admit the propriety of yielding their
ordinary
prejudices to the exigencies of the moment. It may
be well to add, also, to prevent useless and unprofitable
cavilling, that the laws of England were not as rigid on the
subject of the celebration of marriages in 1745, as they
subsequently
became; and that it was lawful then to perform
the ceremony in a private house without a license, and
without
the publishing of banns, even; restrictions that were
imposed a few years later. The penalty for dispensing with
the publication of banns, was a fine of 100, imposed on
the clergyman; and this fine Bluewater chose to pay, rather
than leave the only great object of life that now remained
before him unaccomplished. This penalty in no degree
impaired the validity of the contract, though Mrs. Dutton,
as a woman, felt averse to parting with her beloved, without
a rigid observance of all the customary forms. The point
Vol. II.  19
had finally been disposed of, by recourse to arguments
addressed
to the reason of this respectable woman, and by
urging the necessity of the case. Her consent, however,
was not given without a proviso, that a license should be
subsequently procured, and a second marriage be had at a
more fitting moment, should the ecclesiastical authorities
consent to the same; a most improbable thing in itself.
Mr. Rotherham availed himself of the statute inflicting
the penalty, as an excuse for not officiating. His real
motive
,
however, was understood, and the chaplain of the
Plantagenet
,
a divine of character and piety, was substituted in
his place. Bluewater had requested that as many of the
captains of the fleet should be present as could be collected,
and it was the assembling of these warriors of the deep,
together with the arrival of the clergyman, that first gave
notice of the approach of the appointed hour.
It is not our intention to dwell on the details of a
ceremony
that had so much that was painful in its solemnities.
Neither Wycherly nor Mildred made any change in their
attire, and the lovely bride wept from the time the service
began, to the moment when she left the arms of her uncle,
to be received in those of her husband, and was supported
from the room. All seemed sad, indeed, but Bluewater; to
him the scene was exciting, but it brought great relief to his
mind.
I am now ready to die, gentlemen, he said, as the door
closed on the new-married couple. My last worldly care is
disposed of, and it were better for me to turn all my thoughts
to another state of being. My niece, Lady Wychecombe,
will inherit the little I have to leave; nor do I know that it
is of much importance to substantiate her birth, as her uncle
clearly bestowed what would have been her mother's
property
,
on her aunt, the duchess. If my dying declaration
can be of any use, however, you hear it, and can testify to
it. Now, come and take leave of me, one by one, that I
may bless you all, and thank you for much undeserved, and,
I fear, unrequited love.
The scene that followed was solemn and sad. One by
one, the captains drew near the bed, and to each the dying
man had something kind and affectionate to say. Even the
most cold-hearted looked grave, and O'Neil, a man
remarkable
for a
gait de cur
that rendered the excitement of
battle some of the pleasantest moments of his life, literally
shed tears on the hand he kissed.
Ah! my old friend, said the rear-admiral, as Parker,
of the Carnatic, drew near in his customary meek and
subdued
manner, you perceive it is not years alone that bring
us to our graves! They tell me you have behaved as usual
in these late affairs; I trust that, after a long life of patient
and arduous services, you are about to receive a proper
reward.
I will acknowledge, Admiral Bluewater, returned
Parker
,
earnestly, that it would be peculiarly grateful to
receive some mark of the approbation of my sovereign;
principally on account of my dear wife and children. We
are not, like yourself, descended from a noble family; but
must carve our rights to distinction, and they who have
never known honours of this nature, prize them highly.
Ay, my good Parker, interrupted the rear-admiral,
and they who have ever known them, get to know their
emptiness; most especially as they approach that verge of
existence, whence the eye looks in a near and fearful glance,
over the vast and unknown range of eternity.
No doubt, sir; nor am I so vain as to suppose that hairs
which have got to be grey as mine, can last for ever. But,
what I was about to say is, that precious as honours are to
the humble, I would cheerfully yield every hope of the sort
I have, to see you on the poop of the Csar again, with Mr.
Cornet at your elbow, leading the fleet, or following the
motions of the vice-admiral.
Thank you, my good Parker; that can never be; nor can
I say, now, that I wish it might. When we have cast off
from the world, there is less pleasure in looking back, than
in looking ahead. God bless you, Parker, and keep you,
as you ever have been, an honest man.
Stowel was the last to approach the bed, nor did he do it
until all had left the room but Sir Gervaise and himself.
The indomitable good-nature, and the professional
nonchalance
of Bluewater, by leaving every subordinate
undisturbed
in the enjoyment of his own personal caprices, had
rendered the rear-admiral a greater favourite, in one sense
at least, than the commander-in-chief. Stowel, by his near
connexion with Bluewater, had profited more by these
peculiarities
than any other officer under him, and the effect
on his feelings had been in a very just proportion to the
benefits. He could not refrain, it is true, from remembering
the day when he himself had been a lieutenant in the ship
in which the rear-admiral had been a midshipman, but he no
longer recollected the circumstance with the bitterness that
it sometimes drew after it. On the contrary, it was now
brought to his mind merely as the most distant of the many
land-marks in their long and joint services.
Well, Stowel, observed Bluewater, smiling sadly, even
the old Csar must be left behind, in taking leave of life.
It is seldom a flag-captain has not some heart-burnings on
account of his superior, and most sincerely do I beg you to
forget and forgive any I may have occasioned yourself.
Heaven help me, sir!I was far, just then, from thinking
of any such thing! I was fancying how little I should have
thought it probable, when we were together in the Calypso,
that I should ever be thus standing at
your
bedside. Really,
Admiral Bluewater, I would rejoice to share with you the
remnant of life that is left me.
I do believe you would, Stowel; but that can never be.
I have just performed my last act in this world, in giving
my niece to Sir Wycherly Wychecombe.
Yes, sir;yes, sirmarriage is no doubt honourable,
as I often tell Mrs. Stowel, and therefore not to be despised;
and yet it
is
singular, that a gentleman who has lived a
bachelor himself, should fancy to see a marriage ceremony
performed, and that, too, at the cost of 100, if any person
choose to complain, just at the close of his own cruise!
However, men are no more alike in such matters, than
women in their domestic qualities; and I sincerely hope this
young Sir Wycherly may find as much comfort, in the old
house I understand he has a little inland here, as you and
I have had, together, sir, in the old Csar. I suppose
there 'll be no co-equals in Wychecombe Hall.
I trust not, Stowel. But you must now receive my last
orders, as to the Csar
The commander-in-chief has his own flag flying aboard
of us, sir! interrupted the methodical captain, in a sort of
admonitory way.
Never mind that, Stowel;I 'll answer for his
acquiescence
.
My body must be received on board, and carried
round in the ship to Plymouth. Place it on the main-deck,
where the people can see the coffin; I would pass my last
hours above ground, in their midst.
It shall be done, siryes, sir, to the letter, Sir Gervaise
not countermanding. And I 'll write this evening to Mrs.
Stowel to say she needn't come down, as usual, as soon as
she hears the ship is in, but that she must wait until your
flag is fairly struck.
I should be sorry, Stowel, to cause a moment's delay in
the meeting of husband and wife!
Don't name it, Admiral Bluewater;Mrs. Stowel will
understand that it 's duty; and when we married, I fully
explained
to her that duty, with a sailor, came before
matrimony
.
A little pause succeeded, and then Bluewater took a final
and affectionate leave of his captain. Some twenty minutes
elapsed in a profound silence, during which Sir Gervaise
did not stir, fancying that his friend again dozed. But it
was ordered that Bluewater was never to sleep again, until
he took the final rest of the dead. It was the mind, which
had always blazed above the duller lethargy of his body,
that buoyed him thus up, giving an unnatural impulse to
his physical powers; an impulse, however, that was but
momentary, and which, by means of the reaction,
contributed
,
in the end, to his more speedy dissolution.
Perceiving
,
at length, that his friend did not sleep, Sir Gervaise
drew near his bed.
Richard, he said, gently, there is one without, who
pines to be admitted. I have refused even his tears, under
the impression that you felt disposed to sleep.
Never less so. My mind appears to become brighter
and clearer, instead of fading; I think I shall never sleep,
in the sense you mean. Whoever the person is, let him be
admitted.
Receiving this permission, Sir Gervaise opened the door,
and Geoffrey Cleveland entered. At the same moment,
Galleygo
,
who came and went at pleasure, thrust in his own
ungainly form. The boy's face betrayed the nature and the
extent of his grief. In his mind, Admiral Bluewater was
19 *
associated with all the events of his own professional life;
and, though the period had in truth been so short, in his
brief existence, the vista through which he looked back,
seemed quite as long as that which marked the friendship
of the two admirals, themselves. Although he struggled
manfully for self-control, feeling got the better of the lad, and
he threw himself on his knees, at the side of the bed, sobbing
as if his heart would break. Bluewater's eye glistened, and
he laid a hand affectionately on the head of his young
relative
.
Gervaise, you will take charge of this boy, when I 'm
gone, he said; and receive him in your own ship. I
leave him to you, as a very near and dear professional
legacy. Cheer upcheer upmy brave boy; look upon
all this as a sailor's fortune. Our lives are the
The word king's, which should have succeeded, seemed
to choke the speaker. Casting a glance of meaning at his
friend, with a painful smile on his face, he continued silent.
Ah! dear sir, answered the midshipman, ingenuously;
I knew that
we
might all be killed, but it never occurred
to me that an admiral could lose his life in battle. I 'm sure
I 'm sure you are the very first that has met with this
accident!
Not by many, my poor Geoffrey. As there are but
few admirals, few fall; but we are as much exposed as
others.
If I had only run that Monsieur des Prez through the
body, when we closed with him, returned the boy, grating
his teeth, and looking all the vengeance for which, at the
passing instant, he felt the desire; it would have been
something!
I might have done it, too, for he was quite
unguarded!
It would have been a very bad
thing
, boy, to have
injured a brave man, uselessly.
Of what use was it to shoot you, sir? We took their
ship, just the same as if you had not been hurt.
I rather think, Geoffrey, their ship was virtually taken
before I was wounded, returned Bluewater, smiling. But
I was shot by a French marine, who did no more than his
duty.
Yes, sir, exclaimed the boy, impatiently; and
he
escaped without a scratch.
He
, at least, ought to have been
massacred
.
Thou art bloody-minded, child; I scarce know thee.
Massacred
is not a word for either a British nobleman or a
British sailor. I saved the life of that marine; and, when
you come to lie, like me, on your death-bed, Geoffrey, you
will learn how sweet a consolation can be derived from the
consciousness of such an act; we all need mercy, and none
ought to expect it, for themselves, who do not yield it to
others.
The boy was rebuked, and his feelings took a better, though
scarcely a more natural direction. Bluewater now spoke to
him of his newly-discovered cousin, and had a melancholy
satisfaction in creating an interest in behalf of Mildred, in
the breast of the noble-hearted and ingenuous boy. The
latter listened with respectful attention, as had been his wont,
until, deceived by the tranquil and benevolent manner of
Bluewater, he permitted himself to fall into the natural
delusion
of believing the wound of the rear-admiral less serious
than he had supposed, and to begin to entertain hopes that
the wounded man might yet survive. Calmed by these
feelings
,
he soon ceased to weep; and, promising discretion,
was permitted by Sir Gervaise to remain in the room, where
he busied himself in the offices of a nurse.
Another long pause succeeded this exciting little scene,
during which Bluewater lay quietly communing with
himself
and his God. Sir Gervaise wrote orders, and read
reports, though his eye was never off the countenance of his
friend more than a minute or two at a time. At length, the
rear-admiral aroused himself, again, and began to take an
interest once more, in the persons and things around him.
Galleygo, my old fellow-cruiser, he said, I leave Sir
Gervaise more particularly in your care. As we advance
in life, our friends decrease in numbers; it is only those
that have been well tried that we can rely on.
Yes, Admiral Blue, I knows that, and so does Sir Jarvy.
Yes, old shipmates before young 'uns, any day, and old
sailors, too, before green hands. Sir Jarvy's Bowlderos are
good plate-holders, and the likes of that; but when it comes
to heavy weather, and a hard strain, I think but little on
'em all put together.
By the way, Oakes, said Bluewater, with a sudden
interest
in such a subject, that he never expected to feel again,
I have heard nothing of the first day's work, in which,
through the little I have gleaned by listening to those around
me, I understand you took a two-decker, besides dismasting
the French admiral?
Pardon me, Dick; you had better try and catch a little
sleep; the subject of those two days' work is really painful
to me.
Well, then, Sir Jarvy, if you has an avarsion to telling
the story to Admiral Blue, I can do it, your honour, put in
Galleygo, who gloried in giving a graphic description of a
sea-fight. I thinks, now, a history of that day will
comfort
a flag-hofficer as has been so badly wounded himself.
Bluewater offering no opposition, Galleygo proceeded
with his account of the evolutions of the ships, as we have
already described them, succeeding surprisingly well in
rendering
the narrative interesting, and making himself perfectly
intelligible and clear, by his thorough knowledge, and ready
use, of the necessary nautical terms. When he came to
the moment in which the English line separated, part
passing
to windward, and part to leeward of the two French
ships, he related the incident in so clear and spirited a
manner
,
that the commander-in-chief himself dropped his pen,
and sate listening with pleasure.
Who could imagine, Dick, Sir Gervaise observed,
that those fellows in the tops watch us so closely, and
could give so accurate an account of what passes!
Ah! Gervaise, and what is the vigilance of Galleygo to
that of the All-seeing eye! It is a terrible thought, at an
hour like this, to remember that nothing can be forgotten.
I have somewhere read that not an oath is uttered that does
not continue to vibrate through all time, in the
wide-spreading
currents of soundnot a prayer lisped, that its record
is not also to be found stamped on the laws of nature, by the
indelible seal of the Almighty's will!
There was little in common between the religious
impressions
of the two friends. They were both sailors, and
though the word does not necessarily imply that they were
sinners in an unusual degree, neither does it rigidly imply
that they were saints. Each had received the usual
elementary
education, and then each had been turned adrift,
as it might be, on the ocean of life, to suffer the seed to take
root, and the fruit to ripen as best they might. Few of
those who go down to the great deep in ships, and who
escape the more brutalizing effects of lives so rude, are
altogether
without religious impressions. Living so much,
as it were, in the immediate presence of the power of God,
the sailor is much disposed to reverence his omnipotence,
even while he transgresses his laws; but in nearly all those
instances in which nature has implanted a temperament
inclining
to deep feelings, as was the case with Bluewater,
not even the harsh examples, nor the loose or irresponsible
lives of men thus separated from the customary ties of
society
,
can wholly extinguish the reverence for God which is
created by constantly dwelling in the presence of his earthly
magnificence. This sentiment in Bluewater had not been
altogether without fruits, for he both read and reflected
much. Sometimes, though at isolated and distant intervals,
he even prayed; and that fervently, and with a strong and
full sense of his own demerits. As a consequence of this
general disposition, and of the passing convictions, his mind
was better attuned for the crisis before him, than would have
been the case with most of his brethren in arms, who, when
overtaken with the fate so common to the profession, are
usually left to sustain their last moments with the lingering
enthusiasm of strife and victory.
On the other hand, Sir Gervaise was as simple as a child
in matters of this sort. He had a reverence for his Creator,
and such general notions of his goodness and love, as the
well-disposed are apt to feel; but all the dogmas concerning
the lost condition of the human race, the mediation, and the
power of faith, floated in his mind as opinions not to be
controverted
,
and yet as scarcely to be felt. In short, the
commander-in-chief
admitted the practical heresy, which
overshadows
the faith of millions, while he deemed himself to be
a stout advocate of church and king. Still, Sir Gervaise
Oakes, on occasions, was more than usually disposed to
seriousness, and was even inclined to be devout; but it was
without much regard to theories or revelation. At such
moments, while his opinions would not properly admit him
within the pale of any Christian church, in particular, his
feelings might have identified him with all. In a word, we
apprehend he was a tolerably fair example of what vague
generalities, when acting on a temperament not indisposed
to moral impressions, render the great majority of men; who
flit around the mysteries of a future state, without alighting
either on the consolations of faith, or discovering any of
those logical conclusions which, half the time unconsciously
to themselves, they seem to expect. When Bluewater made
his last remark, therefore, the vice-admiral looked anxiously
at his friend; and religion for the first time since the other
received his hurt, mingled with his reflections. He had
devoutly
,
though mentally, returned thanks to God for his
victory, but it had never occurred to him that Bluewater
might need some preparation for death.
Would you like to see the Plantagenet's chaplain, again,
Dick? he said, tenderly; you are no
Papist;
of
that
I
am certain.
In that you are quite right, Gervaise. I consider all
churches
the
one holy
Catholic
church, if you will, as but
a means furnished by divine benevolence to aid weak men
in their pilgrimage; but I also believe that there is even a
shorter way to his forgiveness than through these common
avenues. How far I am right, he added, smiling, none
will probably know better than myself, a few hours hence.
Friends
must
meet again, hereafter, Bluewater; it is
irrational to suppose that they who have loved each other
so well in this state of being, are to be for ever separated in
the other.
We will hope so, Oakes, taking the vice-admiral's
hand; we will hope so. Still, there will be no ships for
usno cruisesno victoriesno triumphs! It is only at
moments like this, at which I have arrived, that we come to
view these things in their proper light. Of all the past,
your constant, unwavering friendship, gives me the most
pleasure!
The vice-admiral could resist no longer. He turned aside
and wept. This tribute to nature, in one so manly, was
imposing even to the dying man, and Galleygo regarded it
with awe. Familiar as the latter had become with his
master
,
by use and indulgence, no living being, in his
estimation
,
was as authoritative or as formidable as the
commander-in-chief
;
and the effect of the present spectacle,
was to induce him to hide his own face in self-abasement.
Bluewater saw it all, but he neither spoke, nor gave any
token of his observation. He merely prayed, and that right
fervently, not only for his friend, but for his humble and
uncouth follower.
A reaction took place in the system of the wounded man,
about nine o'clock that night. At this time he believed
himself near his end, and he sent for Wycherly and his
niece, to take his leave of them. Mrs. Dutton was also
present
,
as was Magrath, who remained on shore, in
attendance
.
Mildred lay for half an hour, bathing her uncle's
pillow with her tears, until she was removed at the
surgeon's
suggestion.
Ye'll see, Sir Gervaise, he whispered  (or Sir
Jairvis
,
as he always pronounced the name,)ye'll see, Sir
Jairvis, that it's a duty of the faculty to
prolong
life, even
when there's no hope of
saving
it; and if ye'll be
regairding
the judgment of a professional man, Lady Wychecombe
had better withdraw. It would really be a matter of honest
exultation for us Plantagenets to get the rear-admiral through
the night, seeing that the surgeon of the Csar said he could
no survive the setting sun.
At the moment of final separation, Bluewater had little
to say to his niece. He kissed and blessed her again and
again, and then signed that she should be taken away. Mrs.
Dutton, also, came in for a full share of his notice, he
having
desired her to remain after Wycherly and Mildred had
quitted the room.
To your care and affection, excellent woman, he said,
in a voice that had now sunk nearly to a whisperwe
owe it, that Mildred is not unfit for her station. Her
recovery
would have been even more painful than her loss, had
she been restored to her proper family, uneducated, vulgar,
and coarse.
That could hardly have happened to Mildred, sir, in any
circumstances, answered the weeping woman. Nature
has done too much for the dear child, to render her
anything
but delicate and lovely, under any tolerable
circumstances
of depression.
She is better as she is, and God be thanked that he
raised
up such a protector for her childhood. You have been
all in all to her in her infancy, and she will strive to repay
it to your age.
Of this Mrs. Dutton felt too confident to need assurances;
and receiving the dying man's blessing, she knelt at his
bedside
,
prayed fervently for a few minutes, and withdrew.
After
this, nothing out of the ordinary track occurred until
past midnight, and Magrath, more than once, whispered his
joyful anticipations that the rear-admiral would survive
until
morning. An hour before day, however, the wounded
man revived, in a way that the surgeon distrusted. He
knew that no physical change of this sort could well
happen
that did not arise from the momentary ascendency of
mind over matter, as the first is on the point of finally
abandoning
its earthly tenement; a circumstance of no unusual
occurrence in patients of strong and active intellectual
properties
,
whose faculties often brighten for an instant, in their
last moments, as the lamp flashes and glares as it is about
to become extinct. Going to the bed, the examined his
patient
attentively, and was satisfied that the final moment
was near.
You're a man and a soldier, Sir Jairvis, he said, in
a low voice, and it'll no be doing good to attempt
misleading
your judgment in a case of this sort. Our respectable
friend, the rear-admiral, is
articulo mortis
, as one might
almost say; he cannot possibly survive half an hour.
Sir Gervaise started. He looked around him a little
wistfully
;
for, at that moment, he would have given much to be
alone with his dying friend. But he hesitated to make a
request
which, it struck him, might seem improper. From this
embarrassment, however, he was relieved by Bluewater
himself
,
who had the same desire, without the same scruples
about confessing it.
He
drew the surgeon to his side, and
whispered a wish to be left alone with the
commander-in-chief
.
Well, there will be no trespass on the rules of practice
in indulging the poor man in his desire, muttered Magrath,
as he looked about him to gather the last of his professional
instruments, like the workman who is about to quit one
place of toil to repair to another; and I'll just be
indulging
him.
So saying, he pushed Galleygo and Geoffrey from the
room before him, left it himself, and closed the door.
Finding himself alone, Sir Gervaise knelt at the side of
the bed and prayed, holding the hand of his friend in both
his own. The example of Mrs. Dutton, and the yearnings
of his own heart, exacted this sacrifice; when it was over
he felt a great relief from sensations that had nearly choked
him.
Do you forgive me, Gervaise? whispered Bluewater.
Name it notname it not, my best friend. We all
have our moments of weakness, and our need of pardon.
May God forget all
my
sins, as freely as I forget your
errors
!
God bless you, Oakes, and keep you the same
simple-minded
,
true-hearted man, you have ever been.
Sir Gervaise buried his face in the bed-clothes, and
groaned.
Kiss me, Oakes, murmured the rear-admiral.
In order to do this, the commander-in-chief rose from his
knees and bent over the body of his friend. As he raised
himself from the cheek he had saluted, a benignant smile
gleamed on the face of the dying man, and he ceased to
breathe. Near half a minute followed, however, before the
last and most significant breath that is ever drawn from
man, was given. The remainder of that night Sir
Gervaise
Oakes passed in the chamber alone, pacing the floor,
recalling the many scenes of pleasure, danger, pain, and
triumph through which he and the dead had passed in
company
.
With the return of light, he summoned the
attendants
,
and retired to his tent.
Vol. II.  20
CHAPTER XVI.
And they came for the buried king that lay
At rest in that ancient fane;
For he must be armed on the battle day,
With them to deliver Spain!
Then the march went sounding on,
And the Moors, by noontide sun,
Were dust on Tolosa's plain.
Mrs. Hemans
.
It
remains only to give a rapid sketch of the fortunes of
our principal characters, and of the few incidents that are
more immediately connected with what has gone before.
The death of Bluewater was announced to the fleet at
sunrise
,
by hauling down his flag from the mizzen of the Csar.
The vice-admiral's flag came down with it, and re-appeared
at the next minute at the fore of the Plantagenet. But the
little white emblem of rank never went aloft again in honour
of the deceased. At noon, it was spread over his coffin, on
the main-deck of the ship, agreeably to his own request;
and more than once that day, did some rough old tar use
it, to wipe the tear from his eyes.
In the afternoon of the day after the death of one of our
heroes, the wind came round to the westward, and all the
vessels lifted their anchors, and proceeded to Plymouth.
The crippled ships, by this time, were in a state to carry
more or less sail, and a stranger who had seen the
melancholy-looking
line, as it rounded the Start, would have
fancied
it a beaten fleet on its return to port. The only signs
of exultation that appeared, were the jacks that were flying
over the white flags of the prizes; and even when all had
anchored, the same air of sadness reigned among these
victorious
mariners. The body was landed, with the usual
forms; but the procession of warriors of the deep that
followed
it, was distinguished by a gravity that far exceeded
the ordinary aspects of mere form. Many of the captains,
and Greenly in particular, had viewed the manuvring of
Bluewater with surprise, and the latter not altogether
without
displeasure; but his subsequent conduct had completely
erased these impressions, leaving no other recollection
connected
with his conduct that morning than the brilliant
courage, and admirable handling of his vessels, by which
the fortunes of a nearly desperate day had been retrieved.
Those who did reflect any longer on the subject, attributed
the singularity of the course pursued by the rear-admiral, to
some private orders communicated in the telegraphic signal,
as already mentioned.
It is unnecessary for us to dwell on the particular
movements
of the fleet, after it reached Plymouth. The ships
were repaired, the prizes received into the service, and, in
due time, all took the sea again, ready and anxious to
encounter their country's enemies. They ran the careers
usual to English heavy cruisers in that age; and as ships
form our principal characters in this work, perhaps it may
not be amiss to take a general glance at their several
fortunes
,
together with those of their respective commanders.
Sir Gervaise fairly wore out the Plantagenet, which vessel
was broken up three years later, though not until she had
carried a blue flag at her main, more than two years.
Greenly lived to be a rear-admiral of the red, and died of
yellow-fever in the Island of Barbadoes. The Csar, with
Stowel still in command of her, foundered at sea in a
winter's
cruise in the Baltic, every soul perishing. This
calamity
occurred the winter succeeding the summer of our
legend, and the only relieving circumstance connected with
the disaster, was the fact that her commander got rid of
Mrs. Stowel altogether, from that day forward. The
Thunderer
had her share in many a subsequent battle, and Foley,
her captain, died rear-admiral of England, and a
vice-admiral
of the red, thirty years later. The Carnatic was
commanded
by Parker, until the latter got a right to hoist a
blue flag at the mizzen; which was done for just one day,
to comply with form, and then both ship and admiral were
laid aside, as too old for further use. It should be added,
however, that Parker was knighted by the king on board
his own ship; a circumstance that cast a halo of sunshine
over the close of the life of one, who had commenced his
career so humbly, as to render this happy close more than
equal to his expectations. In direct opposition to this, it
may be said here, that Sir Gervaise refused, for the third
time, to be made Viscount Bowldero, with a feeling just the
reverse of that of Parker's; for, secure of his social position,
and careless of politics, he viewed the elevation with an
indifference that was a natural consequence enough of his
own birth, fortune, and high character. On this occasion,
it was after another victory,  George II. personally
alluded to the subject, remarking that the success we have
recorded had never met with its reward; when the old
seaman
let out the true secret of his pertinaciously declining
an honour, about which he might otherwise have been
supposed
to be as indifferent to the acceptance, as to the refusal.
Sir, he answered to the remark of the king, I am duly
sensible of your majesty's favour; but, I can never consent to
receive a patent of nobility that, in my eyes, will always
seem to be sealed with the blood of my closest and best
friend. This reply was remembered, and the subject was
never adverted to again.
The fate of the Blenheim was one of those impressive
blanks that dot the pages of nautical history. She sailed for
the Mediterranean alone, and after she had discharged her
pilot, was never heard of again. This did not occur,
however
,
until Captain Sterling had been killed on her decks, in
one of Sir Gervaise's subsequent actions. The Achilles was
suffered to drift in, too near to some heavy French batteries,
before the treaty of Aix-la-Chappelle was signed; and, after
every stick had been again cut out of her, she was compelled
to lower her flag. His earldom and his courage, saved Lord
Morganic from censure; but, being permitted to go up to
Paris, previously to his exchange, he contracted a
matrimonial
engagement with a celebrated
danseuse
, a craft that gave
him so much future employment, that he virtually abandoned
his profession. Nevertheless, his name was on the list of
vice-admirals of the blue, when he departed this life. The
Warspite and Captain Goodfellow both died natural deaths;
one as a receiving-ship, and the other as a rear-admiral of
the white. The Dover, Captain Drinkwater, was lost in
attempting to weather Scilly in a gale, when her commander,
and quite half her crew, were drowned. The York did
many a hard day's duty, before her time arrived; but, in
the end, she was so much injured in a general action as to
be abandoned and set fire to, at sea. Her commander
was lost overboard, in the very first cruise she took,
after that related in this work. The Elizabeth rotted as a
guard-ship, in the Medway; and Captain Blakely retired
from the service with one arm, a yellow admiral. The
Dublin laid her bones in the cove of Cork, having been
condemned
after a severe winter passed on the north coast.
Captain O'Neil was killed in a duel with a French officer,
after the peace; the latter having stated that his ship had
run away from two frigates commanded by the
Chevalier
.
The Chloe was taken by an enemy's fleet, in the next war;
but Captain Denham worked his way up to a white flag at
the main, and a peerage. The Druid was wrecked that
very summer, chasing inshore, near Bordeaux; and Blewet,
in a professional point of view, never regained the ground
he lost, on this occasion. As for the sloops and cutters, they
went the way of all small cruisers, while their nameless
commanders shared the usual fates of mariners.
Wycherly remained at Wychecombe until the interment
of his uncle took place; at which, aided by Sir Reginald's
influence and knowledge, and, in spite of Tom's intrigues,
he appeared as chief mourner. The affair of the succession
was also so managed as to give him very little trouble.
Tom, discovering that his own illegitimacy was known, and
seeing the hopelessness of a contest against such an
antagonist
as Sir Reginald, who knew quite as much of the facts
as he did of the law of the case, was fain to retire from the
field. From that moment, no one heard anything more of
the legacies. In the end he received the 20,000, in the
five per cents. and the few chattels Sir Wycherly had a right
to give away; but his enjoyment of them was short, as he
contracted a severe cold that very autumn, and died of a
malignant fever, in a few weeks. Leaving no will, his
property
escheated; but it was all restored to his two uterine
brothers, by the liberality of the ministry, and out of respect
to the long services of the baron, which two brothers, it will
be remembered, alone had any of the blood of Wychecombe
in their veins to boast of. This was disposing of the savings
of both the baronet and the judge, with a very suitable
regard to moral justice.
Wycherly also appeared, though it was in company with
20*
Sir Gervaise Oakes, as one of the principal mourners at the
funeral obsequies of Admiral Bluewater. These were of a
public character, and took place in Westminster Abbey.
The carriages of that portion of the royal personages who
were not restrained by the laws of court-entiquette, appeared
in the procession; and several members of that very family
that the deceased regarded as intruders, were present incog.
at his last rites. This, however, was but one of the many
illusions that the great masquerade of life is constantly
offering
to the public gaze.
There was little difficulty in establishing the claims of
Mildred, to be considered the daughter of Colonel Bluewater
and Agnes Hedworth. Lord Bluewater was soon satisfied;
and, as he was quite indifferent to the possession of his
kinsman's
money, an acquisition he neither wished nor expected,
the most perfect good-will existed between the parties.
There was more difficulty with the Duchess of Glamorgan,
who had acquired too many of the notions of very high
rank, to look with complacency on a niece that had been
educated as the daughter of a sailing-master in the navy.
She raised many objections, while she admitted that she
had been the confidant of her sister's attachment to John
Bluewater. Her second son, Geoffrey, did more to remove
her scruples than all the rest united; and when Sir Gervaise
Oakes, in person, condescended to make a journey to the
Park, to persuade her to examine the proofs, she could not
well decline. As soon as one of her really candid mind
entered into the inquiry, the evidence was found to be
irresistible
,
and she at once yielded to the feelings of nature.
Wycherly had been indefatigable in establishing his wife's
claimsmore so, indeed, than in establishing his own; and,
at the suggestion of the vice-admiral  or, admiral of the
white, as he had become by a recent general promotion
he consented to accompany the latter in this visit,
waiting
at the nearest town, however, for a summons to the
Park, as soon as it could be ascertained that his presence
would be agreeable to its mistress.
If my niece prove but half as acceptable in appearance,
as my
nephew
, Sir Gervaise, observed the duchess, when
the young Virginian was introduced to her, and laying stress
on the word we have italicisednothing can be wanting
to the agreeables of this new connection. I am impatient,
now, to see my niece; Sir Wycherly Wychecombe has
prepared
me to expect a young woman of more than common
merit.
My life on it, duchess, he has not raised your
expectations
too high. The poor girl is still dwelling in her
cottage
,
the companion of her reputed mother; but it is time,
Wychecombe, that you had claimed your bride.
I expect to find her and Mrs. Dutton at the Hall, on my
return, Sir Gervaise; it having been thus arranged between
us. The sad ceremonies through which we have lately
been, were unsuited to the introduction of the new mistress
to her abode, and the last had been deferred to a more fitting
occasion.
Let the first visit that Lady Wychecombe pays, be to
this place, said the duchess. I do not command it, Sir
Wycherly, as one who has some slight claims to her duty;
but I solicit it, as one who wishes to possess every hold upon
her love. Her mother was an
only
sister; and an
only
sister's child must be very near to one.
It would have been impossible for the Duchess of
Glamorgan
to have said as much as this before she saw the
young Virginian; but, now he had turned out a person so
very different from what she expected, she had lively hopes
in behalf of her niece.
Wycherly returned to Wychecombe, after this short visit
to Mildred's aunt, and found his lovely bride in quiet
possession
,
accompanied by her mother. Dutton still remained
at the station, for he had the sagacity to see that he might
not be welcome, and modesty enough to act with a cautious
reserve. But Wycherly respected his excellent wife too
profoundly not to have a due regard to her feelings, in all
things; and the master was invited to join the party.
Brutality
and meanness united, like those which belonged to the
character of Dutton, are not easily abashed, and he
accepted
the invitation, in the hope that, after all, he was to reap
as many advantages by the marriage of Mildred with the
affluent baronet, as if she had actually been his daughter.
After passing a few weeks in sober happiness at home,
Wycherly felt it due to all parties, to carry his wife to the
Park, in order that she might make the acquaintance of the
near relatives who dwelt there. Mrs. Dutton, by invitation,
was of the party; but Dutton was left behind, as having no
necessary connection with the scenes and the feelings that
were likely to occur. It would be painting the duchess too
much
en beau
, were we to say that she met Mildred without
certain misgivings and fears. But the first glimpse of her
lovely niece completely put natural feelings in the
ascendency
.
The resemblance to her sister was so strong as to
cause a piercing cry to escape her, and, bursting into tears,
she folded the trembling young woman to her heart, with a
fervour and sincerity that set at naught all conventional
manners. This was the commencement of a close intimacy;
which lasted but a short time, however, the duchess dying
two years later.
Wycherly continued in the service until the peace of
Aix-la-Chapelle
,
when he finally quitted the sea. His strong,
native attachments led him back to Virginia, where all his
own nearest relatives belonged, and where his whole heart
might be said to be, when he saw Mildred and his children
at his side. With him, early associations and habits had
more strength than traditions and memorials of the past.
He erected a spacious dwelling on the estate inherited from
his father, where he passed most of his time; consigning
Wychecombe to the care of a careful steward. With the
additions and improvements that he was now enabled to
make, his Virginian estate produced even a larger income
than his English, and his interests really pointed to the
choice he had made. But no pecuniary considerations lay
at the bottom of his selection. He really preferred the
graceful and courteous ease of the intercourse which
characterized
the manners of James's river. In that age, they
were equally removed from the coarse and boisterous jollity
of the English country-squire, and the heartless
conventionalities
of high life. In addition to this, his sensitive feelings
rightly enough detected that he was regarded in the
mother-country
as a sort of intruder. He was spoken of, alluded
to in the journals, and viewed even by his tenants as the
American
landlord; and he never felt truly at home in the
country for which he had fought and bled. In England, his
rank as a baronet was not sufficient to look down these
little
peculiarities; whereas, in Virginia, it gave him a certain
clat
, that was grateful to one of the main weaknesses of
human nature. At home, as the mother-country was then
affectionately termed, he had no hope of becoming a privy
councillor; while, in his native colony, his rank and
fortune
,
almost as a matter of course, placed him in the
council
of the governor. In a word, while Wycherly found
most of those worldly considerations which influence men
in the choice of their places of residence, in favour of the
region in which he happened to be born, his election was
made more from feeling and taste than from anything else.
His mind had taken an early bias in favour of the usages
and opinions of the people among whom he had received his
first impressions, and this bias he retained to the hour of his
death.
Like a true woman, Mildred found her happiness with her
husband and children. Of the latter she had but three; a
boy and two girls. The care of the last was early
committed
to Mrs. Dutton. This excellent woman had remained
at Wychecombe with her husband, until death put an end to
his vices, though the close of his career was exempt from
those scenes of brutal dictation and interference that had
rendered the earlier part of her life so miserable.
Apprehension
of what might be the consequences to himself, acted
as a check, and he had sagacity enough to see that the
physical comforts he now possessed were all owing to the
influence of his wife. He lived but four years, however.
On his death, his widow immediately took her departure for
America.
It would be substituting pure images of the fancy for a
picture of sober realities, were we to say that Lady
Wychecombe
and her adopted mother never regretted the land of
their
birth. This negation of feeling, habits, and prejudices,
is not to be expected even in an Esquimaux. They both
had occasional strictures to make on the
climate
, (and this
to Wycherly's great surprise, for
he
conscientiously believed
that of England to be just the worst in the world,) on the
fruits, the servants, the roads, and the difficulty of procuring
various little comforts. But, as this was said good-naturedly
and in pleasantry, rather than in the way of complaint, it
led to no unpleasant scenes or feelings. As all three made
occasional voyages to England, where his estates, and more
particularly settlements with his factor, compelled the
baronet
to go once in about a lustrum, the fruits and the climate
were finally given up by the ladies. After many years,
even the slip-shod, careless, but hearty attendance of the
negroes, came to be preferred to the dogged mannerism of
the English domestics, perfect as were the latter in their
parts; and the whole subject got to be one of amusement,
instead of one of complaint. There is no greater mistake
than to suppose that the traveller who passes
once
through
a country, with his home-bred, and quite likely
provincial
notions thick upon him, is competent to describe, with due
discrimination, even the usages of which he is actually a
witness. This truth all the family came, in time, to
discover
;
and while it rendered them more strictly critical in
their remarks, it also rendered them more tolerant. As it
was, few happier families were to be found in the British
empire, than that of Sir Wycherly Wychecombe; its head
retaining his manly and protecting affection for all dependent
on him, while his wife, beautiful as a matron as she had
been lovely as a girl, clung to him with the tenderness of a
woman, and the tenacity of the vine to its own oak.
Of the result of the rising in the north, it is unnecessary
to say much. The history of the
Chevalier's
successes in
the first year, and of his final overthrow at Culloden, is well
known. Sir Reginald Wychecombe, like hundreds of others,
played his cards so skilfully that he avoided committing
himself; and, although he lived and eventually died a
suspected
man, he escaped forfeitures and attainder. With Sir
Wycherly, as the head of his house, he maintained a friendly
correspondence to the last, even taking charge of the paternal
estate in its owner's absence; manifesting to the hour of his
death, a scrupulous probity in matters of money, mingled with
an inherent love of management and intrigue, in things that
related to politics and the succession. Sir Reginald lived
long enough to see the hopes of the Jacobites completely
extinguished, and the throne filled by a native Englishman.
Many long years after the events which rendered the
week of its opening incidents so memorable among its actors,
must now be imagined. Time had advanced with its usual
unfaltering tread, and the greater part of a generation had
been gathered to their fathers. George III. had been on
the throne not less than three lustrums, and most of the
important
actors of the period of '45, were dead;many of
them, in a degree, forgotten. But each age has its own
events and its own changes. Those colonies, which in 1745
were so loyal, so devoted to the house of Hanover, in the
belief that political and religious liberty depended on the
issue, had revolted against the supremacy of the parliament
of the empire. America was already in arms against the
mother country, and the very day before the occurrence of
the little scene we are about to relate, the intelligence of the
battle of Bunker Hill had reached London. Although the
gazette and national pride had, in a degree, lessened the
characteristics of this most remarkable of all similar
combats
,
by exaggerating the numbers of the colonists engaged,
and lessening the loss of the royal troops, the impression
produced by the news is said to have been greater than any
known to that age. It had been the prevalent opinion of
Englandan opinion that was then general in Europe, and
which descended even to our own times  that the animals
of the new continent, man included, had less courage and
physical force, than those of the old; and astonishment
mingled
with the forebodings of the intelligent, when it was
found that a body of ill-armed countrymen had dared to
meet, in a singularly bloody combat, twice their number of
regular troops, and that, too, under the guns of the king's
shipping and batteries. Rumours, for the moment, were rife
in London, and the political world was filled with gloomy
anticipations of the future.
On the morning of the day alluded to, Westminster
Abbey
,
as usual, was open to the inspection of the curious and
interested. Several parties were scattered among its aisles
and chapels, some reading the inscriptions on the simple
tablets of the dead which illustrate a nation, in illustrating
themselves; others listening to the names of princes who
derived their consequence from their thrones and alliances;
and still other sets who were wandering among the more
elaborate memorials that have been raised equally to
illustrate
insignificance, and to mark the final resting-places of
more modern heroes and statesmen. The beauty of the
weather had brought out more visiters than common, and
not less than half-a-dozen equipages were in waiting, in
and about Palace Yard. Among others, one had a ducal
coronet. This carriage did not fail to attract the attention
that is more than usually bestowed on rank, in England.
All were empty, however, and more than one party of
pedestrians
entered the venerable edifice, rejoicing that the
view of a duke or a duchess, was to be thrown in, among
the other sights, gratuitously. All who passed on foot,
however, were not influenced by this vulgar feeling; for,
one group went by, that did not even cast a glance at the
collection of carriages; the seniors of the party being too
much accustomed to such things to lend them a thought,
and the juniors too full of anticipations of what they were
about to see, to think of other matters. This party
consisted
of a handsome man of fifty-odd, a lady some three or
four years his junior, well preserved and still exceedingly
attractive; a young man of twenty-six, and two lovely girls,
that looked like twins; though one was really twenty-one,
and the other but nineteen. These were Sir Wycherly and
Lady Wychecombe, Wycherly their only son, then just
returned
from a five years' peregrination on the continent of
Europe, and Mildred and Agnes, their daughters. The rest
of the family had arrived in England about a fortnight
before
,
to greet the heir on his return from the
grand tour
, as
it was then termed. The meeting had been one of love,
though Lady Wychecombe had to reprove a few innocent
foreign affectations, as she fancied them to be, in her son;
and the baronet, himself, laughed at the scraps of French,
Italian and German, that quite naturally mingled in the
young man's discourse. All this, however, cast no cloud
over the party, for it had ever been a family of entire
confidence
and unbroken love.
This is a most solemn place to me, observed Sir
Wycherly
,
as they entered at the Poets' corner, and one in
which a common man unavoidably feels his own
insignificance
.
But, we will first make our pilgrimage, and look at
these remarkable inscriptions as we come out. The tomb
we seek is in a chapel on the other side of the church, near
to the great doors. When I last saw it, it was quite alone.
On hearing this, the whole party moved on; though the
two lovely young Virginians cast wistful and curious eyes
behind them, at the wonders by which they were
surrounded
.
Is not this an extraordinary edifice, Wycherly? half
whispered Agnes, the youngest of the sisters, as she clung
to one arm of her brother, Mildred occupying the other.
Can the whole world furnish such another?
So much for hominy and James' river! answered the
young man, laughingnow could you but see the pile at
Rouen, or that at Rheims, or that at Antwerp, or even that
at York, in this good kingdom, old Westminster would have
to fall back upon its little tablets and big names. But Sir
Wycherly stops; he must see what he calls his land-fall.
Sir Wycherly had indeed stopped. It was in
consequence
of having reached the head of the
chur
, whence
he could see the interior of the recess, or chapel, towards
which he had been moving. It still contained but a single
monument, and that was adorned with an anchor and other
nautical emblems. Even at that distance, the words
Richard
Bluewater, Rear-Admiral of the White
, might
be read. But the baronet had come to a sudden halt, in
consequence of seeing a party of three enter the chapel, in
which he wished to be alone with his own family. The
party consisted of an old man, who walked with tottering
steps, and this so much the more from the circumstance
that he leaned on a domestic nearly as old as himself,
though of a somewhat sturdier frame, and of a tall
imposinglooking
person of middle age, who followed the two with
patient steps. Several attendants of the cathedral watched
this party from a distance with an air of curiosity and
respect
;
but they had been requested not to accompany it to
the chapel.
They must be some old brother-officers of my poor
uncle's, visiting his tomb! whispered Lady Wychecombe.
The very venerable gentleman has naval emblems about
his attire.
Do
you
can
you forget him, love? 'Tis Sir Gervaise
Oakes, the pride of England! and yet how changed! It
is now five-and-twenty years since we last met; still I
knew him at a glance. The servant is old Galleygo, his
Vol. II.  21
steward; but the gentleman with him is a stranger. Let
us advance;
we
cannot be intruders in such a place.
Sir Gervaise paid no attention to the entrance of the
Wychecombes. It was evident, by the vacant look of his
countenance, that time and hard service had impaired his
faculties, though his body remained entire; an unusual
thing for one who had been so often engaged. Still there
were glimmerings of lively recollections, and even of strong
sensibilities about his eyes, as sudden fancies crossed his
mind. Once a year, the anniversary of his friend's
interment
,
he visited that chapel; and he had now been brought
here as much from habit, as by his own desire. A chair
was provided for him, and he sat facing the tomb, with the
large letters before his eyes. Still he regarded neither,
though he bowed courteously to the salute of the strangers.
His companion at first seemed a little surprised, if not
offended
at the intrusion; but when Wycherly mentioned that
they were relatives of the deceased, he also bowed
complacently
,
and made way for the ladies.
This it is as what you wants to see, Sir Jarvy,
observed
Galleygo, jogging his master's shoulder by way of
jogging his memory. Them 'ere cables and hanchors,
and that 'ere mizzen-mast, with a rear-admiral's flag
a-flying
,
is rigged in this old church, in honour of our friend
Admiral Blue, as was; but as is now dead and gone this
many a long year.
Admiral of the Blue, repeated Sir Gervaise coldly.
You 're mistaken, Galleygo, I 'm an admiral of the white,
and admiral of the fleet into the bargain. I know my own
rank, sir.
I knows that as well as you does yourself, Sir Jarvy,
answered Galleygo, whose grammar had rather become
confirmed than improved, by time, or as well as the First
Lord himself. But Admiral Blue was once your best friend,
and I doesn't at all admire at your forgetting himone of
these long nights you 'll be forgetting
me
.
I beg your pardon, Galleygo; I rather think not. I
remember
you
, when a very young man.
Well, and so you mought remember Admiral Blue, if
you 'd just try. I know'd ye both when young luffs,
myself
.
This is a painful scene, observed the stranger to Sir
Wycherly, with a melancholy smile. This gentleman is
now at the tomb of his dearest friend; and yet, as you see,
he appears to have lost all recollection that such a person
ever existed. For what do we live, if a few brief years are
to render our memories such vacant spots!
Has he been long in this way? asked Lady
Wychecombe
,
with interest.
The stranger started at the sound of her voice. He looked
intently into the face of the still fair speaker, before he
answered
;
then he bowed, and replied
He has been failing for the last five years, though his
last visit here was much less painful than this. But are
our own memories perfect?Surely, I have seen that face
before!These young ladies, too
Geoffrey
dear
cousin Geoffrey! exclaimed Lady
Wychecombe, holding out both her hands. It isit must
be the Duke of Glamorgan, Wycherly!
No further explanations were needed. All the parties
recognised
each other in an instant. They had not met for
manymany years, and each had passed the period of life
when the greatest change occurs in the physical appearance;
but, now that the ice was broken, a flood of recollections
poured in. The duke, or Geoffrey Cleveland, as we prefer
to call him, kissed his cousin and her daughters with frank
affection, for no change of condition had altered his simple
sea-habits, and he shook hands with the gentlemen, with a
cordiality like that of old times. All this, however, was
unheeded by Sir Gervaise, who sat looking at the
monument
,
in a dull apathy.
Galleygo, he said; but Galleygo had placed himself
before Sir Wycherly, and thrust out a hand that looked like
a bunch of knuckles.
I knows ye! exclaimed the steward, with a grin. I
know'd ye in the offing yonder, but I couldn't make out
your number. Lord, sir, if this doesn't brighten Sir Jarvy
up, again, and put him in mind of old times, I shall begin to
think we have run out cable to the better end.
I will speak to him, duke, if you think it advisable?
said Sir Wycherly, in an inquiring manner.
Galleygo, put in Sir Gervaise, what lubber fitted that
cable?he has turned in the clench the wrong way.
Ayaysir, they
is
great lubbers, them stone-cutters,
Sir Jarvy; and they knows about as much of ships, as ships
knows of them. But here is
young
Sir Wycherly
Wychecombe
come to see youthe
old
'un's nevy.
Sir Wycherly, you are a very welcome guest.
Bowldero
is a poor place for a gentleman of your merit; but such
as it is, it is entirely at your service. What did you say the
gentleman's name was, Galleygo?
Sir Wycherly Wychecombe, the
young
'unthe
old
'un
slipped the night as we moored in his house.
I hope, Sir Gervaise, I have not entirely passed from
your recollection; it would grieve me sadly to think so.
And my poor uncle, too; he who died of apoplexy in your
presence!
Nullus, nulla, nullum
. That 's good Latin, hey! Duke?
Nullius, nullius, nullius
. My memory
is
excellent,
gentlemen
;
nominative,
penna
; genitive,
penn
, and so on.
Now, Sir Jarvy, since you're veering out your Latin,
I
should likes to know if you can tell a `clove-hitch' from a
`carrick-bend?'
That is an extraordinary question, Galleygo, to put to
an old seaman!
Well, if you remembers
that
, why can't you just as
reasonably remember your old friend, Admiral Blue?
Admiral of the blue! I do recollect
many
admirals of
the blue. They ought to make me an admiral of the blue,
duke; I've been a rear-admiral long enough.
You 've
been
an admiral of the blue
once;
and that 's
enough for any man, interrupted Galleygo, again in his
positive manner; and it isn't five minutes since you know'd
your own rank as well as the Secretary to the
Admiralty
himself. He veers and hauls, in this fashion, on an
idee, gentlemen, until he doesn't know one end of it from
t'other.
This is not uncommon with men of great age, observed
the duke. They sometimes remember the things of their
youth, while the whole of later life is a blank. I have
remarked this with our venerable friend, in whose mind I
think it will not be difficult, however, to revive the
recollection
of Admiral Bluewater, and even of yourself, Sir
Wycherly. Let
me
make the effort, Galleygo.
Yes, Lord Geoffrey, for so the steward always called
the quondam reefer, you does handle him more like a
quick-working boat, than any on us; and so I 'll take an
hopportunity of just overhauling our old lieutenant's young
'uns, and of seeing what sort of craft he has set afloat for
the next generation.
Sir Gervaise, said the Duke, leaning over the chair,
here is Sir Wycherly Wychecombe, who once served a
short time with us as a lieutenant; it was when you were
in the Plantagenet. You remember the Plantagenet, I trust,
my dear sir?
The Plantagenets? Certainly, duke; I read all about
them when a boy. Edwards, and Henrys, and
Richards
at the last name he stopped; the muscles of his face twitched,
for memory had touched a chord that was always sensitive.
But it was too faintly, to produce more than a pause.
There, now, growled Galleygo, in Agnes' face, he being
just then employed in surveying her through a pair of
silver
spectacles that were a present from his master, you
see, he has forgotten the old Planter; and the next thing,
he 'll forget to eat his dinner. It 's
wicked
, Sir Jarvy, to
forget
such
a ship.
I trust, at least, you have not forgotten Richard
Bluewater
?
continued the Duke, he who fell in our last action
with the Comte de Vervillin?
A gleam of intelligence shot into the rigid and wrinkled
face; the eye lighted, and a painful smile struggled around
the lips.
What,
Dick!
he exclaimed, in a voice stronger than
that in which he had previously spoken.
Dick!
hey!
duke?
good, excellent Dick?
We were midshipmen
together
,
my lord duke; and I loved him like a brother!
I
knew
you did! and I dare say now you can recollect
the melancholy occasion of his death?
Is Dick
dead?
asked the admiral, with a vacant gaze.
LordLord, Sir Jarvy, you knows he is, and that 'ere
marvel constructure is his monermentnow you
must
remember
21 *
the old Planter, and the County of Fairvillian, and
the threshing we guv'd him?
Pardon me, Galleygo; there is no occasion for warmth.
When I was a midshipman, warmth of expression was
disapproved
of by all the elder officers.
You cause me to lose ground, said the Duke, looking
at the steward by way of bidding him be silent: is it not
extraordinary, Sir Wycherly, how his mind reverts to his
youth, overlooking the scenes of later life! Yes,
Dick is
dead, Sir Gervaise. He fell in that battle in which you were
doubled on by the Frenchwhen you had le Foudroyant
on one side of you, and le Pluton on the other
I remember it!
interrupted Sir Gervaise, in a clear
strong voice, his eye flashing with something like the fire
of youthI remember it! Le Foudroyant was on our
starboard beam; le Pluton a little on our larboard bow
Bunting had gone aloft to look out for Bluewaternopoor
Bunting was killed
Sir Wycherly Wychecombe, who afterwards married
Mildred Bluewater, Dick's niece, put in the baronet,
himself
,
almost as eager as the admiral had now become; Sir
Wycherly Wychecombe
had
been aloft, but was returned
to report the Pluton coming down!
So he did!God bless him! A clever youth, and he
did
marry Dick's niece. God bless them
both
. Well, sir,
you 're a stranger, but the story will interest you. There
we lay, almost smothered in the smoke, with one two-decker
at work on our starboard beam, and another hammering
away on the larboard bow, with our top-masts over the side,
and the guns firing through the wreck.
Ay, now you 're getting it like a book! exclaimed
Galleygo
exultingly, flourishing his stick, and strutting about
the little chapel; that 's just the way things was, as I
knows from seeing 'em!
I 'm quite certain I 'm right, Galleygo?
Right! your honour 's righter than any log-book in the
fleet. Give it to 'em, Sir Jarvy, larboard and starboard!
That we didthat we did  continued the old man
earnestly, becoming even grand in aspect, as he rose,
always
gentleman-like and graceful, but filled with all his
native fire, that did we! de Vervillin was on our right,
and des Prez on our leftthe smoke was choking us all
Buntingno; young Wychecombe was at my side; he said
a fresh Frenchman was shoving in between us and le
Pluton
,
sirGod forbid! I
thought;
for we had enough of them,
as it was. There she comes! See, here is her
flying-jib-boom-end
and
therehey! Wychecombe?
That's
the
old Roman
, shoving through the smoke!Csar himself!
and there stands Dick and young Geoffrey Cleveland
he
was of your family, dukeThere stands Dick Bluewater,
between the knight-heads, waving his hat
HURRAH!
He 's true, at last!  He 's true, at last
HURRAH!
HURRAH!
The clarion tones rose like a trumpet's blast, and the
cheering of the old sailor rang in the arches of the Abbey
Church, causing all within hearing to start, as if a voice
spoke from the tombs. Sir Gervaise, himself, seemed
surprised
;
he looked up at the vaulted roof, with a gaze
half-bewildered
,
half-delighted.
Is this Bowldero, or Glamorgan House, my Lord Duke,
he asked, in a whisper.
It is neither, Admiral Oakes, but Westminster Abbey;
and this is the tomb of your friend, rear-Admiral Richard
Bluewater.
Galleygo, help me to kneel, the old man added in the
manner of a corrected school-boy. The stoutest of us all,
should kneel to God, in his own temple. I beg pardon,
gentlemen; I wish to pray.
The Duke of Glarmorgan and Sir Wycherly
Wychecombe
helped the admiral to his knees, and then Galleygo,
as was his practice, knelt beside his master, who bowed his
head on his man's shoulders. This touching spectacle
brought all the others into the same humble attitude,
Wycherly
,
Mildred and their children, with the noble, kneeling
and praying in company. One by one, the latter arose,
still Galleygo and his master continued on the pavement.
At length Geoffrey Cleveland stepped forward, and raised
the old man, placing him, with Wycherly's assistance, in
the chair. Here he sat, with a calm smile on his aged
features
,
his open eyes riveted seemingly on the name of his
friend, perfectly dead. There had been a reaction, which
suddenly stopped the current of life, at the heart.
Thus expired Sir Gervaise Oakes, full of years and of
honours; one of the bravest and most successful of
England's
sea-captains. He had lived his time, and supplied an
instance of the insufficiency of worldly success to complete
the destiny of man; having, in a degree, survived his
faculties
,
and the consciousness of all he had done, and all he
merited. As a small offset to this failing of nature, he had
regained a glimmering view of one of the most striking scenes,
and of much the most enduring sentiment, of a long life,
which God, in mercy, permitted to be terminated in the act
of humble submission to his own greatness and glory.
THE END.My dear Oakes:Since we parted, my mind has
undergone
some violent misgivings as to the course duty
requires
of me, in this great crisis. One handone heart
one voice even, may decide the fate of England! In such
circumstances, all should listen to the voice of conscience,
and endeavour to foresee the consequences of their own acts.
Confidential agents are in the west of England, and one of
them I have seen. By his communications I find more
depends
on myself than I could have imagined, and more on
the movements of M. de Vervillin. Do not be too sanguine
take time for your own decisions, and grant
me
time; for
I feel like a wretch whose fate must soon be sealed. On no
account engage, because you think this division near enough
to sustain you, but at least keep off until you hear from me
more positively, or we can meet. I find it equally hard to
strike a blow against my rightful prince, or to desert my
friend. For God's sake act prudently, and depend on
seeing
me in the course of the next twenty-four hours. I shall
keep well to the eastward, in the hope of falling in with you,
as I feel satisfied de Vervillin has nothing to do very far
west. I may send some verbal message by the bearer, for
my thoughts come sluggishly, and with great reluctance.
Ever
yours
,
Richard Bluewater
.